1*
PETER PLODDY,
AND
OTHER ODDITIES.
PETER PLODDY'S DREAM.
Let
no one be unjust to Ploddyto Peter Ploddy,
once young man to Mr. Figgs, the grocer, and now
junior partner of the flourishing firm of Figgs and
Ploddy. Though addicted a little to complaint, and apt
to institute comparisons unfavourable to himself, it would
be a harsh judgment to set him down as ever having
been envious, in the worst sense of the word. It is true,
no doubt, that at the period of his life concerning which
we are now called upon to speak, a certain degree of
discontent with his own position occasionally embittered
his reflections; but he had no wish to deprive others of
the advantage they possessed, nor did he hate them on
the score of their supposed superiority. It was not his
inclination to drag men down, let them be situated as
loftily as they might; and whatever of vexation or
perplexity
he experienced in contemplating their elevation, arose
altogether from the fact that he could not clearly
understand
why he should not be up there too. It was not
productive of pleasurable sensations to Ploddy, to see
folks splashed who were more elegantly attired than
himself
.
He never laughed from a window over the
disastrous
results of a sudden shower; nor could he find it in
his heart to hope it would rain when his neighbours set
gayly forth on a rural excursion. It is a question, indeed,
whether it had been a source of satisfaction to him to see
any one's name on a list of bankrupts. The sheriff's
advertisements
of property seized and taken in execution,
were never conned over with delight by Peter Ploddy;
and when the entertainments given in his section of the
town were as splendid as luxury and profusion could
make them, it was yet possible for Peter to turn in his bed
at the sound of the music and of the merriment, without
a snarl about there you go, and without a hint that
there are headaches in store for the gentlemen, with a
sufficient variety of coughs and colds for the ladies. He
never said, because an invitation had not been addressed
to Ploddy, that affairs of this sort make work for the
doctors.
It will be observed then, that Peter was not of a
cynical
turn. Neither did he attempt to delude himself, as
many do, into a belief that he despised the things which
were denied to him. When his hands found an
amplitude
of room in empty pockets, he was candid to
himself
,
and wished them better filled, instead of vainly
endeavouring
to exalt poverty above riches. When
Thompson
married wealth, or Johnson espoused beauty, it was
no part of Peter's philosophy to think that extravagant
habits might neutralize the one, and that the love of
admiration
could render the other rather a torment than a
blessing. In short, Peter would have been pleased if
both together had fallen to his share. Wealth and beauty
might unite in Mrs. Peter Ploddy without causing
consternation
in his mind, and he confessed that the said
Thompson and Johnson were lucky fellows.
It being conceded that pedestrianism is a healthy
exercise
,
and that being jumbled in an omnibus is a salutary
impulse to the physical constitution, still Peter remained
unshaken in the opinion, somewhat theoretical though it
were, that a fine horse is not to be taken amiss, and that
a smooth rolling carriage, however conducive to
indolence
it may be, is not an appendage to be altogether
contemned. It is true, to be sure, that horses are often
perilous to a rider's limbs, and it needs no demonstration
at this late day to show that vehicular mischances are
many; but Peter was willing to encounter the risk, and
to exchange the toilsome security of going on foot for the
dangers incident to more elevated conveyance.
Haughtily
as they might travel by, he never even indulged
himself
in a charitable hope that certain people might break
their necks before they reached home, notwithstanding
the quantity of dust thrown in his eyes. On such
occasions
,
it was the habit with Peter to wipe his optics as
carefully as possible, as he wondered why it was not his
lot to kick up a similar cloud, to the astonishment of
some other Peter.
Here lay the trouble. Why was not Peter Ploddy
otherwise than he was, if not in circumstances, at least in
personal attributes? Why was he environed by
disadvantages
,
when the favours of nature and of fortune had
been so profusely distributed around himwhen almost
everybody but himself had something to boast about or
to make capital of?There, for instance, was his young
friend Smith, at the apothecary's, over the waySmith
was a wit and a mimicSmith could imitate all sorts of
things, from the uncorking of a bottle to the plaintive
howl of an imprisoned doghis bumbly-bee was
equal to any thing of the sort to be heard among the
clover blossoms or in the buckwheat fieldhis mosquito
would render a sound sleeper uneasy, and he could
perform
a cat's concert so naturally that old Mr. Quiverton,
who is nervous in his slumbers, has thus been made,
more than once, to leap from his bed and dash his
slippers
into the yard, as he uttered imprecations upon the
feline race in general and the apothecary's cats in
particular
.
The gifted Smith! As a calf, too, he was
magnificent. No one in town could bleat half so well.
Why could not Ploddy have accomplishments like Smith?
accomplishments which are the instinct of genius, and
not attainable by labour. For had not Ploddy tried the
effect of practice? Had he not, in the solitude of his
dormitory, devoted whole evenings to corking and
uncorking
a bottle, listening with all the ears he had to its
peculiarities of expressionhad he not given himself
assiduously to the study of the bumbly-bee
endeavoured
to analyze the vocalism of gallinippers, and whined
industriously through successive hours? And with what
result, as the reward of so much intensity of application
and usefulness of labour? A request from Figgs to quit
his infernal noise o' nights, without the least doubt on the
part of that respectable gentleman that the said noise was
Peter's work. He did not even desire him to abstain
from imitationshe did not recognise imitation in the
matter at all. He spoke only of noise, without the
slightest
zoological or entomological allusion. And as for Mrs.
Figgs, when Peter wished to test his progress by an effort
at the cat's concert in the open air, did not her
night-cap
appear at the window and think that Peter Ploddy
you Petehad better go to bed than stand screeching
there? She did not ask whether it was Peteshe did not
say 'scatshe knew it was Pete, in the dark. Yet
Smith had never been so disparaged. He could pass for
a cat, or for any thing he pleased. He had no difficulty
in causing people to jump and to cry get out! And
hence every one was proud of knowing Smith. It was
equal to a free admission to the menagerie.
Then there was Bill Baritone, at the dry-goods store.
Bill sang delightfully, and was invited out every
evening. A serenade was not regarded as complete
without him. Nobody could be in greater demand than
Bill Baritone, whose sentimental strains went to the heart
of every young damsel. But when Peter Ploddy tried
to sing, people stopped their earsthe neighbours sent
in to know what's the matter, and the boys in the
street were of opinion that something had broke loose
a species of compliment for which Peter had no great
relish, especially as the droll Mr. Smith had woven the
affair into a story, and gave prime imitations of his vocal
efforts, which were described as a bunch of keys, and
all sorts of time, past, present, and to come. Peter
had bought several music books, and had gone so far as
to ask the price of a guitar; but he soon abandoned the
hope of competing with Baritone, though he continued
to wish that he could singat least a littlejust enough
to enable his friends to discover what tune it was, or what
tune it was meant to be. It is so discouraging to be
obliged to tell them the name of it.
Tom Quillet, who was reading law round the corner,
how he could talkhow he did talkhow he could
not be prevented from talking! Ploddy had not the
shadow of a chance when Tom was present. In the
first place, Ploddy was not very rapid in raking up an
ideait often took him a considerable time to find any
thing to talk about, and to determine whether it was
worth talking about, when he had found it; and then it
was to be brushed up and dressed in words fit to go out.
Tom Quillet, on the contrary, was a walking vocabulary,
who sent forth his words to look for ideas, being but
little particular whether they found them or not; and he
was, therefore, fully entered upon a speech which scorned
subjection to the one hour rule, before Ploddy had
discovered a corner in his mind where a thought lay
burrowing
.
Tom, in truth, used his friends as a target, and
remorselessly practised elocution and oratory upon them
on all occasions. He could talk Peter Ploddy right up,
with the greatest ease. He was, in the comparison, like
steam against sails. He could talk all round Peter
before
,
behind, and on every side. Ploddy was not
voluble
,
and Quillet either brought down or scared away
the game, while he was priming his gun to take sight
at it.
Why can't I express myself like that everlasting
Tom Quillet? thought Ploddy, in petulance; what he
says don't often amount to much, to be sure, when you
come to think of it, but it stretches over a deal of ground
and hammers out broad and thin. A little goes a great
way. I wonder if he ever heard anybody but
himself
say any thing? I wonder if he believes that any
body but himself has a right to say any thing? How
does he do when he goes to church, I'd like to
know, and must sit still without contradicting or giving
his notions on the subject? How does he manage to
stop his confounded clack long enough to get asleep?
Should there ever be a Mrs. Tom Quillet, and should
she ever happen to want to make an observation, which
is very likely, she will die as certain as fate, of not being
allowed to speak her mind. She'll die of a checked
utterance
and of a congestion of words. Her thoughts will
be dammed up till she chokes with them. Tom will
never give her a chance. He never gives me onenot
half a one.
Quillet was a politician, and a rising youth upon the
stump, whither Ploddy ventured not to follow him. His
elocutionary failure in social life had closed the gate of
his ambition in this respect, and he felt assured that to
gain distinction by the power of tongue did not fall
within the compass of possibility, so far as he was
concerned
.
Still he thought it a great thing to be able to
talkto be the operator rather than the patientthe
surgeon in preference to being the subjecta Quillet
rather than a Ploddyon the general principle which
obtains
in warfare, that the offensive is apt to be a surer
game than the defensive, as it affords room for choice in
the time and method of attack, whereas the other party is
never safe, and must always be on the
qui vive
.
All these dashing qualities, with others that might be
named, which are placed first in order as coming first in
Ploddy's estimation, could perhaps have been dispensed
with, had he been able to discover things in himself
calculated
to compensate for their absence. As a matter of
immediate concern, he fell back upon his quiet common
sense and sound unobtrusive judgment. We always
think much of our common sense and sound judgment,
when surpassed in more showy characteristics. Almost
everybody has a wonderful degree of judgment
judgment
more precious than other people's genius; and who
is endowed with talent equal in value to our common
sense? Like the rest of the world, Peter derived
consolations
from this source; but it was his youthful desire to
be able to flash and glitter, if he could only discover the
way to excel, or the line for which he was qualified. He
had consumed no little time in fruitless efforts, musical,
mimetic and otherwise, to acquire accomplishments
which were impossibilities to him, as has happened and
will continue to happen in more cases than that of Mr.
Peter Ploddy, and he had encountered both toil and
disappointment
to convince himself of disqualifications
obvious
from the first to every one except himself. But in
giving up these, he sighed for others equally unattainable.
He saw that every man's life is a story, and that every
man must perforce, and for want of a better, be the hero
of his own story. Now, in examining the magazines,
the nouvellettes, and the historiettes of the day, it will be
discovered that heroes are always tall and generally
valiant. Peter Ploddy was not much above five feet,
and he resigned from the Thunderpump fire company
because
he had no fancy for riots, or for being hit over the
head with brass trumpets and iron spanners. He never
liked games of that sort. Heroes are graceful too! but
Ploddy's dancing was not at all admired. It would have
been strange if it had been. Heroes are handsome,
moreover, with dark eyes, clustering curls and
umbrageous
whiskers. But the mirror insisted upon it to Ploddy
that he was not handsomeverging rather in another
directionthat his eyes were of a dubious lightness, his
hair sandy, and his whiskers discontinuous, uncertain
and sparse. He gazed sadly upon Mr. Daffodil Twod,
the pretty man in the perfumery way and the fancy line.
Sweet Mr. Twod!with such loveliness, it is worth
one's while to strap tight and to make costume a science.
But Ploddy was not improvable into any resemblance,
however remote, to the Narcissus family. Nor could he
approximate otherwise to his impressive friend,
Samson
Hyde, the currier, who was wild and
wonderful
,
at the corner of the street. Samson Hydewhat
a martial figure he was gifted withwhat mountains of
chest, and what acres of shoulder. And his frownso
terrific. How Samson Hyde could fighthow he did
fight, whenever opportunity occurred. I wish I was
Samson Hyde the currier, ejaculated Ploddy, as he
doubled his fists and endeavoured to scowl Dick, the
shop-boy, into entire and utter annihilation. As Dick
only asked whether Mr. Ploddy had got something in his
eye, that he made such funny faces, Mr. Ploddy felt that
the attempt to pulverize the boy by mesmerization was
an undeniable failurehe felt at once, as he attempted
to hide his confusion by adjusting a box of candles, that
there was nothing fascinating in his qualities, picturesque
in his appearance, or heroic in his compositionthat he
could not surpass the men, attract the women or confound
the urchinsthat he had not even the genius to make a
fortune at a blow, like Mr. Headover Slapdash, the
speculator
,
who rolled in wealth and built long rows of houses
2
that he had no inward or outward gifts to afford success
or prominenceundistinguished and undistinguishable
Peter Ploddy, young man to Mr. Figgs, the grocer!
In meditating upon the injustices of nature and the
inequalities
of fortune, Peter, even at his post of business,
grew melancholy and abstracted. He sometimes sold
salt for sugar, and sent people honey instead of oil, to fill
their lamps and to illuminate their ways. Mr. Figgs
found it necessary to take him aside and to talk to him
seriously, which all who have chanced to be subjected
to it know to be as unpleasant an operation as a young
man can undergo and expect to survive. There is
nothing worse than being talked to seriously, in an
empty room, the door locked and no help at hand,
though elderly gentlemen are so much addicted to it.
Mrs. Figgs, however, with the gentleness peculiar to
her sex, was not so cruel. She had not much faith in
having persons talked to, and, besides, she was
convinced
that the young man must be crossed in love, as
she had an exalted idea of the potency of the tender
passion, particularly among those employed in the retail
grocery business, which she regarded as calculated to
increase the susceptibilities and to soften the heart. Figgs
had been struck with her, and she had been struck with
Figgs, under circumstances of this description, and it had
ever since rendered her firm in the faith that a young
woman, whether she be sent for soap, sugar or tea, is
very likely to be smitten by the insinuating individual
who waits upon her, and that the insinuating individual
himself is in love all the time, and, for the most part, with a
great many at a time. However this may be as a general
rule, though not exactly applicable in the instance under
discussion, it is nevertheless true that employments have
their effect, somewhat in the manner suggested by Mrs.
Figgs. Your baker's boy, for example, who serves
customers
of a morningwhat a destroyer of hearts is he!
what a concentration of coquettishness, as he goes flirting
from door to door, distributing loaves of bread, words of
love and seductive glances all over town. He is a
dangerous
fellow, that same baker's boynone the less so
because his experience is so extensive that his own heart
is Cupid-proof, and is rarely, even in extreme cases,
scratched deeper than his tally.
Peter's crossed in love, repeated Mrs. Figgs, at the
tea-table, in the little back room; Peter's crossed in
love. He snores so loud you can hear him all over the
house, and that's a sure sign of being blighted in the
affections and nipped in the bud, as a body may say.
First, they snore, and then they borrow pistols, and buy
clothes-lines, and fippenny-bits-worth's of corroding
sublimity
,
done up in white paper, with the name pasted on
the outside. It is actually shocking the cruelty of us
women, and Mrs. Figgs wiped away a tear.
I've heard Peter sythe by the hour, observed Miss
Priscilla Figgs, in corroboration of her mother.
Yes, my dear, added Mrs. Figgs, young
gentlemen
that have got the mitten, or young gentlemen who
think they are going to get the mitten, always sythe. It
makes 'em feel bad, poor innocent little things, and `then
they heave a sythe,' as the song says. You should have
heard your father when he was in a state of suspension
about whether I was going to have him or not. Several
people thought it was a porpus.
Do porpusses get the mitten, ma? interjected little
Timothy Figgs, who was always on the search for
information
.
I didn't think fishes ever wore mittens.
Pshaw, you're always talking about love and mittens
and stuff, as if people had time for such nonsense
now-a-days
,
said Mr. Figgs, sternly. Figgs had survived
his sentimental era, and grew impatient at any
reminiscences
of it. The reference to the porpus nettled him.
If Peter is crossed as you say, wait till we take an
account
of stock next week. That will cure him, I'll be
bound. But the long and the short of it is, that if he
keeps growing stupid, I'll send him adrift. I'm afraid
he is beginning to read books and buys cheap
publications
.
Reading books is enough to ruin anybody.
There ought to be tee-total societies against it.
But Peter was not then in love, or, if he were he was
not fully conscious of the fact; nor did he read books
enough to do him material injury. His complaint was
ambition. He wanted to be something, and he did not
know what, which is an embarrassing situation of affairs
he cared not whatrich, handsome, wise, witty,
eloquent
,
great upon the stump or fierce in regard to
whisker
he
would be a meteor, large or smallcourted or
fearedloved or enviedif not a cataract, at least a
ripple on the wave,more than Peter Ploddy had ever
been or was like to be,as funny as Smith, as musical
as Baritone, as voluble and as impudent as Quillet, as
pretty as Daffodil Twod, as big and as forocious as
Samson Hyde, as wealthy as Headover Slapdash was
reputed to be.
It was one of those afternoons at the close of the
month of June, which seem to have no end to them
when the sun, broad and blazing, appears to be unwilling
to approach the horizon, and endeavours to make the
night his own as well as the daywhen the eye wearies
of excess of lightwhen ice-creams are in their first
flush of popularity and little boys paddle in the brook
when crops rejoice in green, while people swelter in
white,when nature clothes herself thickly in leaves,
while the rest of the world divests itself of garments to
as great an extent as the customs of society will permit.
It was such an afternoon as this, and the Figgs family
were abroad for recreation. Dick, the boy, was out on
an errand, trying how many hours could be consumed in
a transit from one given point to another. Peter Ploddy
was alone in the shop, labouring under a suspicion that
customers must have departed this life, and that buying
things had become an obsolete ideaso he availed
himself of the opportunity and of a friction match, to find
recreation in the smoking of a segar. Reclining upon
coffee bags, he puffed and he mused, he mused and he
puffed, until the smoke circled around him in lazy clouds,
and his brain grew as hazy as the atmosphere. Light
faded, sounds melted indistinctly away, and, at last, Peter
imagined that he was rapidly travelling over the gulf of
time, using his coming years for stepping stones, and
anticipating the occurrences of the future, as if he were
turning over the pages of a book of prints. The
beginning
and the end were equally within his ken, and, fixing
himself at a point some eight or ten years after date, it
struck him that he would like to know where funny
Smith might chance to be at that period.
The place certainly had somewhat the appearance of a
theatre; but of a theatre in a very small wayof a
theatre
in a consumption, and troubled with a difficulty of
breathing. The room itself was not very large, but it
was much too large for the audience, who disposed of
themselves in various picturesque positions, as if desirous
of making up in effect what they wanted in numbers.
One individual had his pedal extremities on the bench
before him, and looked, as it were, from a rest, his elbows
placed upon his knees, while his chin reposed in the
palms of his hands. Another was longitudinally
extended
,
with his back against the wall; while others
intersected
at least three benches in their desire for repose,
lifting their heads at intervals to see what was going on.
2*
The gentleman in the window seemed to be as
comfortable
as any, in his zigzag attitude, with his feet on one side
and his shoulders on the other; and he had the advantage
too of seeing all that occurred, both inside and out, as
was evident from his frequent remonstrances with certain
juveniles in the street, who were poking him with a stick
because he obstructed their view. Git down, I tell
you! cried Zigzag, impatiently, every now and then.
The candles were few and ghastly; a single fiddle
comprised
the strength of the orchestra, and it was quite
enough; for had there been more of the same sort, it would
have been a questionable experiment upon the limits of
auricular endurance. Ploddy paid his entrance money to
a faded-looking woman, with one disconsolate child in
her arms, and several others, equally forlorn and unkempt,
hanging about her, while she herself, who, in her own
person, united the offices of treasurer, check-taker and
policeman, (in which latter capacity she often visited the
window aforesaid, to aid Mr. Zigzag in making them
git down on the outside,) was a singular compound of
the remains of beauty, of the slattern and of the virago
care-worn indeed, but theatrical still, like the odd volume
of a romance, thumbed to tatters in the kitchen. A
performer
was sustaining the regular drama by a series of
barn-yard imitations, which struck Ploddy's ear as
familiar, as also seemed the figure of the imitator, though
his hollow cheeks, painted face and flaxen wig set
recognition
for a moment at defiance. The well-known finale
of the cat's concert, however, dissipated doubt. It
was Smiththe funny Smiththe envied Smith, who
soon came round to the front to hold the baby and
mind the door, while Mrs. Smith delighted the audience
with a fancy dance. His countenance told a sad tale of
disappointment, poverty and suffering, and rendered
explanation
unnecessary.
It is just as well, thought Ploddy, as he slipped
sadly away, that I never could succeed in being a funny
fellow, and made so poor a business of it at the cat's
concert, and at imitating the bottle and the cork. This
trying to make people laugh every night, from year to
year, especially when their mouths are full of gingerbread,
wouldn't do for me, and doesn't seem to do for Smith.
I'd rather be Ploddy than Smith, if that's the way it's to be.
As Peter went meditating along, musing upon the
melancholy situation to which funny apothecaries, who
think more of creating merriment than of wielding the
pestle, may be reduced, he found himself, at the small
hours of the night, in the streets of the city. He was
startled by the sound of rattles, and almost overthrown
by a rush of tipsy and uproarious gentlemen, who battled
the watch, and would have battled also with Peter,
but that he secured a birds-eye view of the scene from a
lofty flight of steps. Mars proved false to Bacchus, and
victory perched like an eagle upon the banner of the
functionaries.
Well, bang my kerkus for a drum, panted Dogberry,
if this 'ere isn't that 'ere singing chap agin. I knows
him by his mulberry nose. He's on a shindy somewhere
or other every night, and gets knock'd down and tuck'd
up three times a week, rig'ler. Old Calico, his
daddy-in-law
,
has turned him outcouldn't stand it no longer,
no how it could be fixed; he got so blue and blew it out
so strong. He's a musical genus, you see.
The corporation should make a contract for ketching
him by the month, or else they should keep him ketch'd
all the time, replied Verges.
Put the genus in a wheelbarrow, exclaimed
Dogberry
,
in tones of command, and make the t'other fellers
walk.
A shade of doubt passed over Peter's mind as to
whether the gifts of Bill Baritone had really, and in the
long run, proved of benefit to him, and whether it was
desirable, after all, to enjoy that degree of popularity
which causes a youth to be invited out to
convivialities
every evening. It was a distinction, perhaps, but
Peter did not exactly like the order to put the genus in
the wheelbarrow.
But I must go to Quillet, said Peter, and ask him
to talk the police people over in the morning, to get poor
Bill out of his troubles.
Quillet, however, had exhaled and evaporated. The
places that had known him, now knew him no more
no Quillet at the ward meetingsno Quillet on the stump.
His talking abilities had converted him at last into a
mere hanger-on of partyhe neglected clients, and
clients
returned the compliment by being equally neglectful
of him. People praised him that he might do the work
necessary for political triumph; but when that was
accomplished
,
it so happened always, that somebody else
reaped the advantage. Good fellow, Quillet, said
they, but not popularobnoxioustoo much before the
public. Can't recommend him, you know. Habits not
very gooddoesn't attend to his businessoughtn't to
go to so many meetings; and the unlucky Quillet was
finally starved out, to do his talking elsewhere.
And the pretty man, in the fancy line, Mr. Twodwhat
disposition had these years made of him? He had
dressed so well and lounged so much in the resorts of
fashion, by way of showing what nature and the tailor had
done for him, that in the end Twod's Perfumery was
disposed of at public sale, without the slightest regard to
his feelings on the subject; and some remorseless stripling,
whose face must have been as hard as the contents of his
bosom, had disfigured the door by a chalked inscription
to the effect that Pretty Mr. Twod is now safe in quod.
A face is not always a fortune, inferred Peter;
there are decided differences between being useful and
being ornamental; and he had his own notions on another
subject, when he became impressed with a belief that
Samson Hyde, the currier, had disappeared suddenly, to
avoid the consequences of a fatal fray, in which he was
deeply implicated. Broad shoulders and alarming
whiskers
were sinking below para man may have too much
spirit.
Ploddy was not sure, but it struck him that the
barkeeper
at the Spread Eagle had a marvellous
resemblance
to Mr. Headover Slapdash, the speculator,a
little older, but yet as restless as ever. What had
possibly
become of his equipages, his magnificent mansion
in town, his beautiful retreat in the country, his long
rows of houses, and his immense accumulation of lots?
Gone! Could it be? There was nothing more likely.
How different things seem to be in the end, from
what they promise to be in the beginning, muttered
Peter, as he moved uneasily upon the coffee-bags.
Strange, strange, very strange, and his foot dislodged
a demijohn from its perch. The crash aroused him from
slumbers and dreams, and he sprang to his feet in
bewilderment
.
Headover Slapdash has explodeddidn't you hear
the smash? shouted Peter.
Crossed in love, poor thing, said Mrs. Figgs, as
she rummaged for her sympathizing pocket-handkerchief.
Who crossed him, I'd like to know? cried Priscilla,
with a twinge of jealousy.
He's becoming foolish, added Figgs.
He's been asleep, and has had an inkeybus,
observed
the youthful Timothy, whose bias was in a
scientific
direction.
But Peter was rejoicing that it was only in his
imagination
that his friends had suffered,that however real
and however probable the whole matter appeared, it was
still no more than a dream. There were hints in it,
notwithstanding
,
which might be rendered useful, not to
himself only, but to the other parties concerned. Peter
was sure, at all events, that he had learned something
about contentment with his position, with his faculties
and with his physical endowments, which he had never
acquired before, although he stood greatly in need of it.
He had, in half an hour or so, anticipated the trying
experiences
of years, and saw that every condition has its
compensationsthat the higher the elevation, the more
imminent the danger of a fallthat brilliancy may
betray to ruin, and that successes are often lures to
destruction
.
Humbleness looked by no means so
despicable
as he had previously considered it.
Tol de rol! said Ploddy.
You can't sing, Peter, remarked Mrs. Ploddy.
I'm glad of it, returned Ploddy, thinking of genus
on the wheelbarrow; I'll mind my business all the
better.
It was to this observation, coupled with a confirmatory
change in his general business deportment, that Peter
eventually was indebted for his position as a member of
the firm of Figgs and Ploddy, and a very prosperous,
respectable, and wealthy firm it came to be, owing in part
to Peter's dream, which also gained him the reputation
of being a philosopher, in secretly furnishing the material
for wise discourses upon the folly of inordinate ambition
and vain desires.
There was, however, another event in Peter's life
which deserves to be chronicled as important.
It was evident that there was something on his mind as
he fidgetted before the glassan unusual event with him
and he rumpled his hair in all directions.
It's labour thrown away, Peteryou can't make
yourself handsome, hinted Priscilla Figgs, rather
maliciously
,
as she glanced over her sewing.
But Peter had not been studying himself in the mirror.
His eyes were on the reflected image of Miss Priscilla
Figgs, who was by no means a disagreeable object.
Ploddy had too much taste to look at himself when she
was near.
Ha! ha!ho! ho!I know it, said Peter; I've
had a lucky escape.
Not a very narrow one, I'm sure, replied Priscilla,
tossing her head, whatever Sally Jones may think.
Sally who?
Sally Jones, responded Priscilla, poutingly. She
appeared
uncommonly pretty at that moment, and Peter had
a sensation.
Now, Priscilla!
Now Peter, you know
I don'tI don't know, and Peter drew nearer to
the damsel, whose head was turned coquettishly away,
but not far enough to prevent her downward glance from
noting the progress of the approach.
What explanations were made relative to Sally Jones,
the historian saith not; but the inference is that they
were satisfactory.
Peter, Peter, there's ma! cried Miss Priscilla Figgs
as she flew to the opposite side of the room, assuming a
look of intense demureness, which was perhaps a little
overacted, if not also a little contradicted by the mantling
colour of her cheek and the dewy softness of her eyes.
Let her come, said Peter, with delight, all the
ma's there are, and pa into the bargain.
Figgs had no objection to Peter as a son-in-law, now
that he had got over his foolishness, and was so strict
in his attention to business, and ma was charmed to
think that her theory of the tender passion in reference
to grocers, had been so happily illustrated, the more
especially
as she had somewhat risked her reputation upon
it that Peter was in love.
Smith, Baritone, Quillet, Twod and Samson Hyde were
at the wedding, and you may be sure there was a
merry party. Peter told them his dream as a bachelor's
legacy of warning against the dangers to which they
were individually exposed, and the effect was no doubt
salutary. Certain it is, that Peter Ploddy heard the clever
imitations, the funny stories, and the good songslistened
to Quillet's neat and appropriate speechessaw the pretty
man dance and the valiant man look heroic, without a
shadow of discontent or envy, satisfied to be, in every
particular, as he was and as he was like to be. Priscilla
was decidedly good-looking enough for both, and Peter
Ploddy was a happy man.
THE PRISON VAN; OR, THE BLACK MARIA.
[1]
[1]
In Philadelphia, the prisons are remote from the Courts of
Justice, and carriages, which, for obvious reasons, are of a
peculiar
construction, are used to convey criminals to and fro. The
popular voice applies the name of Black Maria to each of these
melancholy vehicles, and, by general consent, this is their
distinguishing
title.
Hush
! there she comes!
It was a pleasant summer morning,brightly shone
the sun, and the neighbours gossipped at the door.
Nancy polished the handlesSusan had the windows
wide open, and, with handkerchief on head, leaned forth
to join in the conversation. Mrs. Jenkins had been at
market, and paused upon the step, with the
provision-laden
Polly. There was quite a discussion of the more
agreeable points of domestic economy, and a slight
seasoning
of harmless scandal gave piquancy to the
discourse
.
All were merry. Why, indeed, should they
not be merry? Innocent hearts and balmy weather
sunshine within and sunshine without. No wonder their
voices rang so cheerfully. Even Mr. Curmudgeon, over
the way, that splenetic and supercritical bachelor, with
no partner of his bosom but a flannel waistcoast, and
with no objects of his tender care but the neuralgics and
the rheumaticseven Mr. Curmudgeon chirped, and for
once granted that it was a fine day, with no reservation
whatever about the east wind, and without attempts to
dash the general joy by casting forth suspicions that a
storm was brewing. If he said soif Mr. Curmudgeon
confessed the factnot a doubt can be entertainedit
was a fine day beyond the reach of cavila day free
from the reproach of a flawwith no lingering dampness
3
from yesterday, and with no cloud casting its shadow
before
,
prospective of sorrows to-morrow.
In short, every thing looked warm, cheerful, and gay
the Nancies, the Pollies, and the Susans were prettier
than usualthere are pretty days as well as lucky days
when cheeks are more glowing and eyes are more
brilliant
than on ordinary occasionswhen Mrs. Jenkins is
more pleasant than is the wont even of pleasant Mrs.
Jenkins, and when the extensive brotherhood of the
Curmudgeons
pat children on the head, and give them
penniesdays when one feels as if he were all heart, and
were gifted with the capacity to fall in love with
everybody
happy
days! The day of which we speak was
one of these daysnature smiled, and the people smiled
in return. Nature approached as near to a laugh as was
becoming in a matron at her time of life and with so large
a family, while the people did laugh with the smallest
provocation thereto.
Hush! there she comes! said somebody, in tones
of commingled fear and curiosity.
Who comes?
The finger of the speaker pointed steadfastly down the
street.
Who comes?
Black Maria! was the half-whispered reply.
Conversation ceaseda shade of gloom passed over
every browall gazed in the direction indicatedit was
a melancholy pausea pause of sad attention.
Black Maria! was the unconscious and involuntary
response.
The children looked behind them, as if to ascertain
whether the doors were open for retreat into the recesses
of home, and then peeped timidly and cautiously around
the skirts of their mothers. The mirth of their seniors
was also checked in mid career.
`Black Maria,' sissy, said curly-headed Tom, and
sissy clasped Tom's hand with the energy of
apprehension
.
`Black Maria,' Tom! repeated his aunt, with an
air of warning and admonition, at which Tom seemed to
understand a whole history, and was abashed.
Black Maria!
Who was this strange creaturethis Black Maria
that came like a cloud across the ruddy daythat chills
the heart wherever she passes? What manner of thing
is it which thus frowns gayety itself into silence?Black
Maria!Is she some dark enchantress, on whese swart
and sullen brow malignity sits enthroned?or is
pestilence
abroad, tangible and apparent?
The Black Maria goes lumbering by. It is but a
wagon, after alla wagon so mysteriously nameda
wagon, however, which is itself alonenot one of the
great family of carts, with general similitude and vast
relationship
,
but an instrument of progression which has
no brotheris like no brother. It creaks no
salutation
to wheeled cousins, as it wends its sulky wayit
has no family ties to enable it to find kith and kin, more
or less humble and more or less proud, in the long line
of gradation, from the retiring wheelbarrow up to the
haughty and obtrusive chariot. It is unique in form and
purposeit has a task which others are unfitted to
encounter
,
and it asks no help in the discharge of duties.
It moves scornfully among hacks and cabs, while even
the dray appears to regard it with a compound feeling of
dread and disdain. It is, as we may say, a vehicular
outcast, hated but yet fearedgrand, gloomy and
peculiar
a
Byron among less gifted but more moral
carriages
tragedy
amid the niceties of commonplace. Such
is the social isolation of the Black Maria. Even in
its hour of reposein its stabular retreats, the gig caresses
it not, nor does the carriole embrace it within its shafts.
The respectability of the stalls shrinks from contact with
the Black Maria, and its nights are passed in the open
court-yard. Nor is it to be wondered at. The very
physique
of the Black Maria is repulsive, apart from
the refinements of mere association. What is ita
coffin
,
rude but gigantic, travelling to and fro, between the
undertaker and the sexton? Why is it that the eye fails
to penetrate its dark recesses? No sashes adorn the
person of the Black Maria. Unlike all other vehicles,
it has no apertures for light and air, save those openings
beneath the roof, from which a haggard and uneasy glance
flashes forth at intervals, or from which protrudes a hand
waving, as it were, a last farewell to all that gives delight
to existence. Sternly and rigidly sits the guard in the
rearward chamber, and beyond him is a door heavy with
steel. It is no pleasure carriage thenit is not used as
a means of recreation nor as a free-will conveyance,
travelling
at the guidance of those who rest within. No
they who take seats in the Black Maria feel no honour
in their elevationthey ride neither for health nor
amusement
.
They neither say drive on, nor designate the
place of destination. If it were left to them, they would,
in all likelihood, ask to be taken another way, and they
would sooner trot on foot for ever, than to be thus raised
above contact with mud and mire. They are not
impatient
eitherthey make no objection to the slowness of
the gait. In short, they would like to get out and dismiss
all cumbrous pomp and ceremonious attendance.
But there are bars betweenyes, bolts and bars, and
there is nothing of complaisance on the brow of him who
has these iron fastenings at control. Polite requests
would be unheeded, and he has heard the curses of
despair
the
sobs of remorsethe bitter wailings of
heart-broken
wretchedness too often to be much moved by
solicitations such as these. Nor is he to be shaken by
the fierce regards of hardened recklessness. Even the
homicide may threatenred murder itself may glower
upon him with its fevered glare; but there is neither
weakness nor terror in the hard business-like deportment
with which he silences the exuberance of lacerated
feeling
.
He is but a check-taker at the door, and cares
naught about the play within. Tears may fall
convulsive
sorrow may rend the frame; but what is that to him
whose limited service it is to watch and wardto keep
them in and keep them out? To weep is not his
vocation
,
who sits at the door. He has no part in the drama,
and is no more bound to suffer than they who snuff the
candles for the stage. His emotions are for home
consumption
his
sympathies are elsewhereleft behind with
his better coat and hat, and well it is so, or they would
soon be torn to tattersallheart, cloth, and beaver.
What, then, is this Black Maria, so jocularly
named, yet so sad in its attributes? The progress of time
brings new inventionsnecessity leads to many
deviations
from the beaten track of custom, and the criminal,
in earlier days dragged through crowded streets by the
inexorable officers of the law, exposed to the scorn,
derision or pity, as the case might be, of every spectator,
now finds a preliminary dungeon awaiting him at the very
portals of justicea locomotive cella penitentiary upon
wheels. He is incarcerated in advance, and he begins
his probationary term at the steps of the court-house.
Once there was an interval:
Some space between the theatre and grave;
some breathing time from judge and jury to the jailer,
a space to be traversed, with the chances incident to a
journey. Constables on foot are but flesh and blood,
after all, and an adroit blow from a brawny thief has often
laid them prostrate. A short quick evasion of the body
3*
has extricated the collar from many a muscular grasp, and
once it was a thing of not unfrequent occurrence that the
rogue flew down the street, diving into all sorts of
interminable
alleys, while panting tipstaves toiled after
him in vain. There were no cowardly, sneaking
advantages taken thenenterprise was not cabined in a
perambulating chicken-coopvalour had room to swing
its elbow, and some opportunity to trip up the heels of
the law. But as things are at present managed, a man
is in prison as he traverses the cityin prison, with but
a plank between him and the moving concourse of the
freein prison, while the horses start at the crack of the
whipin prison, as he whirls around the cornerin
prison
,
yet moving from place to placejolted in prison
perhaps upset in prison. He hears the voices of the
peoplethe din of trafficthe clamours of tradethe
very dogs run barking after him, and he is jarred by
rough collisions; but still he is in prisonmore painfully
in prison, by the bitterness of intruding contrast, than if
he were immured beyond all reach of exterior sound; and
when the huge gates of his place of destination creak
upon their hinges, to the harsh rattling of the keeper's
key, the captive, it may be, rejoices that the busy world
is no longer about him, mocking his wretchedness with
its cheerful hum.
If it were in accordance with the spirit of the age to
refine upon punishment and to seek aggravation for
misery, the Black Maria would perhaps furnish a hint
that the pang might be rendered sharper, by secluding
the felon from liberty by the most minute intervalthat
freedom might be heard, yet not seenas the music of
the ball-room fitfully reaches the chamber of disease and
sufferingthat he might be in the deepest shadow, yet
know that light is beaming close around him; in the
centre
of action, yet deprived of its excitementsisolated in
the midst of multitudesalmost jostled by an invisible
concoursedead yet livinga sentient corpse.
It is not then to be marvelled at that the Black
Maria causes a sensation by her ominous presence
that labour rests from toil when the sound of her wheels
is heardthat the youthful shrink and the old look sad,
as she passes by. Nor is it strange that even when empty
she is encircled by a curious but meditative crowd,
scanning
the horses with a degree of reverential attention
which unofficial horses, though they were Barbary
coursers
or Andalusian steeds, might vainly hope to excite.
The very harness is regarded with trepidation, and the
driver
is respectfully scrutinized from head to foot, as if he
were something more or less than man; and if the guard
does but carelessly move his foot, the throng give back
lest they should unwittingly interfere with one who is
looked upon as the ultimatum of criminal justice. Should
the fatal entrance be left unclosed, see how the observant
spectator manuvres to obtain a knowledge of its
interior
,
without approaching too closely, as if he laboured
under an apprehension that the hungry creature would
yawn and swallow him, as it has swallowed so many,
body, boots, and reputation. Now, he walks slowly to
the left hand, that he may become acquainted with every
particular of the internal economy afforded by that point
of view. Again, he diverges to the right, on another
quest for information. Do not be surprised, if he were
also to squat, and from that graceful posture glance
upwards to ascertain the condition of the flooring, or sidle
about to note the style of the lynch-pins. A mysterious
interest envelopes the Black Maria; every feature
about her receives its commentshe has not a lineament
which is not honoured by a daily perusal from the public.
She is the minister of justicethe great avengerthe
receptacle into which crime is almost sure to fall, and as
she conveys the prisoner to trial or bears him to the
fulfilment
of sentence, she is still the inspirer of terror. There
may be some, no doubtperhaps there may be many
who have forebodings at her approach, and tremble as
she passes, with an anticipation of such a ride for
themselves
.
Could upbraiding conscience come more fearfully
than in this Black Maria's shape, or could the
sleeping
sinner have compunctious visitings more terrible than
the dream in which he imagines himself handed into this
penitential omnibus, as an atonement for past offences?
What, let us ask, can be more appalling than the Black
Maria of a guilty mind?
It is a matter of regret that history must be the work
of human handsthat the quill must be driven to
preserve
a record of the past, and that inanimate objects
cold, passionless, and impartial witnessesare not gifted
with memory and speech. Much has been donea long
array of successive centuries have fidgeted and fumed;
but, after all, it is little we know of the action of those
who have gone before. But if a jacket now were
capable
of talk, then there would be biography in earnest.
We would all have our Boswells, better Boswells than
Johnson's Boswell. A dilapidated coat might be the
most venerable and impressive of moralists. Much could
it recount of frailty, and the results of frailty, in those
who have worn it; furnishing sermons more potent than
the polished compositions of the closet. Could each
house narrate what it has known of every occupant,
human nature might be more thoroughly understood than
it is at present. What beacons might not every
apartment
set up, to warn us from the folly which made
ship-wreck
of our predecessors! Even the mirror, while
flattering vanity, could tell, an it would, how beauty,
grown wild with its own excess, fell into premature
decay. Ho! ho! how the old goblet would ring, as we
drain the sparkling draught, to think of the many such
scenes of roaring jollity it has witnessed, and of the
multitude
of just such jovial fellows as are now carousing,
it has sent to rest before their time, under the pretence of
making them merry! Wine, ho! let the bottle speak.
Your bottle has its experiencesa decanter has seen the
world. Thou tattered robeonce fine, but now
decayed
nobility
in ruinshow sourly thou smilest to
discourse
of the fall from drawing-rooms to pawn-brokers'
recesses. What a history is thinefeeble art thouvery
thin and threadbare; still thou hast seen more of
weakness
,
ay, in men and women too, than is now displayed
in thine own ruin. Yea, cobble those boots for sooterkin
they are agape, indeed; yet were once thought fit
ornaments
for the foot of fashion. Leathern patchwork,
thou hast been in strange places in thy time, or we are
much mistaken. Come, thy many mouths are open, and
thy complexion scarce admits of blushingtell us about
thy furtive wanderings.
Let then this Black Maria wag her tonguefor
tongue she has, and something of the longestand she
would chatter fast enough, I warrant me. Let us regard
her as a magazine of memoirsa whole library of
personal
detail, and as her prisoners descend the steps, let
us gather a leaf or two.
Here comes onea womantraces of comeliness still
linger even amid the more enduring marks of sin, poverty,
and sorrow. Her story has been told before, in thousands
of instances, and it will be told again and again and again.
There is not much that is new in the downward career of
those who fall. It is an old routine. Giddiness, folly, and
deception, it may be, at the outsetremorse, misery,
and early death, at the close. Yes, yesthe old father
was humble in his ploddingsthe mother had no
aspirings
above her sphere; but she who now is weeping bitter
tears, she longed for silks and satins and gay company.
It was but a cracked and crooked looking-glass that told
her she was beautiful, but its pleasing tale was easily
believed
for
perfumed youths endorsed its truth, and
whispered
Fanny that she was worthy of a higher lot than that
of toiling the humble wife of dingy labour. Those secret
meetingsthose long walks by moonlightthose stories
of soft affection, and those brilliant hopes! Day by day
home grew more distastefulits recurring cares more
wearyingthe slightest rebuke more harsh, and Fanny
fled. That home is desolate now. The old father is
dead, the mother dependent upon charity, and the
daughter
is here, the companion of felons, if not a felon herself.
Another!that dogged look, man, scarcely hides the
wretchedness within. You may, if it seems best before
these idle starers, assume the mask of sullen fierceness.
Who cares, is all well enough, indeed, but still the
thought travels back to days of innocence and happiness.
You set out in the pursuit of pleasure and enjoyment, but
it has come to this at last; all your frolickings and
drinkings
your
feastings, your ridings, and your gamblings.
You were trusted once, I hearyour wife and children
were happy around you. But you were not content.
There were chances to grow rich rapidlyto enjoy a
luxurious ease all your life, and to compass these you
were false to your trust. Shame and disgrace ensued;
dissipation environed your footsteps, and more daring vice
soon followed. It is a short step from the doings of the
swindler to the desperate acts of the burglar or the
counterfeiter
.
You, at least, have found it so. Well, glare
sternly about youturn upon the spectators with the
bitter smile of defiance. It will be different anon, in
hopeless solitudethe past strewed with the wreck of
reputationthe future all sterility.
Here is one who had a golden infancy. Where was
there a child more beautiful than he? No wonder his
parents thought no cost too great for his adornment.
Who can be surprised that caresses were lavished upon
the darling, and that his tender years knew no restraint.
But it was a strange return in after time, that he should
break his mother's heartplunder his father, and become
an outcast in the lowest haunts of vice. Were the graces
of Apollo bestowed for such a purpose?
This fellow, now, was destroyed by too much severity.
His childhood was manacled by control. Innocent
pleasures
were deniedhis slightest faults were roundly
punishedthere was no indulgence. He was to be
scourged into a virtuous life, and, therefore, falsehood
and deceit became habitualyes, even before he knew
they were falsehood and deceit; but that knowledge did
not much startle him, when the alternative was a lie or
the lash. Had the cords of authority been slackened a
little, this man might have been saved; but while the
process of whipping into goodness was going on, he paid
a final visit to the treasury and disappeared. Being
acquainted with no other principle of moral government
than that of fear and coercion, he continues to practise
upon it, and helps himself whenever the opportunity
seems to present itself of doing so with no pressing
danger of disagreeable consequences. Mistakes, of
course, are incident to his mode of life. Blunders will
occur, and, in this way, the gentleman has had the
pleasure
of several rides in the Black Maria.
Here is an individual, who was a good fellow,
the prince of good fellowsa most excellent heartso
much heart, indeed, that it filled not only his bosom, but
his head also, leaving scant room for other furniture.
He never said no in his life, and invariably took
advice when it came from the wrong quarter. He was
always so much afraid that people would be offended, if
he happened not to agree with them, that he forgot all
about his own individual responsibility, and seemed to
think that he was an appendage and nothing more.
Dicky Facile, at one time, had a faint consciousness of
the fact, when he had taken wine enough, and would say,
No, I thank you, if requested to mend his draught.
But if it were urged, Pooh! nonsense! a little more
won't hurt you, he would reply, Won't it, indeed?
and recollect nothing from that time till he woke next
day in a fever. Dicky lent John his employer's cash,
because he loved to accommodate; and finally obliged
the same John by imitating his employer's signature,
because John promised to make it all right in good time;
but John was oblivious.
The Black Maria has a voluminous budget,she
could talk all day without pausing to take breath. She
could show how one of her passengers reached his seat
by means of his vocal accomplishments, and went
musically
to destruction, like the swanhow another had such
curly hair that admiration was the death of himhow
another was so fond of being jolly that he never paused
until he became sadhow another loved horses until
they threw him, or had a taste for elevated associations
until he fell by climbinghow easily, in fact, the excess
of a virtue leads into a vice, so that generosity declines
into wastefulness, spirit roughens into brutality, social
tendencies melt into debauchery, and complaisance opens
the road to crime. We are poor creatures all, at the
best, and perhaps it would not be amiss to look into
ourselves a little before we entertain hard thoughts of
those who chance to ride in the Black Maria; for, as
an ex-driver of that respectable caravan used to observe,
there are, I guess, about two sorts of people in this
worldthem that's found out, and them that ain't found
outthem that gets into the `Black Maria,' and them
that don't happen to be cotch'd. People that are
cotch'd, has to ketch it, of course, or else how would
the 'fishal folksme and the judges and the lawyers
yes, and the chaps that make the laws and sell the law
booksmake out to get a livin'? But, on the general
principle, this argufies nothin'. Being cotch'd makes no
great difference, only in the looks of things; and it
happens
often enough, I guess, that the wirchis looking
gentleman
who turns up his nose at folks, when the
constable's
got 'em, is only wirchis because he hasn't been
found out. That's my notion.
And not a bad notion either, most philosophic Swizzle,
only for the fault of your classa little too much of
generalization
.
Your theory, perhaps, is too trenchanttoo
horizontal in its line of division. But it too often happens
that the worst of people are not those who take the air in
the Black Maria.
Still, however, you that dwell in cities, let not this
moral rumble by in vain. Wisdom follows on your
footsteps, drawn by horses. Experience is wagoned
through the streets, and though your temptations be many,
while danger seems afar off, yet the catastrophe of your
aberrations is prophetically before the eye, creaking and
groaning on its four ungainly wheels. The very whip
cracks a warning, and the whole vehicle displays itself
as a travelling caution to all who are prone to sin. It is
good for those who stand, to take heed lest they fall.
But we have an addition here which should be even
more impressive, in these times of stirring emulation.
Take heed, lest in your haste to pluck the flowers of life
without due labour in the field, you chance to encounter,
not a fall alone, but such a ride as it has been our
endeavour
to describea ride in the Black Maria.
4
SLYDER DOWNEHYLLE.
A SEARCH AFTER HAPPINESS.
How happy I'll be to-morrow! exclaimed little
Slyder
Downehylle, in anticipation of Christmas; oh, how
happy I shall be to-morrow!
Couldn't you contrive to be happy a little now?
replied Uncle John, who had learned somewhat to
distrust
anticipation and its gorgeous promises.
Happy now, Uncle John! retorted little Slyder
Downehylle, rather contemptuously, happy now!what
with, I should like to knowwhat shall I be happy with
now? Where's the candy, the cakes, the pies
where is the hobby-horse that somebody's going to give
meand all the Christmas gifts? How I wish
to-morrow
had comewhat a long daywhat a long evening
what a great while I've got to sleep!
Little Slyder Downehylle became quite cross, and
Uncle John whistled. Twenty-four hours afterwards, little
Slyder Downehylle was still more crosshe had been
happy with candy, with cakes and with pies, until he
was very uncomfortable indeed; he had been happy with
toys, until he had quarrelled with his little companions
and strewed the room with broken playthings; he had
been happy with his hobby-horse, until he got a fall.
Oh, what a stupid day! said little Slyder
Downehylle
,
I wish to-morrow would comeI'll be so happy
at Aunt Betsy's.
It is unnecessary to intrude at Aunt Betsy's, for the
events there were of a character strongly resembling what
had already occurred. Little Slyder Downehylle went
to bed in tears.
It was always so with the unfortunate Slyder
Downehylle
.
Throughout life, he wanted something to be
happy with; and strangely enough, it universally occurred
that when he had obtained the thing, it did not prove to
be exactly the thing he wanted. His expectations were
never realized, and he was, therefore, constantly in a state
of disappointment. Unlucky Slyder Downehylle! It
was deplorable too that such should be the case, for Slyder
Downehylle was anxious to be happyhe was always
looking forward to be happyfor something to be happy
with. He never got up in the morning but that it was
his resolve to be happy in the afternoonand, if not
successful
in accomplishing his purpose at that time, he
endeavoured
,
as far as possible, to retrieve the failure by
forming
a similar determination for the evening. No one ever
had a greater variety of schemes for living happyvery
happythan he; for living happy next week, for living
happy next month, or next year; but it appeared to him
that a malignant fate was sure to interfere, in order that
his projects might be frustrated. At school, he was
always thinking how happy he would be on Saturday
afternoon; but then sometimes it rained on Saturday
afternoon, or his companions would not do as he wished
them to do on Saturday afternoon, or it may be that,
although he had toiled hard for pleasure on Saturday
afternoon
,
and the toil for pleasure is often the severest of
work, he returned home weary, dispirited, and out of
temper. Of course, it was unavoidable that his pleasure
should be postponed until some other Saturday afternoon.
And it was even so with the larger holidays. They
never were exactly what they ought to have beenwhat
they promised to bewhat they seemed to be, when
viewed from a distance. If Slyder Downehylle went
afishing
,
why a treacherous bank would often give way,
and thenpray, who can possibly be happy when
dripping
wet, with his clothes on? Nobody but poodles.
What felicity is there in losing one's shoe in a swamp?
Who is perfectly happy when scouring across the plain,
like swift Camilla, with old Jenkins' big dogthat
dog always bitesrustic dogs dofollowing close at his
heels, widely opening a mouth which shows no need
of the dentist? Then, if Slyder Downehylle went
skating
,
it not unfrequently happened that he cried with cold,
what a strange arrangement it is not to have the best
of skating on the warmest days! At other seasons, there
was the sun. It never rains but it pours, in this world.
Is it happiness, think ye, to have one's dear little nose
incipient Roman, or determined pug, as the case may
beall of a blister, and to have one's delectable
countenance
as red and as hot as a scarlet fever? There's
lime in the sackinvariably, in Slyder Downehylle's
sackit would be easy to make mortar of it.
The young Downehylle, finding that happiness eluded
his grasp while a boy, made sure of throwing a noose
over its head when he should be a man. What on earth
is there to prevent a man's being happy, if he chooses
especially if a man has money, as was the case in the
present instance, Uncle John and Aunt Betsy both being
gathered to their fathers and mothers. May not a man
do as he pleases?go to bed when he pleases, and get
up when he pleases?eat what he pleases and drink
what he pleases? A man is not compelled to learn
lessons
.
All his afternoons are Saturday afternoonshis
holidays last all the year round. Who would not be a
man? Oh, when I am a man! said Slyder
Downehylle
.
I wish I was a man! exclaimed Slyder
Downehylle
.
I want to be a man! cried Slyder Downehylle,
with impatience.
Sooner or later, at least in the eye of the law, most
boys become men, in despite of remonstrance. These
boys are remarkable for an upstart tendency, and the
Downehylles themselves are not exempt from the
peculiarity
.
So Slyder Downehylle was a man at last, though,
on the whole, it must be confessed that he did not derive
the satisfaction from it that he had been led to expect.
Slyder Downehylle was extended at full length upon
a sofa.
I say, Spifflikens, what shall I be at? I'm
twenty-one
I've
got plenty of moneyI'm as tired as thunder
alreadywhat shall I be at, Spifflikens?
Lend me a hundred, and buy yourself a buggy,
why don't you get a buggy, to begin with?
Yes, Spifflikens, I will. You're rightthe
Downehylles
were always great on buggies, you know,
Spifflikens
.
It was Slyder Downehylle's theory, after this
conversation
for
he often theorizedthat happiness was, to
some degree, vehicular; that, like respectability, it was
to be found in a gig, if it were to be found anywhere.
He, therefore, bought him a sulky and a fast trottera
mile in two minutes or thereabouts. What could escape
a man who followed so rapidly? If you wish to be
successful
in the pursuit of happiness, do not forget to buy a
sulkythere's nothing like a sulky.
Aha!that's it! muttered Slyder Downehylle, as he
tugged at the reins, and went whizzing along the
turnpike
in a cloud of dust, passing every thing on the road,
and carrying consternation among the pigs, the ducks,
and the chickens.
Slyder thought that this was it for several
consecutive
days; but as the novelty wore offthere's the rub
(that Hamlet was rather a sensible fellowdid he too
keep a fast trotter?)Slyder was not so sure whether
it was the thing exactly, and on the recommendation of
4*
his friend Spifflikens, who borrowed another hundred on
the occasion, he endeavoured to improve it a little by
drinking champagne and playing billiards at the
Cottage
.
Fast trotters and champagnefast trotters and
billiards harmonize very well. Under this combination,
Slyder appeared to think that it was considerably
more like the thing than before. He had found
something
to be happy with, at last, and so had Spifflikens.
It was not, however, so difficult to make Spiffy a happy
man,only allow him to go ahead, and say nothing
about returns. He hates any thing sombreany thing
dun.
Now I'm happy, said Slyder Downehylle, as he
stood on the portico of the Cottage, and saw every eye
fixed with admiration on his establishment, as the boy
led his horse and sulky through the crowd of vehicles.
That's it, at last! and he lighted another cigar and
called for an additional bottle oficed champagne. That's
it, certainly, remarked Spifflikens, at the explosion of
the cork.
Slyder Downehylle was perfectly satisfied that this was
indeed it, for a considerable portion of the afternoon,
and, to tell the truth, when he remounted his buggy,
nodding his head to the bystanders, as he hung his
coat-tails
over the back of the vehicle, he was not a little
elevated.
Therelet him go! said he, tossing a half-dollar to
the hostler's deputy.
Mr. Downehylle's sulky flew like lightning across the
lawn.
Splendid! ejaculated the spectators.
Superiawfine! added Spifflikens.
The dogs barkedthe coloured gentlemen, who
officiated
as waiters, grinned from ear to ear.There was quite
a sensation at the Cottage.
That's it, at last! said Slyder Downehylle,
triumphantly
.
But he forgot that existence, short as it is,
cannot
be crowded all into the exhilarating moment of a
start. Life is not to be distilled and condensed in this
way, though his life seemed to come as near it as
possible
,
on the occasion referred to.
Why are we made ambitious? Why will we
endeavour
to jump over puddles that are too wide, when we
so often miss immortality by no more than a hair's
breadth? But touch and go is the secret of great
enterprises. Slyder Downehylle was struck with a
desire
to sublimate the sublimeto o'ertop old Pelion,
and old Pelion, as it was natural he should, resented the
insult. Downehylle was allowed to touchwe
often do thatbut there was a veto on his go. He
wished to shave the gate-post, in his curricular
enthusiasm
to
astonish the natives with his charioteering skill.
Yet the poplars might have reminded him of Phaeton
of Phaeton's sisters weeping, lank and long.
It certainly was the champagnethat last bottle, so
well iced.
Mr. Downehylle was out in his calculation by about
the sixteenth part of an inch. He was on a lee-shore.
A cloud of splinters went up and came down again.
There is but a Frenchman the more in France, said a
Bourbon on the Restoration. It was also quite evident
that there was a sulky the less in existence. As this
could not be considered the fast trotter's business
he having no further concern with the matter than to do
a certain number of miles in a specific number of
minutes
he,
therefore, went straight on to fulfil his part of
the contract, and it is to be presumed that he was
successful
,
as nothing has been heard from him since.
That's not it, after all, murmured Mr. Slyder
Downehylle
,
as he was carried into the Cottage for surgical aid.
The bystanders, lately so full of admiration,
ungraciously
placed their thumbs upon their noses, and
waggled
their fingers. Greatness always falls when it meets
with an upset.
What could you expect from a fellow that holds his
elbows so, when he drives? was the general remark.
When we are down, every one can see the reason why.
The world is always full of sagacity, after the event.'
Slyder Downehylle is known by the coloured waiters
at the Cottage as the gemplin that got spilt, and he
was so knocked down by the affair that he felt flat at the
slightest allusion to it. He never hunted happiness in a
buggy again, but went slowly home in the omnibus, and,
though it did not enable him to journey very rapidly, he
yet contrived, while in it, to arrive at the conclusion that,
if fast trotters carried others to felicity, the mode of
travel was too rough for him.
He was puzzled. What could be the matter? He
was a man, a man of cashmoney in both pockets; but
yet Slyder Downehylle was not happynot particularly
happy. On the contrary, striking an average, he was,
for the most part, decidedly miserable. He yawned
about all the morning; he was not hungry in the
afternoon
;
he was seldom sleepy at night,vexatious!
There's something I want, thought Slyder
Downehylle
;
but what it isthat's more than I can tell; but
it is something to be happy with. What other people
get for the purpose, that they go grinning about so, hang
me if I can discover.
Slyder Downehylle was rather good-looking, about these
timesnot decidedly a love, but well enough; and so,
as nature had been propitious, he struck out in a new line
a very popular linethe hair line. He cultivated
whiskers
,
fringing the base of his countenance; he set up a
moustache; he starred his under lip with an imperial, and
he balanced the superstructure with the classical goatee.
Medusa herself never had more luxuriant curls. When
Slyder Downehylle wanted to find himself, he was obliged
to beat the bushes. He passed half the day with a brush
in his hand, in adjusting his embellishmentsin giving
them the irresistible expression; and the rest of the time
was consumed in carrying them up and down all manner of
streets, and to all sorts of public places. Slyder
Downehylle
was now the envy of the young bloods about town,
and was regarded as a perfect Cupidon by the ladies.
How, indeed, could it be otherwise! Birnam Wood had
come to Dunsinanenot a feature was discernible. Esau
and Orson were shavelings and shavers to Slyder
Downehylle
.
But, notwithstanding the fact that Samson found
strength in his hair, Slyder was not so lucky. A
thickset
hedge cannot keep out ennui. It is true that the
buffalo
and the bison at the menagerie, took Mr. Slyder
Downehylle for a patriarch of the tribe, fresh from the head
waters of the Oregon; yet, after all, Slyder's spirit was
nearly as bald of comfort as the hairless horsethat
unfashionable quadruped. It must be confessed,
however
,
that there were gleams of consolation attendant upon
his bristly condition. The servants at the hotels styled
him mounsheer. How delightful it is to be mistaken
for what you are not! People thought he talked pretty
good English, considerin', and, best of all, the little
boys ran backwards that they might look with wonder at
his face, while the smaller children went screaming into
the house to call their mammas to see the funny thing.
But false is the light on glory's plume; and it is no
less false on glory's hair. Even the excitement of such
enviable distinction as this soon wears away, and it may
be questioned whether, barring the expense of soap, a
furry-faced gentleman is, in the long run, much happier
than the more sober citizen who has so little taste for the
picturesque as to shave several times a week, and who is
neither a foundling of the forest nor a perambulatory
Moses, always among the bulrushes.
Slyder Downehylle, therefore, reinforced his whiskers
by an elaborate care in dress. He was padded into a
model of symmetry; but, although the buckram was
judiciously
placed, he soon ascertained that this was not the
kind of bolstering he wanted. The cotton made him
warm, but it did not make him happynot quite. It
was nothing to be thus, unless one were safely thus.
Slyder Downehylle began to feel small, when his
muscular
developments were hung upon the bed-post. Which
was Slyder, in the mainhe beneath the cover, or that
larger part of him against the wall? He was tired of
packing and unpacking; wearied with being
spectacular
.
It was not exactly kind in Uncle John and Aunt
Betsythough they thought it wasthus to bequeath
their savings to Slyder Downehylle. Their legacy
perplexed
him sadly. He discovered, in a very short time,
that money is not in itselfnotwithstanding the fact that
it is generally known as the one thing needfulthe
material of happiness. But he was clear in his own mind
that it was something to be got with money. Still,
however
,
he could not find itthat something to be happy
withthat cake, that candy, that sugar-ice, that
hobby-horse
.
When his game was run down, why, it was only
a fox after all.
Life's an impositiona humbug, said Slyder
Downehylle, pettishly; I've tried much of the fun that's
said to be in it, and I'm beginning to have an idea it's a
confounded stupid piece of business, when a man has
seen it pretty much all through, like a farce at the
theatre
.
I'm sure I don't know what to be at next. There's
a man to be hung to-morrow; but I've seen two or three
fellows hung, and they do it just alike. The fun is soon
got out of that. Then there's to be a fight somewhere
this afternoon; but what's a fight, or a race, or any thing,
in short? A spree is to come off to-night at
Crinkumcrankum's
;
but I suppose every thing's to travel down
our throats in the old waybotheration!
You should go it, remarked Spifflikens, go it
strongthat's the way to scatter the blue devils: go it
strong; and, as the poet judiciously remarks, `go it while
you're young.' That's the timelend me fifty, and I'll
show you a thing or twothere are several things to be
seen yet, by individuals who don't wear spectacles. This
is good brandy, Slyderprime brandywhere did it
come from? Have you got any more? Brandy's
wholesome
.
It agrees with almost everybody.
This postulate is not exactly so self-evident as Mr.
Spifflikens thought it to be; but while it is not clearly
proved that brandy agrees with everybody, yet it was
plain enough that Spifflikens agreed with it, and Slyder
Downehylle began likewise to have a slight agreement
with that adjective, both in number and person.
He followed the advice of Spifflikens. No one knew
the world better than Spifflikens, and, therefore,
Spifflikens
must, of course, be right,so Slyder Downehylle
became convivial. He slept by day and he frolicked by
night. If this was not the long-sought it, where could
it be. Slyder Downehylle was merryexceeding
jocose. He was sometimes turned out of three theatres
in one eveninghe had fought in a ball-roomhad
thrashed several watchmenhad been honoured with
private hearings by the magistracy, and had been
more than once almost beaten to a jelly. Slyder
Downehylle
earned the right and title to be known as a spirited
youth, and so he was, generally. But, by dint of
repetition
,
the blue began to disappear from this plum also
the peach was no longer downy. If it had not been for
the peach-brandy, what would have become of Slyder
Downehylle? It was not, indeed, perfect blissSlyder
was subject to headache in the earlier part of the day
but it was as nearly something to be happy with, as
he had yet been enabled to discover.
It was a hard case, view it as you will. Mr. Slyder
Downehylle wanted to be happyhe had the greatest
disposition to be happy. He had tried every possible
experiment
in that direction that either he or Spifflikens
could suggest; but yet he was a dejected man, even
when tipsy twice a day. He could find no delight that
was of a substantial characternothing to which he could
constantly recur without fear of disappointment and
disgust
nothing
that would wear all the week through and
be the same to-day, to-morrow, and the day after that.
It was in vain that he intermingled his pleasurestook
them in alternationover-eat himself in the morning and
over-drank himself in the evening, or reversed the
process
,
turning the bill of fare upside down. It came all
to the same thing in the end. There must be something
wrongwhy could not Slyder Downehylle be happy?
Who laboured harder to boil down common-place and to
extract from it the essence of felicityto concentrate the
soup of life, and to elicit essentials from their insipid
dilution?
A man laughed in the play-houselaughed several
times. What right had he to laugh in that side-shaking
manner? Slyder Downehylle could not laughhe saw
no particular joke that required it; but the man laughed
again, and when Slyder requested him not to make a fool
of himself, the man pulled Slyder's nose. Hope
deferred
engenders fierceness. Slyder quarrelled with the
man about making so free with another person's nose, as
if it were a bell-pull or a knocker. A nose is not much,
to be suremany noses are notbut when a nose is
constituted
a point of honour, it expands to the dimensions
of a geographical promontoryit is peninsularit is an
independent territory, over which no one can be allowed to
march, much less to make settlements upon it. Slyder
Downehylle resolved to stand by his nose, and so he
stood up to it, and a duel was the consequencea duel,
according to the barbarian custom of modern times, which
was fought before breakfast. Who can be surprised that
there is so much bad shooting extant on these interesting
occasions? A gentleman, no matter how much of a
gentleman
he may be in proper hours, cannot reasonably be
expected to be altogether a gentlemanaltogether
himself
at
such an uncivilized time of day. A man may
be valiant enough after nine o'clockwhen he has had
his coffee and muffinshe may be able to face a battery
in the forenoon, and ready to lead a forlorn hope when he
has dined comfortably; but to ask one to get up to be
shot at, in the gray of the morningin the midst of fogs
and all sorts of chilly discomfort, his boots and his
trowsers
draggled with dew, and himself unsustained by a
breakfast, why the whole thing is preposterous. No man
can be valiant unless he is warm, and, as no man can be
warm without his breakfast, it is a demonstrated fact that
breakfast is itself valor, and that one may be frightened
before breakfast, without the slightest disparagement to
his character for courage. Master Barnardine was right
when he refused to get up early to go to the gallows.
There is a time for all things. But Slyder Downehylle
was not more alarmed than was natural and propernot
more, probably, than his antagonist. How do they
come on? said the surgeon to Goliah Bluff, who acted
as Slyder's second. The fourth shot had been
interchanged
and no blood drawn. As well as could be
expected, replied Goliah; they are approximating
5
the seconds don't have to dodge now, and the principals
are not so likely as they were to shoot off their own toes.
Practice makes perfect. Gentlemen, are you ready?
one, two, three!bang!bang!The man had winged
Slyder, and both were gladthe one that it was safely
over, so far as he was concerned, and the other that the
affair was finished and no worse, so far as he was
concerned
.
Further approximations might have been
dangerous
.
But the result was a downright flying in the
face of poetical justice, owing, no doubt, to the fact that
poetical justice wisely lies abed till the last bell rings.
But then, as Goliah Bluff announced to the parties
belligerent
,
Slyder Downehylle was satisfied, and who
else had a right to complain? His nose was the feature
most interested, and it said nothing, as nobody knows
onfor it was now a nose which, when regarded in its
metaphysical and honourable aspect, notwithstanding its
rubid tints, had not a stain upon its escutcheon. The
bullet in its master's shoulder had been soapsuds to its
reputation, and the duel had been brickdust to the lustre
of its glory. Slyder Downehylle's nose actually shone
again, brighter than ever. His arm, indeed, was in a
slingthe same arm that had conveyed so many slings
into him, to support him, comfort him, and keep him up;
but his nose was self-sustained; it had been proved to be
a feature not to be handled with impunity. But what are
noses, after allwhat are noses in the abstractnoses
individually
considered? Slyder, in the end, did not care
much who pulled his nose, so they did it gently.
He was engaged in solving a great moral problem.
He left the longitude and the squaring of the circle to
intellects of an inferior order. It was for him to
determine
whether it was possible to live upon the principal
of one's health and capacities for enjoyment, without
being restricted to such beggarly returns as the mere
interest
thereof. As for contentthe being happy with
one's self, as Uncle John expressed itthis was a very
flat sort of happiness in Slyder Downehylle's estimation,
if, indeed, he ever placed it in that category at all. It
was by no means strong enough for the purpose. Happy
upon water! I'll trouble you for that pale brandy,
said Slyder Downehylle. He desired that his existence
should be one vast bowl of champagne punchan
everlasting mince-pieterrapins and turtle soup
glaciers
of ice-cream and cataracts of cognac, sunned by
frolic and fanned by the breeze of excitement,a
perpetual
spree. There were to be no shady sides of
the way in his resplendent world.How many practical
philosophers have failed in the same pursuit! Is the
aurum potabile
never to be discovered? Are we always
to come down to the plain reality, at last? Downehylle
could not endure the thought. More cayenne, if you
please.
Have you ever tried faro? whispered Spifflikens;
there's considerable fun at faro, when you are up
to it.
Spifflikens passed the bottle. Slyder Downehylle had
never tried faro, but he did try it, and thought that he
rather liked it. In short, it improved upon acquaintance.
At length, he had reached the
ultima Thule
. The
something
to be happy with had, to all appearance, been
found. Redheiffer was but a goose. He knew not
where to look for the perpetual motionthe everlast
ing jog to the flagging spirit. But the top of our speed
brings the end of the race. He who moves most rapidly,
is the soonest at the close of his career. Faro is fickle,
and Slyder Downehylle, in his zeal to pile enjoyment
upon enjoymentto be happy, if possible, with several
things at a timehad unluckily a habit of not taking
even his faro plain; he needed syrup also in that
effervescing
draught, and, as his head became warm, the
cool amounts in his pockets melted away.
Slyder Downehylle was a cashless manhis researches
after felicity had not only proved unsuccessful, but had
left him without the means of future progression. He
was bemired, half-wayswamped, as it were, in sight
of port. Even Spifflikens cut him dead. The tailors
desired no more of his customhis apartments at the
hotel were wanted. The credit system was out of
fashion. Financiering had been clipped in its wings.
How doleful looks the candle when capped with an
extinguisher
!The
wounded squirrel drops from limb to
limb. The world has many wounded squirrels, besides
those that crack nuts to earn a living. Just such a
squirrel was Slyder Downehylle, compelled, before he
reached the top of his aspiring hopes, to abandon every
step that he had so toilfully surmounted.
How he now obtained any thing to eat, is not exactly
known. His mode of obtaining something to drink, is,
if not original, certainly ingenious. He never goes to the
pump, having no taste for hydraulics. Nor does he find
water with a hazel twig. He has a more effective twig
than that. He lounges in bar-rooms, and, as his old
acquaintances, searchers after happiness not yet brought
up with a round turn, go there to drinka dry
bar is a sad impediment to navigationit is
astonishing
how very solicitous he becomes in reference to their
health.
How do you do, Mr. Jones? I've not had the
pleasure
of seeing you for a long time. How have you
been?
Pretty well, Downehylle, pretty wellbut excuse
meBibo and I are going to try something.
Why, ahthank youI don't care much if I do join.
The pale brandyyesthat will answer, would be
Slyder
Downehylle's response under such circumstances,
from which it is apparent that misfortune had somewhat
impaired his sense of hearing.
Slyder Downehylle is supposed to be yet about town,
looking earnestly for his undiscovered happiness. The
last time he was seen by credible witnesses, they noted
him busily employed in playing All Fours, in front of
John Gin's hostelrya game probably selected as
emblematic
of his now creeping condition. He lounges no
more in fashionable resorts. Champagne punch is a
mere reminiscence. His Havanas are converted into
long nines, and his bibulations are at two cents a glass,
making up in piperine pungency what they lack in
delicacy
of flavour. He is sadly emaciated, and, in all
respects
,
considerably the worse for wear, while a hollow
cough indicates that his physical capabilities have proved
inadequate to the requirements of his method of
employing
life, and are fast dropping to pieces. Slyder
Downehylle
is consequently more melancholy than ever. He is
troubled with doubts. Perhaps he may have proceeded
upon an errorperhaps the principle, the high pressure
principle, of his action was not the right one. It may be
that excitement is not happinessthat our pleasures are
fleeting in proportion to their intensitythat, indeed, if
life be a feast, the amount of satisfaction to be derived
from it is rather diminished than increased by
swallowing
the viands hastily, and by having a free recourse to
condiments, and that a physical economy is as wise and
as necessary to well-being as economy of any other kind.
He is almost led to suppose that his something to be
happy with is a fallacy; he never could hold it within
5*
his grasp, and he inclines to the belief that a man
probably
does well to have a home in himself, that he may not
always be compelled to run abroad for recreation, or to
appeal to his senses to give vivacity to the hour. If it
were his luck to begin again, perhaps he might try the
tack thus indicated. But that hollow cough!Our
experiences
oft reach their climax too late; yet others may
learn from the example of Slyder Downehylle.
HIGHDAYS AND HOLIDAYS.
A CHRISTMAS FANCY, AND A NEW-YEAR'S THOUGHT.
Undoubtedly
we never meant to deny it
anniversaries
are pleasant enough, in their way. It is true,
perhaps
,
that if our wishes could have an effect in the
matter
,
we might rather desire them not to come quite so
rapidly as they do of late, thus huddling on each other as
if the space between had undergone abridgment, and as
if years, like ourselves, as they grow older, are liable to
shrinkage. There is no audible call for despatch in this
particular, and thus to mount the months upon a
locomotive
,
to sweep by in such undignified haste that they
are gone almost before we are able to avail ourselves of
their services,which every one must have observed to
be peculiarly the case since steam became the fashion and
hurry the order of the day,is annoying to people of
leisurely habits, who like to deliberate before they act,
and to consider consequences in advance of the deed,
instead of afterwards, according to modern usages. To
our fancy, the slow yearthe year in hoop, powder and
bucklesin full decorum and expansionwas a much
more respectable personage than such years as we have
now; years which have changed the minuet measure of
their ancestors for a hop, step and jump, not to be set
down as otherwise than an abomination. We hate to be
jostled and pushed from our propriety, and though it is
admitted to be true that here to-day and gone
to-morrow
is symbolical of human existence, this incessant
bustle of preparation causes an absorption of the day in
the morrow. There is no to-dayscarcely the
fragment
of an afternoon; nothing but beginnings and
endings
,
without an intervening pause for thought.
Still, however, as you sayas all the world says
these anniversaries are pleasant things; not emphatically
pleasant, but pleasant, with no particular stress upon the
word. They will intrude into our company, you know,
without ceremonious observances. It is not easy to shut
the door in the face of old time, nor is it of avail to reply
not at home, to the New Year; and, in emergencies
of this kind, when there is no help, we cannot probably
do better than to insist upon it, downrightto ourselves
and to other people of less importance, that the inevitable
visitant is under our patronage, and has agreeable points
about him. Marvels are to be accomplished in regard
to such convictions, by dint of perseverance. Resolve
upon it that you shall think so, and you will think so,
sooner or later. Only want to think so, and the object is
more than half achieved. We are very docile to
ourselves
,
and in an internal dispute, inclination is so fertile
in argument that it becomes useless to talk. The fair
lady at last confessed that John Wilkes had a squintthe
aberration from the true line was too evident to be
deniedbut then, she had prevailed on herself to admire
even his defects, and she qualified her unwilling
admission
by declaring that, to her view, Mr. Wilkes did not
squint more than a gentleman should. And so, these
anniversaries are pleasant things. There is a little of a
sinister expression in their aspect, no doubtfather
Saturn
is charged with a disposition to devour his children
but we will set it down as a peculiarity which is rather
attractive
than otherwiseromantic interest, such as that
which envelopes gentlemen of the suspicious look, who
combine the bully and the beau in so just an equipoise,
that they command success and enforce admiration.
No one pretends to assert, at least, that it is not a
source of pleasure to meet with friends, on a festive
occasion
provided
always that we have friends and possess
a fondness for festivities. To give and to receive tokens
of love and amity, affords refreshment to the spirit. The
heart is cheered by smiling faces and the voice of joy,
and it is not to be disputed that dining well is a
circumstance
by no means repugnant to the ordinary constitution
of human naturenot repugnant at the moment, though
sometimes apt to entail remorseful reminiscences. There
is a period also, in our terrestrial career, when the dance
comes not amiss, even if we should chance to feel a little
dull upon it, when the next day's sun peeps in at us; and,
indeed, it may be conceded that all the incidents of the
holiday season and anniversary returnvery nearly all
are decidedly pleasantbright to anticipate, happy in
fruition, and well enough in the retrospect. Let us, then,
look gayly on the approach of the happy New Year,
when we rejoice by tradition, and take up the echo of
old time, that it may reverberate to posterity. Our
merry-makings
now, are the connecting link between the past
and the future.
We are told, moreover, that it is not the part of true
wisdom to be strict in the analysis of our pleasures, and
that he is more of a simpleton than a philosopher, who
stops in the midst of his mirth to ascertain, by critical
inquiry
,
whether, after all, there be any thing to laugh at.
And, in fact, if it is our purpose to extract from life as
many agreeable sensations as it is capable of affording,
we must content ourselves with being entertained, and
not insist too strenuously that the cause shall be in strict
proportion to the effect. Nor can it be regarded as
altogether
a matter of sagacity to, pass much time in
endeavouring
to discover what we have to be unhappy about
to-day. There are annoyances enough, of the unavoidable
and intrusive sortvexations which will, of their own
impulse, be in attendance, independent of a call
without
a recourse to the muster-roll of grievance, to select a
pet sorrow as our special companion. And to search for
a discomfort, merely to bring it in action as a means of
self-disturbance, may be courageous, but it is, for the
most part, an unprofitable exhibition of valour. There is
abundant room for the exercise of the passive virtues,
without this continued practice upon our fortitude.
Nevertheless, there are occasions when fevers of this
peculiar
type have their advantages; and when, from
unknown
causes, be they moral or physical, a diffused
irascibility pervades the individualwhen we go to rest
in gloom and arise in sulkinessit is a wholesome
operation
that the disorder should be localized, and that some
particular point should be presented, no matter what, on
which the pent-up fury may have vent. For example,
if a gentleman, in the morning, should chance to be
overheard
in addressing harsh and uncivil words to his
slippers
,
and in speaking with unkindness and disrespect to
his boots, those with whom he is likely to come in
contact
at subsequent hours, have reason to rejoice that the
superfluous electricity with which he was troubled, has
wreaked itself upon inanimate objects. A living creature
has, in all likelihood, had a fortunate escape. The
slipper
anticipates a contentiona boot may have frustrated
a duel, and deprived surgery of a subject. Should my
lady apostrophize the unlucky broom, which careless
hands have left upon the stair, or should she, in sparkling
monologue, comment on other oversights in housewifery,
which meet her early eye, do not repine at wasted energy,
or at eloquence scattered to the unheeding air. It is a
mercy, though you think it not, and power remains for
all needful purposes. Occurrences of this description are.
however, but exceptions to the comprehensive rule, and
are not to be elevated to the station of a general example.
They are not to be pleaded, certainly, as a justification of
undiscriminating cynicism, or as palliating the propensity
to seek for faults and to spy out defects.
But yet, as concerns holidays in generalas involves
the merits of New Year's days and birth-days in
particular
we
are little disposed to be captious and
hypercritical
but
still it must be acknowledged, with all due
deference to sounder judgment and more enlarged
experience
,
that when they are regarded apart from their
fineries, and the sophistication is dispensed withwhen
they lay aside hat, cloak and feathersthe comeliness, as
in other instances not lying under present notice,
measurably
disappears, and as they sit down with us quietly
by the fireside, it would be difficult perhaps
conscientiously
to assert, that the sensation is that of unmixed
delight, or that the satisfaction would have been much
less had their coming been delayed somewhatnot from
a dearth of hospitalitynot that we are altogether averse
to this stranger presence; but from a vague impression
that we are not fully prepared for such distinguished
company
,
and would like to be a little more economical in
joys of this descriptionnot quite so many birth-days,
and a thought less, if we may so express it, of the New
Year. Let children be impatientwe can wait well
enough; and though it be an axiom that time is money,
we care not thus to exercise our arithmetic in its
computation
like
Hamlet, we are ill at these numbers.
The observant eye may have noted, too, that with its
increase
of chronological wealth, the world grows miserly
in the accumulation of its anniversary amountsthat it
hides them, as it were, in unnoticed crannies and
disregarded
chinks, and that, as the sum grows larger, it
shrinks from every allusion to its doubtful riches, as if
there were robbers here, to steal our years away.
Nor can it have escaped intelligent remark, that there are
those among usrespectable people, not incompetent to
a gig, if, indeed, they may not justly aspire to a pair of
horsespersons not to be suspected, under ordinary
circumstances
,
of a bias towards larceny, who do not scruple
to plunder themselves or their historical position, and who,
since it would be a work beyond their powers to suppress
the First of January outright, nathless do contrive to wink
strangely when the day that gave them birth rolls by, as
if they had forgotten its distinctive features, and felt no
gratitude for the favour it conferred, in the far distant
past.
Since such facts are facts, not to be controverted, how
happens it that at these moments, a really reluctant
people
are called upon to rejoice, in assumed jollity and
forced smiles? Is it done to drive away care, or is it,
after all, a jokean invocation to merriment and
convivialities
we
address the question to the common sense
of everybodyis it a jokewe mean, a very good joke
a joke to make us frisk, and give us a spasmodic twinge
in the sideto peep into the mirror, and to count upon
the cheek and brow, the additional flourishes of Time's
villanously crampt penmanship? We speak not in
regard
to connoisseurship or dilletanteism; but are you, in
your heart, fond of the study of these ungraceful
hieroglyphics
?
Would you not prefer engrossments on other
parchment? A majestic brow is admirable in a statue,
a fine phrenology may be a letter of recommendation; but
it is yet to be made manifest that musings upon a wig,
or meditations about the approaching necessity for a
scratch, ever provoked a smile in him who was
compelled
to entertain them. Lear thought it flatterybut
he was singular in his opinionto be told that his beard
was white; and it would perhaps move surprise, if there
were an issue of invitations to celebrate the arrival of
gray hairs. There are methods to create hunger when
the appetite is disposed to sleep; but why it should
render
us eager for comfits and confections, because another
round has been completedbecause, though the jubilant
be a year older, he is scarce a minute wisernearer the
end of his career, yet not a penny richeras full of sin
and folly as before, but with much less time for
repentance
and amendment,would puzzle Abernethy himself
to explain.There is, besides, a sad waste of gunpowder,
and the loud rattle of fire-arms, hereabouts, and it may be
appropriate to let off a blunderbuss as the old year
expires
.
There are instances, no doubt, in which that
weapon would be characteristic.
Look ye, too, where comes the forgotten tailor, the
neglected hatter, the unsought shoemaker, with a long
line of others who have administered to your
convenience
see
them approach, not perhaps having fire in
each eye, but certainly with paper in each hand, to
bring you to a settlementa winding up of old affairs,
preliminary to a new onset. Do you find that funny,
friendheedless, thoughtless, perhaps cashless, friend?
Now, you perceive the moral of the matternow, you
obtain a glimpse of the special mission of this holiday;
and the pecuniary settlement to which the time is subject,
is but a type of the more impressive settlement which the
recurrence of the day should impose upon us. If that be
well performed, then, indeed, have we reason to rejoice.
It has struck you often, in moments of calmness and
reflectionafter disappointments and in griefin those
minutes when the flush of enjoyment had faded to a
sombre hue, and self-estimation had proportionably
subsided
that
there were changes in your own character and
disposition which might be made to advantage. It would
have been resented, if another had said as much; for you
then thought, and still think, it may be mistakenly, that
these defects are only apparent in full to their owner.
Still, however, the amelioration was resolved upon. At
6
first, it was to begin now. Then came cares and
pleasures; a little postponement was granted, and this
great work, if we are not in error, lies in the dusty
corners of your determination, quite unfinished. Could
you not take it up to-day?A more fitting time is not
likely to present itself.
Somebody has frequently promisedbut, after the
cautious fashion of Sir Giles Overreach, we name no
partieshas promised very distinctly to himselfand
there is no one with whom it would be more to his
advantage
to keep faiththat the New Year shall find him,
in many respects, a new man. Do you know such a
persona friend, a brother, a lover or a husband, who
has done this, in the view of evil habit, of indolence, of
ill temper, of any of the thousands of temptations and of
faults which beset the human family? Strengthen his
will; give encouragement to his weakness. He may
chance to need it.
And then, it may not be too much to assume that, perfect
as we are, there is no want of certain pestilent imps, who
find places in our train, and are ever on the alert for
mischief
,saucy
companions, of whom we would gladly be
rid, but that they take us by surprise, and await not the
chastisements of our regretlittle petulances, which at
times prompt us to wound those who love us bestsmall
discontents, which seek expression in embittered words
unrecognised envies, which lacerate the heart and
disturb
repose, leading to uncharitable thoughts, and
unkindly
judgmentspetty jealousies, have we not,
rendering
us unreasonable, querulous, and ill at ease? Such
restless spirits swarm the air, causing endless
complications
of annoyance. Let them, this day, be summoned
to your footstool, to meet discharge, and, above all things,
let us impress it on your mind to scan their faces closely.
They are adroit at a disguise, and often elude the most
careful watch; so that we know them not but in their
effects, and by the sorrows they are apt to leave
behind
.
If such be our policy, as the substratum of our
merriment
,
and the undercurrent to our mirth, and if we can
find nerve enough to accomplish but a part of what is
deemed desirable,if each New Year is thus assured of
meeting with us so much wiser, and therefore happier
for wisdom is but happiness, after all,than any of its
predecessors, we shall better brook the loss of brittle
youth, and meet the onward tide of time with buoyant
hearts and an unshrinking hopesatisfied with the
present
,
and with no terrors for the future.
THE NEWS-BOY.
Arms
have had their day. The age of steel is past.
The thunders of Mont St. Jean formed the grand finale
to the melo-drama of military exploit, and the curtain fell,
never to rise again, upon the last scene of martial
greatness
,
when the laurelled warriors of France cast aside the
baton of command to have recourse to their spurs.
Bellona
then went to boarding-school, and learned to comb
her refractory locks into the pliant graces of the toilet,
while Mars obtained a situation in a counting-house, and
seated upon a three-legged stool, still nibs his pen to gain
a livelihood. Romance expired at Waterloo. Chivalry
expended itself when Ney was foiled; and the Belgian
peasant unconsciously depicts the moral of the fall of
the empire when he boils potatoes in the helmet of the
knight, and cooks his mutton in a breastplate of the
Guard. The world is tired of slaughterthe poetry
of the shambles is exhausted. We live as long as we
can now, and find existence none the worse for having a
full supply of arms and legs. A body like a cullender is
not essential to reputation, and death has become so
unpopular
that it is only by special favour that ambition can
get itself hanged.
New elements produce new combinations. When the
musket rusts in a garret, and glory puzzles over the
multiplication
table and retails brown sugar, the restless
impulses
of humanity seek excitements before unknown.
Strategy exhibits itself in the marts of trade. Napoleons
are financiers. The sun of Austerlitz bursts through the
clouds which overhang the stock exchange. Bulls and
bears constitute the contending hosts of modern times,
and there is no analogy to the maraud, unless we find
it in embezzlement and defalcation. We are smart
nowexceeding smart, and pugnacity is thrown to the
dogs. Learning, too, leaves its solidity in the cloister,
and, no longer frighted by trumpets and sulphurous
vapors
,
spreads itself thinly abroad. Being in haste, the
world reads as it runs, so that heavy books, like heavy
artillery, remain in the arsenals. Man, commercial man,
speculating man, financial manman, heedless of gory
greatness, but eager for cash, must know all that is in
agitation. Having ceased to kill his neighbour, he is
anxious to ascertain what his neighbour is about, that he
may turn him and his doings to profitable account; and
hence, in the place of those gaudy banners which used to
flout the sky, instead of the oriflamme of nations, which
once rallied their battalia, we gather round the
newspaper
,
not with sword, and shield, and casque, but with
ink-stained
jacket and with pen in ear. Our clarion now,
more potent than the Fontarabian horn, is the shrill voice
of the news-boy, that modern Minerva, who leaped full
blown from the o'erfraught head of journalism; and, as the
news-boy is in some respects the type of the timean
incarnation
of the spirit of the day,a few words devoted
to his consideration may not be deemed amiss.
As the true Corinthian metal was formed from the
meltings of the devoted city, thus the news-boy is the
product of the exigencies of the era. The requirements
of the age always bring forth that which is wanted. The
dragon teeth of tyranny have often caused the earth to
crop with armed men, and the nineteenth century,
thirsting
for information and excitement, finds its Ganymede
in the news-boy. He is its walking idea, its symbol, its
personification. Humanity, in its new shape, is yet young
and full of undefined energies, and so is he. The first
generation of his race not having outgrown their business,
6*
the important part which youth thus trained, is destined
to play in human affairs, is as yet too imperfectly
developed
even for the meditations of the most speculative
philosopher that ever extracted glowing sunbeams from
the refreshing cucumber; but, as nature does nothing in
vain, it is fair to infer that the news-boy is destined,
in one way or another, to fix the period which gave him
birth, in the niche of history. Too many powerful
elements
combine in him not to be productive of grand
results
.
What is the news-boywhat is necessary to his
original constitutionwhat faculties are involved,
cherished
,
strengthened and made, as it were, the
preponderating
forces of his character, by the calling to which
he is devoted? Survey the news-boyextract him from
the buzzing crowd and place him on a pedestal, while
you analyze his character in its psychological and
physical
details, estimating, at the same time, the past and
future operation of circumstances in educating him for
mature effort in the contentions of men. Anatomize him,
and see what breeds about his heart. A rough study,
trulysoiled garments and patches. The youth is not
precisely fitted for presentation in the drawing-room,
evident
though it be that his self-possession would not desert
him in the presence of an empress. Valets and body
servants do not trouble themselves about him. Father
and mother, brother and sister, if such there be, have
enough to do in struggling for their own existence,
without
attending to the details of his costume, and many a
repair is the result of his own handiwork in hours stolen
from needful rest. That battered hat, grown foxy by
exposure
,
is picturesque in its proportions, not so much
from careless usage as from hard service, and those
oxhide
boots, embrowned and cracked, have shamed the
feats of plank-walking pedestrains. Sooth to say, our
hero is somewhat uncouth in his externals. That fair
damsel there would scarcely covet him for a parlour pet.
He would not shine amid carpet knights, nor would
Titania
weary Oberon with prayers to have him for her
henchman. The news-boy would not weep either, if he
were to know that perfumed pride and silken delicacy
thus curl the nose at him; for he would be lost and
wearied
in such preferment. Observe his frame, so light,
yet so strong;so pliant, wiry and enduring. No
debile wretch enters the ranks of these juvenile Pr
torians; or, if he should venture on services so far beyond
his capacity, exhaustion soon removes him. Glance at
the expression of that weather-beaten face, prematurely
channelled into line and hardened into muscle. Care,
courage and resolution are in every curve of those
compacted
lips. The soft roundness of childhood has
departed
long since. That mouth knows more of the strong
word, the keen retort, the well-weighed phrases of the
bargainer, of cunning solicitation, and of the fierce
wrangle, than of the endearing kisses of affection. It
brings no memory of rosebuds. It is no poetic feature
for romance to dwell upon, but a mouth of plain reality
of confirmed utilitarianism. It wreathes itself more
readily into the mould of worldly intrepidity, than into the
gentle dimples of early life. It is, in the news-boy, as in
all mankind beside, a key to the individual mysteries of
our nature. The impulses, the ruling trait, are here
developed
,
and the news-boy offers no exception to the rule.
The glance of his eye is as cold, but as bright, as the
beaming sun of a frosty morning, which sparkles on the
ice, but melts it not. Still, though self-interest and sordid
calculation dwell in its depths, we find a laughing devil
there, which feasts on satire and sports like the chevaliers
of old,
l'outrance
. Its jokes bite shrewdly, and the
lance of its wit displays the point unbated, though not
envenomed. When the news-boy turns awhile from
business to the pleasures of companionship, he asks no
quiet recreation. His raillery and his pleasant tricks
both deal in heavy blows and rude interchanges. Your
nice, nervous sensibility finds no quarter from one whose
very existence in all its phases is roughness. Should he
hereafter learn to woo, it will be as the lion wooes his
bride.
Such is the
physique
of the news-boy, and it contains
many of the constituent points of greatness. Tossed early
into the world, the impediments which cause other men
to fail, are soon surmounted in his path. He has no
kindly arm to lean upon, and, through mistaken
tenderness
,
to make his steps unsteady. He is his own staff
his own protector. Of diffidence, he never heard the
namehe does not know its nature. Imaginary barriers
cannot interpose between him and his object; for he
recognises
none as worthier than he, and self-distrust plays
no fantastic tricks to defeat the consummation of what he
may resolve. He lives in deeds, and not in dreamy
speculationhe is an actor, not a looker on, and practice
has given him that estimate of his own powers which
rarely falls below the mark, and which, best of all,
surrounds
disappointment with no unreal terrors. When he
falls, he falls but to rise again with renewed strength, like
the fabled Antus. And while continued collision with
the world thus hardens his intellectual being, his
muscular
energies, which sustain the spirit, receive a training
of proportionate severity. He has no tender years. Let
wealthy youth be housed in luxury, and guarded from the
storm. Soft couches and protracted slumbers do not
enervate the news-boy. Compared to him, the sun itself
is a sluggard. No morning ray finds him in bed; the
moon and stars witness his uprisings, and he travels forth
in darkness to commence his daily toil. Let the rain fall
in torrentsthe lightning flashthe thunders roar, the
news-boy laughs at the elemental strife. Heat and cold
are alike indifferent to one who has such duties to
perform
.
It is on him that society waits for its mental
aliment
,
and can he faltercan he shrink before winds and
showers, before frosts and heats, who, more truly than
any human being, is the schoolmaster abroad? No
others may crouch around the fire, or shrink beneath their
blankets, at the sound of winter's threatening blasts; but
the news-boy springs up, whistling cheerily, to encounter
any hardship that may oppose him.
Now, it is contended that whole masses and classes of
youth, thus educated, thus trainedwho live, as it were,
by their witsby their boldness, their address, their
perseverance
whose
faculties are always literally at the
grindstonewho daily practise endurance, fortitude,
self-restraint
,
abstinence, and many other virtues; who are
pre-eminently frugal and industrious; who learn to
understand
men and boys, dandies and dandizettes, and are
schooled to emulation and competitionmust of necessity
produce somethingnot a little of roguery, mayhap,
which is often the fungous growth, the untrimmed shoot,
of a certain grade of cleverness. But we look for more
than thisit genius is ever latent, the life of the
news-boy
must bring it forth. The blows which fall on him,
would elicit sparks from the flint. In the school which
boasts of such a pupil, society is the book, adversity the
teacher, and harsh circumstance plays the part of rod
and ferula. He is scourged into wisdom, almost before
others can walk alone.
In what peculiar way, Tom Tibbs, whose admirable
portrait graces our present number, is likely to distinguish
himself, remains to be seen. His faculties are expansive
roaming like summer bees. The moment of
concentration
,
when genius, rallying upon its focus, burns its way
through all impediments, has not yet come to him. But
Tibbs is one of whom expectation may be entertained.
In fact, he has long been spoken of as a hopeful youth,
by many of those who know him; and though the phrase
may often be applied derisively, as a sort of
lucus a non
lucendo
, still this is but the vulgar error, which cannot
comprehend the kittenhood of lionismthe unappreciated
infancy of power. No one ever achieved distinction who
did not begin a nuisance, just as greatness in a
single walk, of necessity constitutes a bore; and it may
be so with Tibbs. He has already learned the one great
lesson of success. He looks upon the community as a
collective trouta universal fish, which must nibble at
his bait, lie in his basket, and fill his frying-pan. On this
maxim, heroes have overrun the world. It has been the
foundation, not only of fortunes, but of empires. Why
should it not elevate Tibbs? Especially as his soul has
not been whittled down to a single point, by the process
of acquiring the knowledge to which we refer. Tibbs
has the affections, the sympathies, the twining tendrils of
the heart, in as great perfection as can be expected in
one who has been taught to look upon downright fact as
the great purpose of existence. The pennies, however,
do not engross him utterly; but when he is in pursuit of
the pennies, that pursuit is made paramount. He takes
his business as Falstaff did his sack, simple, of itself;
and his pleasures are imbibed neat, never spoiling
both by an infusion and admixture of either. That soldier
is a poor sentinel who nods upon his post, and would
both watch and wink upon a tour of duty. The
winkings
of Tibbs are wisely condensed into a continuous
slumber; and when he watches, it is generally found that
his eyes are quite as widely open as the eyes of other
people.
Tom Tibbs had a father, a necessity from which it is
believed the greatest are not exempt, and in Tom's case,
as indeed in many others, it was a hard necessity, from
which it would have pleased him to be excused. Tom's
father was a disciplinarianthat is, he compounded for
his own delinquencies by a compensatory severity upon
the delinquencies of others. When he had made a fool
of himself abroad, he balanced the account and atoned
for the folly, by chastising Tom at home, and thus went
to bed with a cleared conscience and a weary arm. When
he had spent more money upon a recreation than precisely
suited his circumstances, the family were put upon short
commons, and Tom's contingent of shoes and jackets, as
well as those of his brothers and sistersfor he is not
the only scion of Tibbsismwas economically retrenched.
The elder Tibbs piqued himself much upon his paternal
kindness in teaching prudence to his offspring. You'll
bless me for it, said he, with tears in his eyes, as he
prepared to hammer them all round, after having been
fined for wheeling his barrow upon the pavement,
you'll bless me for it the longest day you have to
live. The elder Tibbs was patriarchalhe made the
law as the necessity arose, carrying it into effect
himself
,
and its adaptation to circumstances was wonderful.
Any trouble in solving the equity of the case was instantly
obviated by flogging Tom, and then old Tibbs would
exclaim, My conscience is easyI do my best towards
these naughty childrenmy duty is fulfilledif they
come to bad ends, they can't blame me for it. I have
spared no pains to bring 'em up properly, and he had
not been sparing, so far as the strap was concerned.
Mrs. Tibbs was a tender-hearted woman, who did not
exactly understand parental duties as they were received
by her husband; yet, being somewhat overcrowed by the
commanding spirit of her mate, she sometimes almost
began to think that Tom must indeed be rather a bad boy
to require the neat's leather so often. But Mrs. Tibbs
loved her children, and did her best to console them,
thus preserving a verdant spot in Tom's otherwise arid
heart; for, as his cuticle was hardened, his spirit also grew
callous.
The pressure of the times, however, at last compelled
the Tibbs family to migrate westward; and the father,
when two days out from the city, having become warm
with his own eloquence upon the difficulties of making a
living, called Tom to his side and diverged into a
personal
episode and an individual apostrophe:
It's so hard now to get along in the world, that I
shouldn't wonder, if any thing happened to me, if these
children were to starve. Tom, Tom, how often have I
told you that you'd never come to good! Tom, Tom!
you'll break my heart! Where's that strap? I don't
want to do it, but I must!
Tom, however, could not be prevailed upon to stay
to supper, and escaped, retracing his steps to the city,
and dissolving all connection with the strap. He thought
that he had received quite as much bringing up, in
that respect, as was necessary.
Tom felt his destiny strong within him. He threw
himself into the bosom of the news-boys, and through
their kindness, for they are a kindly race when properly
approached, soon became one of the most distinguished
of the corps. No one can sell more adroitly than he; his
perseverance is mingled with tact, and his verbal
embellishments
as to the peculiar interest of the number
of the journal he has to sell, are founded on fact. He
never announces the steamer to be in before she is
telegraphed, nor indulges in the false pretences which
so often derogate from the dignity of the profession.
He estimates its importance, and proceeds upon principle.
The traveller who trades with Tibbs, at the cars, or on
board the steamboat, may safely buy under the ringing of
the last bell, without finding too late that his pennies have
been exchanged for newspapers stale as an addled egg,
and freshly pumped on, to give them an appearance of
juvenility. Nor does Tom ever avail himself of hasty
departures
,
to be oblivious in the matter of returning change.
He does not, under such circumstances, as some
ungracious
pastors do, put your quarter in one pocket and
fumble for sixpences in the other, until the train darts
away; nor would he, if tempted to the performance of
this unworthy feat, add insult to injury, by holding up the
cash when distance had made its reception impossible, or
by assuming that burlesque expression of hypocritical
astonishment with which some paper-venders, in a
similar
catastrophe, outrage your feelings besides wronging
your purse. As Tom often justly remarks to such of his
colleagues as are habituated to these practices, This
'ere chiselling system won't do. Nobody likes to be
chiselled, and when you have chiselled everybody, why
then they'll get a law passed, and chisel us all to chips. A
joke to-day is often a licking to-morrow, mind I tell you.
Tom's philosophy was, at once, Franklinian and
indisputable
.
He felt the necessity of obviating all danger of
a war of races. He knew that nothing but mischief was
to be anticipated, if all the rest of the human family were
to be chiselled into a hostility against the news-boys;
for the minority always stand in the predicament of being
presented and suppressed as a nuisance, whenever the
stronger party think fit to exercise the power of numbers;
and, as a natural consequence, Tom was opposed to the
practice of clustering about a corner and selling
news-papers
in a flock. A sprinkling of news-boys, one or
two in every square, thought he, is well enough. It's
good for trade, and makes things lively; but to be
cutting
up, so fashion, all in a jam, why people go on t'other
side of the way, and retailing's done for. I vote for
7
scatteration. Folks hate being obligated to fight their
way through the literary circles.
But Tibbs, with all his good sense, has a weakness.
There is a forte and a foible to every blade, and even
such a blade as a news-boy cannot escape the common
lot of humanity. Sound upon the general principle of
not annoying others, yet, in the indulgence of his humour,
he sometimes makes an exception. He especially
dislikes
Mr. Sappington Sapid, a starched gentleman of the
old school, who never reads a journal, cares nothing for
the current of events, and entertains a perfect horror of
the modern style of newspapers and of all concerned in
their distribution. In fact, he attributes much of the
evils of the time to cheap journalism, and he has
not been sparing of an expression of his views on the
subject, whenever the opportunity was afforded. On
some one of these occasions, it was his luck to wound
the feelings of Thomas Tibbs, and Tibbs accordingly
marked him for a sufferer.
Incessantly was Mr. Sappington Sapid assailed. Not a
news-boy passed his door without ringing the bell to
ascertain
whether a paper was not requiredhe never walked
the streets without perpetual and ridiculous solicitations.
When he appeared, all customers were left for his special
annoyance, and, in consequence of failing in the attaint
one day, when he directed an indignant kick at the
provoking
Tibbsunpractised individuals should never
essay the rapid and extemporaneous application of the
footMr. Sappington Sapid sat suddenly and
unexpectedly
down in a puddle of water, in full sight of a legion
of his tormentors, who never forgot the incident, but
would rehearse it, to the delight of their fellows,
whenever
the unfortunate man happened to present himself,
and Tibbs was especially dexterous in giving the broadest
effect to the incident.
What a vitality there is in our worst mishaps! It
would be nothing, comparatively, if disaster were
circumscribed
by its immediate consequences, and it would have
made but little figure in Mr. Sapid's memoirs had he only
caught cold by the operation referred to; but when a
personal
sorrow is transmuted into a general joke, it becomes,
ipso facto
, a living piece of attendant biography, a walking
companionship, which even smiles over a man's last
resting-place
.
Death itself affords no refuge to the hero of a
ridicule. Poor fellow! say his dearest friends,
perhaps it's wrong to mention it now, but, by-the-way,
did you ever hear how,ha! ha! ho!how he made
such a fool of himself at Mrs. Dunover's pic-nic? Ho!
ho! ha! Poor soul!!
Rob a church, or lay logs on the rail-road, and there is
a chance that the last may be heard of it; but if a drollery,
no matter how sad in its essence, be created at any one's
expense, he and it are so far married that they cling
together
through life, while the jest is a relict, to move
post mortem
mirth, autopsical grins and necrological
merriment
.
A dear departed is much more likely to be
resurrectionised
by a surviving joke, than by the most intrepid
of body-snatchers, and the best of portraits is not so good
a memento as being implicated in an anecdote which is
sure to create laughter. Under an inkling of this truth,
Mr. Sapid always denies that he is the person who
shook his foot at the news-boys.
But there are bounds to patience. A man is but a
bottle before the fire of mischance, and when the heat
becomes insupportable, he must of necessity explode, no
matter how tightly corked by fortitude, or wired down by
philosophy. The grief that will not speak, is a deadly
inward fermentation. They who survive sorrow, are those
who exteriorize sorrow, and give sorrow a free channel.
To scold is the vital principle of practical hygieine for the
ladies, and grumbling humanity rarely needs the doctor.
The inference therefore is, that the average of existence
would be at a higher rate, if the admirable counter-irritant
of round swearing were not proscribed in refined society,
thus killing people by the suppressed perspiration of an
indignant spirit.
Sapid, however, was none of these. Patience might
sit upon a monument, if she liked; but there was nothing
of the marble-mason in his composition, nor did he at all
affect the statuesque, when vexation chafed his heart.
If preyed upon in this way, though he never indulged in
Commodore Trunnion's expletives, nor shotted his
discourse
like that worthy commander, yet he did not, by
any means, pray in return, as Dinah had often reason to
acknowledge, when the chamber pitcher was left vacant
of water, or when forgetful Boots failed in the
performance
of his resplendent office. No! Sappington Sapid
makes people hear of it when he is offended, justly
thinking
it better that their ears should be annoyed, than that
he should pine away of an unexpressed inflammation.
It was a bright forenoon, such as elicits snakes in the
country, and evolves the fashionable in cities, when Mr.
Sappington Sapid walked firmly along the street, filled
with a settled purpose. His coat was buttoned up to the
chin, to prevent the evaporation of his stern resolve; his
lips were drawn together, as if to obviate all danger of
evasion by word of mouth; his hat had settled martially
down almost to the bridge of his nose, while his heels
saluted mother earth so determinedly, that his whole
frame-work jarred at the shock. If ever a man displayed
outward symptoms of having his mind made up into the
most compact kind of a parcel, it was Sappington Sapid,
on this memorable occasion. No beggar would have
dared to ask charity from him, under such an aspect. He
was safe from being solicited to take a cab. They who
met him, made way instinctively. Under him, their
genius was rebuked; as, it is said, Mark Antony's was
by Csar; a psychological phenomenon often manifest,
when, by the force of an emergency, even inferior men
are screwed up to the sublime,just as valour's self
shrinks abashed from the angry presence of a cornered cat.
But whither wandered Sapid? No one knew. He
had taken breakfast without a word, and had wandered
forth in equal silence. Counsel he sought not
sympathy
he did not require. When we are girded up, of
our own impulse, to pull the trigger of a catastrophe,
advice
is felt to be an impertinence, and no spur is needed
to prick the sides of our intent. We are a sufficiency
unto ourselves. Legions could not make us stronger,
and, therefore, Sapid disdained companionship or an
interchange
of thought. He, Sapid, was enough to fill the
canvas for the contemplated picture. He was the
tableau, all alone, so far as his share in the incident was
to be concerned.
Some clue to his state of mind may be afforded, when
it is known that he was visited by a night-mare, a
journalistic
incubus, on the previous night. An immense
Tom Tibbs sat upon his breast, and tried to feed him
with penny papers. His head seemed to grow to the
size of a huge type-foundery, and each of his ears roared
like a power press. Then again, he was flattened into
an immense sheet, and they printed him as a Double
Brother Jonathan, with pictorial embellishments. He
was expanded into whole acres of reading for the people,
and did not awake until he was folded, pasted up, and
thrust into the mail-bag; when, protesting against the
ignominy of being charged at the usual rate of
newspaper
postage, he sprang up convulsively, and found that
his night-cap had got over his nose.
7*
Is this the office of the `National Pop-gun and
Universal
Valve Trumpet?' inquired Sapid, in sepulchral tones.
Heywhat? Oh!yes, gruffly replied the clerk, as
he scrutinized the applicant.
It is, is it? was the response.
H-umpse; being a porcine affirmative, much in use
in the city of brotherly love.
I am here to see the editor, on business of
importance
,
slowly and solemnly articulated Sapid.
There must have been something professionally
alarming
in this announcement, if an opinion may be formed
from the effect it produced.
Editor's not come down yet, is he, Spry? inquired
the clerk, with a cautionary wink at the paste-boy.
Guess he ain't more nor up yet, said Spry; the
mails was late, last night.
I'll take a seat till he does come, observed Sapid,
gloomily.
Spry and the clerk laid their heads together, in the
most distant corner of the little office.
Has he got a stick? whispered one.
No, and he isn't remarkable big, nuther.
Any bit of paper in his handdoes he look like State
House and a libel suit? It's a'most timenot had a new
suit for a week.
Not much; and, as we didn't have any scrouger in
the `Gun' yesterday, perhaps he wants to have
somebody
tickled up himself. Send him in.
St. Sebastian Sockdolager, Esq., the editor of The
National Pop-gun and Universal Valve Trumpet, sat at
a green table, elucidating an idea by the aid of a steel pen
and whitey-brown paper, and, therefore, St. Sebastian
Sockdolager did not look up when Mr. Sapid entered the
sanctum. The abstraction may, perhaps, have been a
sample of literary stage effect; but it is certain that the
pen pursued the idea with the speed and directness of a
steeple-chase, straight across the paper, and direful was
the scratching thereof. The luckless idea being at last
fairly run down and its brush cut off, Mr. Sockdolager
threw himself back in his chair, with a smile of triumph.
Tickletoby! said he, rumpling his hair into heroic
expansiveness.
What? exclaimed Sapid, rather nervously.
My dear sir, I didn't see youa thousand pardons!
Pray, what can be done for you in our line?
Sir, there is a nuisance
Glad of it, sir; the `Gun' is death on a nuisance.
We circulate ten thousand deaths to any sort of a
nuisance
every day, besides the weekly and the country
edition
.
We are a regular smash-pipes in that linesurgical,
surgical to this communitywe are at once the knife and
the sarsaparilla to human ills, whether financial, political
or social.
Sir, the nuisance I complain of, lies in the circulation
in its mode and manner.
Bless me! said Sockdolager, with a look of
suspicion
;
you are too literal in your interpretations. If
your circulation is deranged, you had better try Brandreth,
or the Fluid Extract of Quizembob.
It is not my circulation, but yours, which makes all
the trouble. I never circulate,I can't without being
insulted.
Really, mister, I can't say that this is clearly
comprehensible
to perception. Not circulate! Are you
below
par in the `money article,' or in what particular do
you find yourself in the condition of being `no go'?
Excuse
my faceti and be brief, for thought comes
tumbling
,
bumping, booming and Sockdolager dipped
his pen in the ink.
Mr. Sappington Sapid unravelled the web of his
miseries
.
I wish you, sir, to control your boysto dismiss
the saucy, and to write an article which shall make 'em
ashamed of themselves. I shall call on every editor in
the city, sir, and ask the samea combined expression
for the suppression of iniquity. We must be
emancipated
from this new and growing evil, or our liberties
become a farce, and we are squushed and crushed in a
way worse than fifty tea-taxes.
Pardon me, Mr. Whatcheecallem; it can't be done
it would be suicidal, with the sharpest kind of a knife.
Whatcheecallem, you don't understand the grand
movement
of the nineteenth centuryyou are not up to snuff
as to the vital principle of human progressionthe
propulsive
force has not yet been demonstrated to your
benighted
optics. The sun is up, sir; the hill-tops of
intellect
glow with its brightness, and even the level plain
of the world's collective mediocrity is gilded by its beams;
but you, sir, are yet in the foggy valley of exploded
prejudice
,
poking along with a tuppenny-ha'penny candle
a mere dip. Suppress sauciness! Why, my dear
bungletonian
,
sauciness is the discovery of the agethe secret
of advancement! We are saucy now, sir, not by the
accident of constitutiontemperament has nothing to do
with it. We are saucy by calculation, by intention, by
design. It is cultivated, like our whiskers, as a
super-added
energy to our other gifts. Without sauciness,
what is a news-boy? what is an editor? what are
revolutions
?
what are people? Sauce is power, sauce is spirit,
independence, victory, every thing. It is, in fact,this
sauce, or `sass,' as the vulgar have itsteam to the great
locomotive of affairs. Suppress, indeed! No, sir; you
should regard it as part of your duty as a philanthropist
and as a patriot, to encourage this essence of superiority
in all your countrymen; and I've a great mind to
write you an article on that subject, instead of the
other, for this conversation has warmed up my ideas so
completely, that justice will not be done to the
community
till they, like you, are enlightened on this important
point.
St. Sebastian Sockdolager, now having a leading
article for The National Pop-gun and Universal Valve
Trumpet, clearly in his mind, was not a creature to be
trifled with. An editor in this paroxysm, however
gentle
in his less inspired moments, cannot safely be crossed,
or even spoken to. It is not wise to call him to dinner,
except through the keyhole, and to ask for more copy,
in general a privileged demand, is a risk too fearful to be
encountered. St. Sebastian's eye became fixed, his brow
corrugated, his mouth intellectually ajar.
But, sir, the nuisancesaid Sappington.
Don't bother! was the impatient reply, and the
brow of St. Sebastian Sockdolager grew black as his
own ink.
The boys, sir, the boys!am I to be worried out of
my life and soul?
The right hand of St. Sebastian Sockdolager fell heavily
upon the huge pewter inkstandthe concatenation of
his ideas had been brokenhe half raised himself from
his chair and glanced significantly from his visiter to the
door.
Mizzle! said he, in a hoarse, suppressed
whisper
.
The language itself was unintelligiblethe word might
have been Chaldaic, for all that Sapid knew to the
contrary
;
but there are situations in which an interpreter is
not needed, and this appeared to be one of them. Sapid
never before made a movement so swiftly
extemporaneous
.
He intends shortly to try whether the Grand Jury is a
convert to the new doctrine of sauciness.
Tibbs, in the meantime, grows in means and expands
in ambition. Progress is in his soul, like a reel in a
bottle
.
He aspires already to a literary agency, and often
feels as if he were destined to publish more magazines at
a single swoop than there are now in existence, each of
which shall have upon its cover, a picture of The
News-Boy
,
while the same device shall gleam upon the panels
of his coach.
GOSSIP ABOUT GOSSIPING.
WITH HINTS ON CONVERSATION.
It
is a matter both theoretical and practical in our
philosophy
,
(and we are reckless enough not to care who
knows it, either,) that, next to lounging at a front window
when the weather's sunny, to see the world from a safe
and luxurious ambushment, there are few among human
pleasures at once so cheap, so agreeable, and so
enduring
as that slipshod and unpretending delight of the leisure
hour, stigmatized by ignorant incapacity under the
reproachful
name of gossip. We are not, however,
about to trouble ourselves to prove the correctness of the
assertion. There are cases wherein the logical
demonstration
is an impertinence. If a truth, in matters of
feeling
,
come not home to us at the instant of its enunciation,
why, our perceptions are defectiveour experiences
incomplete
.
We have not been educated and finished up
to that point. It may be, indeed, that we are not
calculated
to attain it, even with opportunities the most
favourable
to this species of advancement; and it is not in the
nature of words to change the quality of the material of
which we are composed, or to anticipate the results of
that practical schooling which chisels away the block to
bring out the man. In the profundities of wisdom, you
and I learn nothing from each other. Argument and
demonstration are wasted, unless there be that within,
which, to some extent at least, has experimentally proved
the soundness of the doctrine. To be convinced, is but
to recognise a conclusion towards which our imperfect
intelligence had previously been tending; and hence it is
that the treatise on morals is so often an encumbrance to
the shelf. It addresses itself to those who are not
sufficiently
ripened by trial and observation, to be gathered up
in the harvest of the ethical essayist. Available
knowledge
,
in the main conduct of life, is a precious ore, to
be, with toils and strugglings, mined out by personal
effort. It is not enough that myriads have passed through
the same process, and have devised to us their experiences
as a legacy. We are only satisfied when, like the child,
our own little hand has established the fact that fire will
burn. We are sure of it then, and govern ourselves
accordingly
;
but the mere
dictum
of mamma and all the
warning voices of the nursery, could not otherwise have
impressed it upon us that the lighted taper is an
uncomfortable
plaything, as dangerous as it is brilliant. Can
vanity be soothed into an unassuming temper before its
inordinate appetites have caused it to falter, enfeebled by
the very food on which it grew? Is vaulting ambition
to be checked, think you, by the uplifted finger of
precept
?
Are we to be deterred by wise saws and
modern
instances, until we have felt it stinging in our
inmost
soul, be it by success, or be it by disappointment,
that unregulated impulses and morbid cravings lead to
satiety and to the sickness of the heart? So, the time
may be long or short, before we turn with weariness from
the champagne exhilarations of existence, to find health
and comfort in its cooling springs; but, if we are capable
of wisdom, that time must come; and happy they, who,
through many stumblings, by much groping in thick
darkness, with painful bruises and in sad tribulation, have
reached the broad refreshing daylight of this conviction.
Let them not regret the years that have been consumed.
The remnant is the leaf of the sybil, its value enhanced
by the antecedent destruction. Weep not over the
afflictions
that have been encountered in threading the
labyrinths
of passionate delusion. A prize has been gained
worth all its cost; and we have now taken the first
degree
in the great university of human training.
All our refinements, in the end, resolve themselves into
nothing more than an unpretending simplicity; for
simplicity
is itself the highest of refinements. Your frogged
coat and your embroidered vest are indications from the
circus and the theatre. Rings and jewels and
bijouterie
,
though they may clink and sparkle innocently enough, do
still suggest ideas of the faro-table and a predatory life;
while gaudiness and assumption give rise to an inference
that we are making the first attempt in a position above
our habitude. The true voluptuary, he who regards
pleasure
as a science and would derive from existence all the
delight it is capable of yielding, is economical in his
enjoyments
,
and shuns the debauch as a serpent in the path.
Ignorance may feed fat at its evening meal; but he who
takes things in their connection, as if they were links in
a continuous chain, looks beyond the hour, and is
content
with tea and toast; sweet sleep and a clear head on
the morrow being essential items in his calculation.
Whatever be the line of our travel and the nature of our
experiences, we arrive at simplicity at last, if we are so
fortunate as to survive the exploration; and those who
have outlived this arduous task, which cannot be
performed
by proxy, and which is a conscription admitting
of no substitute, will agree with us that gossip, goodly
gossip, though sneered at by the immature, is, after all,
the best of our entertainments. With no disparagement
to the relish of professional pursuitswithout
invidiousness
towards the ball-room, the dramatic temple, the
concert
,
the opera or the lecture, we must fall back upon the
light web of conversation, upon chit-chat, upon gossip,
an thou wilt have it so, as our mainstay and our chief
reliance
as
that
corps de reserve
on which our scattered
and wearied forces are to rally.
8
What is there which will bear comparison as a
recreating
means, with the free and unstudied interchange of
thought, of knowledge, of impression about men and
things, and all that varied medley of fact, criticism and
conclusion so continually fermenting in the active brain?
Be fearful of those who love it not, and banish such as
would imbibe its delights, yet bring no contribution to the
common stock. There are men who seek the reputation
of wisdom by dint of never affording a glimpse of their
capabilities, and impose upon the world by silent gravity
negative philosophers, who never commit themselves
beyond the utterance of a self-evident proposition, or
hazard their position by a feat of greater boldness than is
to be found in the avowal of the safe truth which has been
granted for a thousand years. There is a deception here,
which should never be submitted to. Sagacity may be
manifest in the nod of Burleigh's head; but it does not
follow that all who nod are Burleighs. He who
habitually
says nothing, must be content if he be regarded as
having nothing to say, and it is only a lack of grace on
his part which precludes the confession. In this broad
Vienna of human effort, the mere looker-on cannot
be tolerated. It is not to be endured that any one should
stand higher than his deserts, because he can contrive to
hold his tongue and has just wit enough to dodge the
question. And there is no force whatever in an
unwillingness
to give forth nonsense, or in the dread of making
one's self ridiculous. It is part of our duty to be
nonsensical
and ridiculous at times, for the entertainment of
the rest of the world; and, if not qualified for a more
elevated share in the performance, why should we shrink
from the
rle
allotted to us by nature? Besides, if we
are never to open our mouths until the unsealing of the
aperture is to give evidence of a present Solomon, and to
add something to the Book of Proverbs, we must, for the
most part, stand like the statue of Harpocrates, with still
your finger on your lips, I pray. If we do speak, under
such restrictions, it cannot well be, as the world is
constituted
,
more than once or twice in the course of an
existence
,
the rest of the sojourn upon earth being devoted
to a sublimation of our thought. But always wise,
sensible
,
sagacious, rationalalways in wig and spectacles
always algebraic and mathematicaldoctrinal and didactic
ever to sit like Franklin's portrait, with the index fixed
upon causalityone might as well be a petrified
professor, or a William Penn bronzed upon a pedestal.
There is nothing so good, either in itself or in its effects,
as good nonsense. It is, in truth, the work of genius to
produce the best article of the kind, and, if men and
women cannot reach the climax in this particular, they
owe it to the common welfare to soar as near it as their
limited capacity will allow.
But, while it is regarded as a bounden duty upon all
who enjoy the protection of society, to talk on proper
occasions, both for the benefit of others, and that, for
ulterior purposes, the strength of each individual may be
properly appreciated, still there is no intention to
undervalue
the advantage afforded by good listeners. They
are a source of blessing for which the talking world
cannot
be too grateful. Did they not exist, the vast
steam-engine
of human ability would lack its safety-valve.
Explosion would ensue, or we should murderously talk
each other to death. The man fraught with intellectual
product, would find no market for its disposition. The
quick fancies of his wit would beat against the bars in
vain, and perish miserably by their own efforts to escape.
Our thinkings are for exportationnot to be consumed
within. There must be no embargo on the brain, or the
factory is stopped by accumulating goods. Hence, the
speaker and the listener combine to make a perfect whole.
The one is the soilthe other the sunthe plant and
that refreshing shower, which enables the leaf to put
forth and the bud to bloom. No man, whatever may be
the intrinsic force of his genius, can form an idea of
what he is capable, until he is well listened to. Much of
his power lies in the auditory. There is a subtle
correspondence
between them, which raises or depresses as
the sympathetic intercommunication happens to be the
more or less perfect in its vibrations. But there should
be alternation in this, to develope human powers, to
increase
human affections, to complete the republic. There
must be no division into exclusive classes, the one all
vivacity, all pertness, all tonguean unremitting volume
of sound and a vocal perpetuity of motion; while the
other, subdued and overwhelmed, curves into a huge
concavity of ear, into a mere tympanum for the
everlasting
drummer to play upon. Where this happens to be
the case, from colloquial encroachments on the one hand,
and from submissive dispositions on the other, there is a
double degenerationto words without meaning, and to
hearing without heeding. They who are talked to
beyond
the bounds of salutary affliction, only escape the
fatal result of being subjected to such cruelty, by
emulating
the rhinoceros in his impervious cuticle; so that the
pattering storm of speech rebounds innocuously from the
surface. They close the porches of the sense while
elocution
rages around them, and, snug within, cogitate
securely
upon their own ruminations. Turn from your florid
rhetoric to the sharp interrogation, and you shall find the
patient fast asleep as to external uproar, though his eyes
be open. Nature has provided him with a safeguard
he has been bucklered by inattention, and has left you to
your own applause.
To listen well, it is not enough that we yield, rescue or
no rescue, and ask not for quarter, when detained by the
button or cornered in a
cul de sac
. More is required than
hopeless resignation, as, with a sigh, we surrender to an
inevitable fate. The abject look, so generally worn by
the man who knows that he is going to be talked to, and
evinces by his aspect that he has no hope of mercy, is
unworthy of the heroic soul. It is emphatically an art,
and it is scarcely necessary to state that there are moments
when it is no easy art, to lend me your ears to our
mutual profit and pleasure. This is not an anatomical
demonstration we are upon, that the mere handing over
of the physical body is sufficient. Your imaginations are
not to ramble all about the fields, nozzling in every bush
and giving chase to every butterfly. The appropriate
interjection
is wanted, living, breathing, burning; nicely
timed, too, and imperceptibly strengthening the oratorical
wingnot like the Roman citizen of the mimic stage,
whose accordance with Brutus and whose sympathies
with Antony, are stamped with that indifference which
arises from supernumerary station, and whose limited
share of the receipts causes him to care no more than the
worth of fifty cents about Csar's testamentbut as
if the business were your own. It is imperative on you
to adjust the countenance to the nicest expression of
appreciating
intelligenceto be in tune, not only in the
tones of the voice, but in the cadence of the bodyto
display attention in the very play of the fingersto laugh
readily, just enough and no more, and to show by slight
subsequent observation, that all which has been uttered
is duly estimated, instead of bringing the speaker to the
ground with a jarring shock, by betraying, in an
unconscious
word, that his flight has been alone. The mere
powers of endurancefortitude, patience, and
long-suffering
are
indeed much; but still, they are but a part of
what is demanded. If it were not so, the passive pump,
which stands in sad aridity before the door, would
answer
8*
every purpose. More is necessary than to be an
unresisting recipienta conversational Deaf Burke,
who can endure any amount of punishment without
being much the worse for it. Like the red warrior at
the sake, the perfect listener should so comport himself
as to induce the belief that he has pleasure in his pain,
and invites its increased continuance. He should be
made up of tact and benevolenceof courage and
humanity
.
His nerve should be stronghis perception
nice. At one moment he needs forbearance, to suppress
the almost irresistible interruption, and anon, his rapid
powers of anticipation must be ridden with a curb. His
philological expertness cannot be permitted to patch the
gaps of hesitancy, by the impertinent suggestion of a
word; but, when intuitive promptness is expected, a
broken syllable should point the way to a desired
conclusion
.
Worse, much worse than nothing, is the uneasy
listener, who, like Sister Ann upon the tower, gazes
every way for relief, and sees it galloping at each
passing cloud of dust, as if, in short, our beard were blue,
and our tongue were as remorseless and as sharp as a
Turkish scimitar; and worse than Sister Ann is the
abstracted
companion, who knows nothing of the
subjunctive
mood, but endeavours to break the finely woven
thread of your discourse by crossing you with irrelevant
ideashe who interrupts your pathetic revelations
perhaps
of loveyou were in love oncealmost everybody
isby coolly inquiring when you saw Smith?As if
you cared any thing about Smithor were even thinking
of Smith. Hang Smith!Never suffer yourself thus to be
overcome by Smith, and never talk to that man again, if
another is to be had. Nor are kindly feelings to be
entertained
towards the accommodating friend, that
provoking
extract from the Book of Martyrology, who
sits him down as nearly as possible in the attitude which
patience has upon a monument, and looks at your
approach
as if you were surgery itself, fresh from the schools,
all glitter with instruments and draped in bandage
compassionating
his hard lot, but setting his teeth to suffer.
Mark it well. Should you propose to tell this fellow any
thingvolunteering to explain to him how it happened,
clearly and circumstantially, and with no other view than
to his enlightenment, be prepared for ingratitude, in
advance
ingratitude,
more strong than traitors' arms.
A cold reluctance is within him, and he tries to play
Procrustes
with your narrative, by asking how long it will
take to give it expression, his tolerance of you being
measured horologically, as it were, by the hour-glass and
dial. A shower-bath is warm encouragement compared
to his notes of acquiescence; and if he does not yawn
what on earth are we to do with people that yawn?is
there no remedy in legislative action?why, he always
swears he understandsoh, yesperfectlywhile
calculating the odds and chances of some distant
speculation
,
to which you are not a party. It will be observed
that individuals of such a sort are troubled with a
propensity
to know what o'clock it isnot that they have
any particular interest in the hour, on their own personal
account, but from a vague hope that the time of day may
chance to have something in it alarming to you, and that
you are to be scared from your present prey to attend to
a remote engagement. A benevolent hearer never wants
to know what o'clock it is. There is a morose
misanthropy
in the desire, of which he is incapable; and if an
acquaintance with the precise moment be inadvertently
forced upon him, he has no such cruelty in his bosom as
to affect a look of surprise and consternation, while he
hypocritically protests that he had no idea it was so
late. They who are loudest in saying that they had
no idea it was so late, for the most part, fib. They
had that idea, and more. They believed that it was as
late, and they hoped it might be a great deal later. They
were waiting for the clock to sue out a
habeas corpus
in
their case. Didn't think it was so late, indeed.
Pshaw! What question was there touching hours and
minutes, when our story was but half developed? Were
we singing to Maelzel's Metronome, pry'thee, that we
are thus to be reminded of beats and bars, and the
prescribed
measure of a stave? Late, say'st thou?
What is late?There is no such thing as late in
modern civilization. Steam has annihilated space, and
the dead-latch-key has left the word late a place
in the vocabulary, no doubt; but it has been deprived
of its operative meaning. When some one sat up for
you, then lateness was possible; but nowdo you see
this little bar of steel, with its pendant and arabesque
termination
this
talismanic open sesame? Late
expired when the powers of invention reached their
climax
in fashioning forth this curious instrument. No one
can come in late. Sit thee still, and be not antediluvian.
Now-a-days, and especially now-a-nights, it is always
early enough.
But good listeners, as there has been unhappily too
much occasion to show, are rarities. When they die,
they should have monuments loftier far than that of
Cheops. Pyramids, with forty centuries looking from
their top, would not be too much of honour for such
philanthropists; and, to render education what it ought to
be, the human family should be trained to listen, and, at
the same time, taught to talk. To sit still with dignity
and composure, is as difficult as to move with ease and
grace; yet both are matters of importance in the work of
refinement. But it is much more essential to success that
our presence should be hailed with pleasure, because,
whether
speaking or being spoken to, the faculty is possessed of
giving pleasure to those by whom we are surrounded.
To converse wellto gossip delightfully, is an art that
richly deserves to be studied. It does not follow that
one is a conversationist, or a perfect gossip, by such
endowments
,
valuable as they are when properly qualified
by a little of the allaying Tiber of sound discretion, as
fertility of mind, a magazine of facts, and a flood of
fluency. Did you ever hear me preach? said
Coleridge
to Charles Lamb. I never heard you do any
thing else, was the sarcastic but truthful reply; and
herein abides the common error. There is a fever of
talkativeness, occasional with some, but constitutional in
others, which is the bane of social enjoyment.
First-fiddleism
is as unpleasant to come in contact with, as to
pass an evening encaged with a lion of literary, scientific,
or metaphysical renown. Your Van Amburgs and your
Driesbachs may be fitted for such an encounter; but
mortals
of inferior nerve find an unpleasant species of
annihilation
in the contact. Do not, then, attempt the lion's
part, even if it be nothing but roaring; nor, unless
assured past doubt that you possess the skill of Nicolo
Paganini, is it ever wise to compel protracted attention
to your single string, when others have quite as strong a
desire to scrape their Cremonas, as that which burns in
your own musical bosom. Play no more than is
necessary
to the harmonious effect of the whole orchestra; and,
should occasion offer for a solo, give it and be done.
Monopoly in discourse is most tolerable, and not to be
endured. It should be punishable by statute, thus to
invade the inalienable right of utterance.
It is not even freedom to go abroad, when the
garrulous
kite has wing, to swoop upon his quarry. The
libertythe life itselfof the citizen is at stake, from that
stoutly timbered magazine of words, who, strengthened
by practice, and warmed by self-complacency, sustains
no injury from wind or weather, and will dilate for hours,
in frosty streets, to those who come within the dreadful
clutch. We see him now, smiling in conscious triumph,
as his prize shivers, shakes, and trembles almost to
spectral
nothingness, and feels most sadly that this is not all
his sufferingsthat catarrhs, and feverous aches and pains
creep into him at every word. Homicidalis it not, thus
to thin out our population? An oversight in criminal
jurisprudence, to let destruction forth into the highways,
to run at unprotected men. Cunning doctors do not note
it in their cautions, and the bills of mortality are silent on
the subject; but it is no less a truth, that though the
victim
may sometimes be able to travel homeward after the
catastrophe, he often gets him to his bed, if he escape the
undertaker, from such combined assaults of breeze and
bore as are now before us. Wouldst thou despatch thine
enemy? What need of steel or poisonwhy lurk in
slouched hat, in moustache, or with stiletto? There is a
safer method, and, having no other accomplice than the
thermometer, waylay him as he goes, with smiling face
and oiled tongue. You have him there, and safely too.
Chemistry has no surer poison, if you hold him fast; and
justice has no cognisance of the deed.
The true conversationist requires as nice a balance of
qualities as the adroit swordsman. He should have an
eye, an ear and a tongue, equally on the alert, perfectly
under control, and skilled to act together. It is his duty
to be able to mark the moment when a slumbering idea
is awakened in the mind of another, and to afford
opportunity
for its development. When the thought quivers
in an almost inaudible murmur upon the lips of the timid,
it is not to be suppressed in premature death by the
rattling
noise of practised confidence; not to be driven over,
if we may so describe it, by each hackney cab that
thunders
up the street. It claims to be deferentially educed,
not so much by a display of patronising encouragement,
which is almost as fatal as harsh disregard, but by that
respectful attention which creates no painful sense of
inferiority
.
He cannot pretend to civilization, who, in his
wild dance of intellectual excitement, tramples under his
massive foot all the little chickens of our imagination,
and scares each half-fledged fancy back to its native shell.
Be it rather your pleasure to chirp the tremblers forth to
the corn of praise and the sunshine of approbation. Who
has not found himself to be totally absorbed by the
volubility
of others; so that he could neither find subject nor
words, even when an interval was left for their exercise?
And who has not often been altogether debarred from the
delight of speaking, merely because he had not space to
set himself fully in motion? Many, perhaps, have
resigned
themselves to the taciturnity of La Trappe and
have gone voiceless to their graves, from injudicious
treatment in this respect. The humane citizen, then,
will not of himself take all the labour of talking, lest he
may be inadvertently stifling a Demosthenes, and
smothering
a Ciceroa case, it is true, which does not very
often happen, though it might happen.
And, besides, let it be remarked, there is no fact, in
our day of innovation, scheming and discoverywhen
we reform, remodel, and lay our hands upon every thing
which deserves to be more strongly imprinted on the
recollection than this, that man does not go forth into
society, no, nor woman neither, armed,
cap--pie
, like
a gladiator, to battle for opinion, or to thrust the sword
of conversion through reluctant ribs. Let such things be
confined to the dedicated halls of controversial debate,
where one may be polemically impaled,
secundum artem
,
expecting no better treatment. It is good to be wise
merry and wise, saith the song; but, then, wisdom
need not always be at our throat with spoon and bowl,
determined to administer nutriment, without regard to the
state of the appetite. Did it never occur to you, my
game friend, as you strapped on your gaffs, and crowed
defiance at a rooster of another feather, that the rest of
the social circle do not derive your pleasure from the
set-to
,
and would gladly be excused from being annoyed by
the argumentative combat? And, as for hobbies, they
prance prettily enough on their proper ground; but do
not let them caracole in the parlour. People would rather
be kicked by any thing than by other people's hobbies;
and, again, these hobbies, being merely composed of wood
and leather, are never wearied, and cannot stop. They
outstrip everybody, and carry none with them. Hark, in
your ear. Leave hobby at home; he will not be restive
or break things, when you are not by. It is disagreeable
to be ridden down by these unaccommodating
quadrupeds
.
Folks do not like it.
The engrossing idea, too, should be hung up with the
hat in the vestibule. It is near enough there; and,
admitting
that you have troubles of your own, ambitions of
your own, prospects of your own, projects and inventions
of your own, let it always be borne distinctly in mind
that this, singular as it may appear, is, to a certain
degree
,
the case with several other individuals of your
acquaintance
.
What right they have to an engrossing idea
when yours wishes to awaken their sympathies, is a point
of equity which we cannot take it upon ourselves to
decide
;
but it is so, nevertheless, as the groaning soldier
found when rebuked for making so much noise over
his hurts, as if, forsooth, no one is hit but yourself.
Am I then reposing on a bed of roses? said
Guatemozin
,
in a similar spirit, to his complaining courtier,
when Spanish cruelty had stretched them upon the
glowing grate; and every man has, to some extent, a
gridiron to himself.To push this point still further, are
they entitled to rank with conversationists, who stand as
greyhounds on the slip, with straining eyes and quivering
limbs, heedless of all remark, and waiting only till an
opening be made, that they may course their peculiar
game, rabbit or otherwise, as the case may be? Are
they qualified gossips, who only talk to exercise the organ,
and to luxuriate on the sound of their own sweet voices?
who, at last, dash forward over every impediment, and,
by their bad example, like prairie horses in a stampede,
set the whole circle into a very Babel of tonguesinto
what we may call a steeple-chase, straight across the
country, and through any man's fieldeach for himself,
boot and saddle, whip and spur? Nay, never think it.
He is scant in his schooling who shifts impatiently from
foot to foot when another has the floorwho darts his
restless head into the aperture of every pause, in the hope
that the shoulders may be permitted to follow, and who is
only kept in abeyance by those stentorian lungs which
crush the puny interruption.
Noto gossip well is a delicate thinga game of
address
a
school of self-commandan academy for nice
perceptions. To be skilled in it, involves the main points
of an accomplished gentleman. It furnishes, moreover,
a key to character. The selfish man cannot be versed
in it, for he has no appreciation of the minor rights of
others, and, in this garden, no compulsory code exists to
prevent him from pocketing all the fruit. Harshness is
incompatible with it, for it is the very essence of
respectful
consideration. The domineering spirit cannot gain
laurels here; while pride and vanity display themselves
in their true colours. The proselytes of Lavater and the
disciples of Combe may, by their science, be enabled to
read the soul; but, as the one traces the lines of the
countenance
,
9
and the other toils among the hills and valleys
of the skull, the surest observer of disposition is he who
notes the deportment of those bearing part in the animated
gossip. Before him, the secret unrolls like a map, and
the geography of the heart is familiar to his searching eye.
When the glow lights up within, there is a ray behind
the best adjusted mask which reveals the features as
they are.
As the day is utilitarian, the
cui bono
, the advantage
and the profit, form a material part of every matter, and it
will be found that to cultivate these responsive faculties
to add the art of hearing and of speaking to the
catalogue
of accomplishmentshas a moral as well as a
pleasure
in it. A skilful talker, who is, at the same time, a
thorough listener, is not a spontaneityan unlessoned
creature. Oaks do not bear such acorns. The spirit of
such a one, if feeble, has been strengthened. His temper,
if tempestuous, has been subdued. He has sympathies,
cultivated and refined. He feels for those around him,
in great things and in small. He is that wisest of
philosophers
,
the well regulated man of the world, who shuns
the wrong because he knows its evils, and adopts the
right, from having proved it to be an essential to his own
happiness, and the happiness of others. And what
contributes
more largely to this important end, than a perfect
system of hearing and of being heard? Nature does not
furnish it. To be nothing more than natural, is to be an
egotist, a glutton, a monopolizer. That the untrained steed
has power enough, is not to be disputed; but, in the
simplicity
of his unsophisticated heart, he is apt to apply his
strength in an uncomfortable manner, to those who wander
within range of his heel, never thinking that the joy he
derives from the rapid extension of his locomotive
muscles
,
is not likely to be reciprocated on our part. He is
not aware of the difference of sensation between kicking
and being kicked, which is often a point to be considered.
It is even so with bipeds, who have not properly
undergone
the discipline of the
mange
. It cannot be denied
that the child of nature has something in him of the
poetical
;
but, in practice, he is likely to border on the
uncouth
and uncontrollable.
If, therefore, after the experiment of a year, according
to our suggestion, it be found that the trial does not bring
out the better constituents of character, while restraining
those of less amiability, why, continue to chatter, without
stint or limitation, to the end of your days, and throw no
chance away, unless compelled to it by exhaustion; or, if
it please you, sit in sulky silence, and have never a word
by way of change.
SHIVERTON SHAKES;
OR, THE UNEXPRESSED IDEA.
Shiverton Shakes
had an ideaa cup of tea had
warmed the soil of his imagination, and it was flowering
to fruithe had an idea in buda thought which
struggled
to expand into expression, and to find a place in the
great basket of human knowledge.
Shiverton Shakes had an idea, and ideas, whether great
or smallwhether good, bad or indifferentmust have
utterance, or the understanding wilts and withers. Even
the body sympathetically suffers. It is easy to mark the
man who smothers his intellectual offspringthe moral
infanticide, with his compressed lip, his cadaverous hue,
his sinister eye, and his cold, cautious deportment; whose
thinkings never go out of doors, and lack health for want
of air and exercise. That man is punished for his cruelty
to nature, by a dyspepsia affecting both his mental and
physical organization. There is no health in him.
But it must not be forgotten that Shiverton Shakes had
an idealittle Shiverton, in his earlier years, when the
world is fresh and new, and when the opening faculties
are wild in their amazement.
Mamma, said Shiverton, suspending the assault
upon his bread and butter, mamma, what d'ye think?
as I was going down
Mr. and Mrs. Shakes were too earnestly engaged in
the interchange of their own fancies, to heed the infantile
voice of Shiverton.
What d'ye think, ma? repeated the youthful
aspirant
for the honour of a hearing; as I was going down
Chestnut street, I saw
A little more sugar, my dear, said Mr. Shakes.
And, as I was telling you, added Mrs. Shakes,
Mary Jones has got
Sweetened to death! Theredon't! said Mr.
Shakes, withdrawing his cup rather petulantly.
Down Chestnut street, I saw
A new black hat, trimmed with
Sugar enough to fill a barrel, muttered Mr.
Shakes.
I saw
Hat with
Tea spoilt altogethergive me another
Very little black hat, trimmed with
Two boys, and what d'ye think! chimed in the
persevering
Shiverton Shakes.
Why, what is all this? exclaimed Mr. Shakes, as
he raised his eyes in anger. Hats and boys and sugar!
I never heard such a Babel!
That child! ejaculated Mrs. Shakes; did you ever
know
Two boys, and they were a continued Shiverton,
pursuing his own peculiar train of reminiscence,
undisturbed
by Mary Jones or any thing else, and happy in
feeling that there now appeared to be no impediment to
the flow of his narrative.
But yet, this moment, though he knew it not, was a
crisis in the fate of Shiverton Shakesa circumflex in the
line of his being; slight perhaps in itself, but very
material
in determining the result of the journey.
Mr. Shakes fixed his eye upon his sonMr. Shakes
seemed to ponder for a moment.
I cannot stand it any longer, said he, and what is
more, I won'tthat boy is a nuisancehe talks so much
that I cannot tell what I'm reading, taste what I'm eating,
or hear what I'm saying. I'm not sure, in fact, when he
9
is present, that I know exactly whether it's me or not.
He wants to talk all the time.
Luckless Shiverton had been running wild in the
country for a considerable period, and, while his
elocutionary
capacities had been greatly developed, the power of
endurance in his parents had been weakened for want of
exercise. They were out of practicehe was in high
training. They were somewhat nervous,he was, both
in mind and body, in the best possible condition,
deriving
as much nourishment from the excitement of noise as
he did from food.
Well, I declare, he does talk all the time and asks
such questionsso foolish I can't answer them,
exclaimed
the mother, with her usual volubility; just as
if there was a reason for every thingso tiresome. I do
declare, when he is in the room, I can scarcely slip in a
word edgeways, and his tongue keeps such a perpetual
clatter, that since he came back, I hardly think I've heard
my own voice more than
You hear it now, said Mr. Shakes; but I'm
determined
Shiverton shall be spoiled no longer. Do you
hear? From this time forth, you must never speak but
when you are spoken to. Little boys must be seen, and
not heard.
Well, I do declare, so they mustmus'n't be seen
and not be heardthat's the way to bring up children.
Shiverton, added his father, impressively;
Shiverton
,
when you are old enough to talk sensibly, then
you may talk. When you are mature enoughI say
mature
What is mature? inquired Shiverton, tremblingly.
Mature isnever mind what it iswhen you are
older you'll know. But, as I before remarked, when you
are mature enough to understand things, then you may
ask about them.
The rule, thus emphatically laid down, was enforced
inexorably. It, therefore, not only happened that
Shiverton's
idea was suppressed on the occasion referred to,
thus preventing the world from ever arriving at a
knowledge
of what really was done by those two mysterious
boys, as he went down Chestnut street, but likewise
cutting
him off from other communications relative to the
results of his experience and observation. Henceforth he
was to be seen, not hearda precept and a rule of
conduct
which he was compelled to write in his copybook,
as well as to hear, whenever the workings of his spirit
prompted him to speak as to his thinkings. The twig
was bentthe tree inclined.
What Shiverton Shakes might have been, had the
trunk of his genius been permitted to ascend according to
its original impulse, is now but matter for conjecture.
How far he would have reached in his umbrageous
expansion
,
had the shoots of his soul been judiciously
trimmed and trellisedsunned, shaded and wateredwho
can tell? There may be a blank in glory's book which
his name should have filledan empty niche in our
century's
greatness, where Shiverton Shakes should have been
embalmed. At this instant, perhaps, the world suffers
because some momentous truth which it was for him to
have drawn to light, is still hushed within the hollow
mine of earth. Why, indeed, may we not suppose that
when he was rebuked for making chips, to the annoyance
of the tidy housekeeper, an invention perished in its very
inception which would have superseded the steam-engine?
What might Shiverton ShakesShiverton cherished
Shakes undismayedwhat might he not have been? A
warrior, probably, phlebotomizing men by the battalion
and by the brigade, and piling skulls to build his way to
fame. Why not a patriot and a statesman, heading
parties
and carrying elections, with speeches from the stump
and huzzas from the multitude? Nor would it be
considering
too curiously if it were to be imagined that, had
circumstances been propitious, Shiverton Shakes might,
at this very hour, have been in the enjoyment of the highest
of human honours and the most sublime of modern
inventions
,
that of being pilloried by the political press and
flung at by half the nationthe new pleasure, for which
an exhausted voluptuary of the classic age breathed sighs
in vain.
But such delights as these were denied to Shiverton
Shakes, who was too strictly taught to be seen and not
heardwho was not to speak until he was spoken to; in
consequence whereof, as the invitation was not very often
extended, he came near being deprived of the faculty of
speech altogether.
When Shiverton Shakes came homewhy, there's
company in the parlour, and Shiverton Shakes went to
learn manners and deportment in the kitchen. Shiverton
Shakes breakfasted, dined and supped in the kitchen, and
when promoted by a call up stairs, Shiverton mumbled in
his words, fumbled in his pockets and rumpled among
his hair. An ungainly lout was Shiverton Shakes. He
had been, so to speak, paralyzed by his undeveloped
idea. His original confidence, instead of being modulated
and modified, had been extirpated, and the natural
aplomb
of his characterthat which keeps men on their feet,
maintaining the adjustment and balance of their faculties
had been destroyed.
The boy is a booby, said Mr. Shakes; why can't
you stand up straight and speak out?you're old enough.
Well, I do declare, subjoined Mrs. Shakes, I'm
quite ashamed of him. I can't think how he came to be
such a goose. When Mary Jones spoke to him the other
day, I do declare if he didn't put his thumb right in his
eye, and almost twist himself out of his jacket; and when
she asked him what he learned at school, all he could
say was `he! he! I don't know.' He shan't show
himself
again till he behaves bettera great long
I don't like to be harshin fact, I'm rather too
indulgent
,
philanthropically remarked Mr. Shakes; but,
if I were to do my duty by this boy, I ought to chastise
him out of these awkward tricks. Theregodown
stairs with you. It's the only place you're fit for.
He must never be allowed to come up when any
body's herenot till he knows how to speak to people.
Such was the earlier life of Shiverton Shakes. He
was not to plunge into the billows of the world before he
had learned to swim, and yet was denied the opportunity
to acquire the rudiments of this species of natation, in
those smaller rills and ripples where alone the necessary
confidence and dexterity are to be obtained. It was
perhaps
believed that he could cast the boy off and assume
the man, without preliminary training, and that, having
been seen but not heard, for so many years, he would have
an instinctive force, at the proper moment, to cause
himself
both to be seen and heard, thus suddenly stepping
from one extreme to the other. There may be such
forces in some peoplein people who, in a phrenological
aspect, have a large propelling power, to drive them
over the snags, sawyers and shallows of this shoal of
time. They were not, however, to be found in
Shiverton
Shakes. Nor was he a proof of the correctness of
that common parental theory, so often urged to palliate
and to excuse deficiencies in culture and supervision,
that he would know better when he grew older, thus
endeavouring to make future years responsible for duties
which should be performed by ourselves and at the
existing
moment. This method of knowing better may suit
the procrastinating disposition, and there may be instances
in which it engenders a corrective influence; but it
is at best a doubtful experiment to permit defects to
harden into petrifaction, while awaiting the uncertain
period of removal. That we may know better when
we are older is like enough; but then, will we do better?
Who, of all the world, does bettermuch betterhalf
as much better as he oughtas he knows better?
There are differences, sad to experience, hard to
overcome
,
between knowing and doing. The right habitude
is the surest panoply. Shiverton Shakes had no habitude
but the wrong habitudeno panoply at all.
Shiverton went forth into the worldshrinkingly forth
modestly forth, and so forth, which perhaps is very
amiable
as an abstraction, though its value, in a peculiarly
brazen state of society, is not quite so great, in a practical
point of view, as the school-books would have us to
believe
for
if, as we are told, this modesty is a candle to
one's merit, there must be some strange omission in
regard
to lighting the wick, and, unless that process be
complied
with, it is as clear as darkness can make it, that all
the candles in the universe will do but little toward an
illumination. It is at least certain that Shiverton's merit
gained no refulgence from his unobtrusiveness, and that
his retiring disposition, so far from promoting his interests
and extending his fame, according to the philosophic
notion on the subject, came near causing him to be pushed
out of sight and forgotten altogether. No one searched
him from his obscurityfortune passed by his door
without
knocking, and reputation swept onward without
offering him a seat in its vehicle. Yet Shiverton was as
modest as modest could beas modest, according to the
popular comparison, as a sheep. He thought nothing of
himself at allhe invariably got out of the way when
other people wanted to advance, on the principle of after
you is manners, and when others spoke first, he was
particularly careful to speak last, or not to speak at all;
suppressing his own wishes, feelings, and opinions, to
promote
the general harmony. A retiring man was
Shiverton
,
and he obtained an occupation wherein his main
intercourse was with his pen and with columns of figures,
so that he still could be seen and not heard, according to
the regulation which governed his childhood. He stooped
as he walked, that his superiority of height (for Shiverton
had stretched in longitude far beyond his unpretending
wishes) might be lost, as it were, in the smaller crowd;
and he went home, as far as it was possible to do so, by
the alley way, to escape the ostentation of parading the
thoroughfares, and to elude the embarrassing operation
of returning salutations to those with whom he was
unavoidably
acquainted. What would Shiverton Shakes
not have given if he had known nobodyif there were
nobody here but himself, or if he could consume this
troublesome how d'ye do existence in a back room,
up three pair of stairs, where no one could by possibility
come? And his bashfulness grew by being indulged.
He suffered, not only by the painful sensations of his
own timidity, but more by the thought that others
likewise
saw into his perturbations, and derived enjoyment
from his internal distress. He appropriated every laugh
to himselfhe could not think that when he was within
range of observation, there could reasonably be any
other jest so likely to provoke a smile; and when people
talked together with mirthfulness on their countenance,
he was sure that the awkwardnesses and defects of
Shiverton
Shakes were under discussion. He had never heard
of any thing else at home, and he always felt as if he
were a discreditable intruder, who ought, if any thing, to
apologize for having come into this breathing world at
all. Had there been such a thing as a back door to our
sublunary sphere, he would certainly have opened it, if
it could have been done without noise, and have crept
out, glad to escape into the immeasurable solitude of
ether.
But a retreat of this sort is not possible, according to
existing planetary arrangements, without a recourse to
means to which Shakes had a repugnance. The
sensibility
of his nervous system rejected the thought of a cold
bath by midnight, with brickbats in his vest and paving
stones in his coat pocketsthe pistol is a means of
dismissal
altogether too noisy for the retiring disposition, and
the elevation of the cord shows an aspiring temper which
would not have been at all characteristic in Shiverton
Shakes. Besides, a jury in such cases generally looks
for the impulsive reason, and how ridiculous it would
seem to be returned in the newspapers, as one who had
voluntarily gone defunct through lack of brass! Such an
imagination could not be entertained even for an instant.
There would be more chuckling than ever. Shiverton
resolved to liveto be Shakes to the end of his
terraqueous
term, no matter how unpleasant it might be.
Still, however, manuvre as one may, we cannot
always avoid contact with the world in some of its phases.
Invitations will come, for instance, from which there is
no moral possibility of evasion. To be very unwell,
sometimes answers a good purpose, if indeed these dodging
purposes be ever good, when the motive is simply a dodge
from a failure in self-reliance. It will do to have prior
engagements occasionally when none such exist, and the
pressure of business at certain seasons may be extreme;
but, exert ourselves to that end as we may, there are few
individuals who can contrive to be ill all the time, or
always to have a prior engagement, or to be busy so
continually
as not to have an evening to spare; and then a
point blank
non inventus
, without the shadow of a
palliation
,
is scarcely to be attempted under certain
circumstances
.
It requires the imperturbable solidity of a dead
wall to be guilty of it. It sits upon the soul like a
night-mare
,
and the guilty wakes next morning with a
conscience
as heavy as a millstone. Shiverton Shakes was
cornered by such an invitationto a dance of the most
extensive and brilliant descriptionin honour of the
marriage
of the daughter of one concerning whom he had
post mortem
expectationsexpectations which he fondly
dreamed would productively survive the individual who
had given rise to them. It was, therefore, what we may
call, for want of an established phrase to describe it, the
invitation undeniablethe trident of an appeal, which
forks on either side and pins one through the body. It
was an invitation which, with all Shiverton's agile
practice
in this respect, he could neither leap over nor
creep under. It was not to be got round, on the right
hand or upon the left. It enflanked and enfiladed
encircled
and hemmed in. Yet, if boldly faced, it was
obvious
that Shiverton Shakes could not help being, to some
extent at least, a feature on the occasionoccasions, like
countenances, must have features, or they cease to be
occasions. But to be suddenly elevated into a feature
projected from the level into a promontory, like some
diver duck of a volcanic islandwhen we are not used
to itwhen we don't know how! Who, in such a crisis,
could avoid feeling like Shakes? To be a protuberance
a carda first or a second fiddle, with no acquaintance
with the bow and innocent of rosinto dance with the
brideto be fascinating to the maidsto make himself
generally agreeable, he, who had never before been on
such hard dutyto be easy, graceful, and witty
preposterous
and pestiferous! cried Shiverton Shakes;
me making myself agreeable! I should like to catch
myself at it.
Shiverton was haunted by Mrs. Marygold's note. In
his dreams, it was like the air drawn dagger of the tragedy.
10
It seemed to marshal him the way he was to go, and
beckoned him on, not to Duncan's surceaseDuncan
surceased in the darkthe fewer witnesses the better
but to something much worse, in his fearful estimation
to violins and laughterto smiles and complimentsto
airs and gracesto silks and cologneblooming
bouquets
,
pearly teeth and sparkling eyesmore terrible to
him than frowning ramparts and stern artillery.
Shiverton sat alone in his chamber. The lamp burned
dimly, and the fatal note, its perfume not yet departed,
lay before him.
There's my ankle, said he, after a gloomy pause,
if I could only sprain it now, without hurting myself
muchsprain it gentlybut nothat wont dothey'd
guess in a minuteand I couldn't very conveniently
contrive
to break my neck for a day or two, by way of
something original; but I almost wish it was broke. It
would save a fellow a great deal of trouble. I should
like to raise a fever, if I only knew how; but I can't find
a headache with all the shaking I can give it. Perhaps
it wouldn't do to be found `no more' when they came to
call me to breakfast, on the morning of this horrible
dance; but I wish I was no moreI wish I never had
been more at all. But more or less, I must go, if an
earthquake does not intervene, or if there is not a blow
up of some sort. But these things never happen when
they're wanted. I never found the dentist out in my life
when I was to be hurt. There are matters which can't
postpone. Hanging day is hanging day, whether it rains
or shines, and then hanging day is never yesterdayI
don't mind things when they're pasthanging day is
always to-morrow or to-daysomething to come
something
that's not done, but must be done. It appears to
me that I'm never done, but always doinggoing to be
done.
After this escapade, Shiverton was moodily silent
expressionless outwardly, save in the uneasy transposition
of his pedal extremities, while his brows were knitting
like a weaver's loom.
If they'd let me be, nowbut they wontthey never
do, continued he sharply; let me be in a corner, or in
the refreshment room, eating things and drinking things
cracking nuts, or forking pickled oysters, or spooning in
ice cream, and nobody looking onit always chokes me
when anybody's looking onthings wont get on the spoon,
and my plate is sure to spill and run overif they'd do so,
I'd be able to get along well enough; but then I must go
in among the ladiesthere's nothing scares me more than
ladiesgood-looking ladies particularlyI can't talk to
themthey frighten me like Old Scratch. Yet I've got
all the books about manners, in that closet`American
Chesterfield,' `Etiquette,' and all thatwhy don't
somebody
publish how to flourish away in other people's
houses, so we can learn it in three lessons, like French,
Italian and Spanish? That's the kind of cheap literature
I want.
At last he sprung impatiently from his chair, and the
clock struck one.
Since I must go to Mrs. Marygold's whether I will
or not, I had better begin to practise as soon as possible
practise tea partyand Shiverton brushed up his hair
and pulled down his wristbands; that's the way, I
suppose
.Now
I come in, so, and he threw his head aside
in a languishing mannerHope you're very well, Mrs.
Marygoldthat chair's the old ladyhow dee doo, Mrs.
Marygoldhow's Bob?no, not Bobhow is Mr.
Robert?then that bedpost's the old mancompliments
to the old manthat wash-stand is the young ladies, all
of a bunchyour most obedient, says I, in a sort of
off-hand
waymost obedient to the wash-stand, and a sort
of a slide all round. Pooh! it's easy enough, if you go
right at itwho's afraid? Ha! ha! and Shiverton
became
excited, bowing about the room. Dance! why
yes, to be sure I will. Pleasure of dancing with Miss
Slammerkin?ho! ho! tolderol! tolderol! chassez across
swing cornersslambang! pigeon-wing!
Shiverton's operations in this matter were rather of the
old school; more, it is to be presumed, from the dash of
desperation that tinged his spirit at the time, than from
any other cause; and so, forgetting, if he ever knew it,
the easy, unambitious and nonchalant manner of the
modern
ball-room, he set arms and legs agoing with the
whirligig vigour and expansive reach of a windmill. The
floor creaked and trembledthe windows rattled and
shook; but still he danced away with the concentrated
energy of one who had business would employ an
age, and but a moment's time to do it in. He was, in
fact, and without being conscious of it, realizing a great
moral and physiological truth. His mental uneasiness
found relief in physical action, on the principle which
renders the body restless when the mind is disturbed,
that the superabundance of the nervous force may be
diverted
from our thoughts to our muscles. Care and
bashfulness
seemed to be driven away together. The rust
flew off, and a momentary hardness and transient polish
appeared.
He upset the chair. Mrs. Marygold's done for,
said he, in breathless exultation. Crash went the table.
Supper's overlet's waltz! Taglioni and Queen
Victoria
who's
afraid! I knew I only wanted to begin, to
go ahead of D'Orsay! and he flew round like a top, to
the complete discomfiture of the Dukedom of Hereford
and those movables.
Murder!or fire!or thieves!or something!
screamed Mrs. Fitzgig, the landlady, as she awoke in
trepidation from her slumbers, the more appalled because
it was impossible to imagine what was the matter.
Terror
is never so terrific as when we do not know what
terrifies us. Boh! cried in the dark, will unsettle the
firmest nerves, because it has never yet been decided
exactly what Boh! means. People will tremble and
run at Boh! who do not shrink from surgery or from
an unpaid bill.
The uproar continued, and at last Mrs. Fitzgig, with
her boarders, men, women and children, leaped from their
beds and rushed, blanketed and sheeted, to the scene of
action.
Shiverton Shakes is crazyrun for Doctor Slop!
Shave his head! said one.
Knock him down! exclaimed another.
Law suz! pathetically cried Mrs. Fitzgig, looking
at the devastationWhat's all this?
It's tea-partyit's hopit's ball! shouted
Shiverton
,
for once grown bold, and seizing upon his landlady
Why don't you jump along?swing around
practice
makes perfect!
The laughter, loud and long, which followed these
explanatory exclamations, brought Shiverton Shakes to
his senses, and awakened him from his dream of
ball-room
triumph, as if he had suddenly been subjected to
the tranquillizing influence of a shower-bath.
Exercisenothing but exercisebad healthtoo
much confined, muttered hea man must have
exercise
.
But two o'clock in the morning's not the time, is it?
and breaking things is not the way, I guess, said Mrs.
Fitzgig, sulkily. Shiverton Shakes paid the damages,
but the balance of ridicule was not so easily settled. It
is a strange thing, too, that the rehearsal should be a
subject
of derision, when the deed itself is rather
commendable
10*
than otherwise. If a man is found making speeches
to himself, people will regard it as a joke, and should he
be discovered taking off his hat to his own reflection in
the mirror, that he may bow with grace in the street, and
perform his
devoir
to fair damsels with becoming elegance,
why he would never hear the last of it. Always turn the
key, and speak softly when practising gentlemanly
deportment
to supposititious society. If you experience a
lack of preparatory drill in the art of making yourself
peculiarly agreeable, go through your discipline in the
vacant garret, and should there be no bolt to the entrance,
keep your face to the door, that you may confront the
sudden intruder, with a vacant countenance and the
fragment
of a tune, as if nothing in the world were the
matter
.
Demosthenes himself must have felt what is now
termed flat, when detected shoveling flints into his
mouth, to turnpike his vocalities, and to Macadamise the
way for his oratorical genius. To do such things is
praiseworthy. To be surprised in the act, is the offence.
The spirit of Lycurgus survives in the nineteenth century,
and the Spartans were not alone in thinking that it is not
the deed, but the discovery, which is to be reproved.
Shakes found it so, when jeered for his social training.
And, in referring to this popular contradiction, which
asks for the thing, and in some sort derides one of the
means of obtaining it, we cannot refrain from introducing,
as an illustration, a colloquy in which our hero bore a part.
It was in the evening, at Mrs. Fitzgig'sShakes was
forlornly looking into the firebut few of the family
remained
,
and Mr. Dashoff Uptosnuff, a gentleman
probably
of northern descent, but professing to know a thing
or two in the west, twisted his moustache, adjusted his
flowing locks, and ceased for a moment to admire his legs.
Shakes, said Dashoff Uptosnuff, this sheepishness
of yours will never do, at your time of life.
I know it, replied Shakes, with a sigh; it never
did do, and I don't think it's going to do. But what am
I to do?
Do! where's the difficulty?do like other people
do like medo, and don't be done. I tell you what it
is, Shakes, there's a double set of principles in this world,
one of which is to talk about, and the other to act upon
one is preached, and the other is practised. You've got
hold, somehow, of the wrong setthe set invented by
the knowing ones, to check competition and to secure all
the good things for themselves. That's the reason people
are always praising modest merit, while they are pushing
along without either the one or the other. You always
let go, when anybody's going to take your place at table
you always hold back, when another person's wanting the
last of the nice things on the dish. That's not the way
bow and nod and show your teeth with a fascination, but
take what you want for all that. This is manners
knowing the world. To be polite, is to have your own
way gracefullyother people are delighted at your style
you have the profit.
But I'm ashamedwhat would people think?
Why, Shiverton Shakes, if you only learn to
understand
the hocus pocus of it, they'll think of you just what
you wish them to think. Don't be afraid of other people
other people is a goose. Hav'n't you found that out
yet? Who is ever afraid of people when he knows them
welllives in the same house with them? You're not
afraid of Mrs. Fitzgig; you're not afraid of meyou're
not afraid of the washerwomannot much afraid, even
when you owe her for the last quarter. Confidence is
only carrying out the principlelook upon everybody
as me, or Mrs. Fitzgig, or the washerwoman. That's
the way to do. As for your not knowing people, it
amounts to nothingit's often an advantagefor then
you may fairly conclude they don't know you. How are
battles gained? Because the party who run away, don't
know that their enemies were just about to do the same
thingthey don't know that their opponents were as
much scared as themselves. Look bluff, and the day's
your own. Nobody sees beyond appearances.
Yes, but I can't do as you adviseI think I can
sometimes, when no person's by; but when I come to
try it, I can'tI feel somy heart bumps somy tongue's
so dry, and I always tumble over things and tread on
somebody's toe. I'm sure to tread on somebody's toe.
Shiverton, you're a melancholy victim to the errors
of education and the wrong set of principles, or you
wouldn't tread on other people's toesnot so they'd
know it, even if you had to step over their heads. If
you only understand how, you can do what you please.
The style is all. Ah, continued Dashoff Uptosnuff,
falling
into a philosophic reverie, what a world of blunders
is this! They've got free schools and high schools, and
universities and colleges,they learn to cipherto read
languagesto understand mathematics and all sorts of
thingscomparatively useless thingsbut who is taught
confidencethat neat kind of confidence which don't look
like confidencewho is taught to converse, when in that
lies all the civil engineering of life, which shaves the
mountain from our path, tunnels the rocks and lifts us to
the top of the social Alleghanies? Who learns at school
how to make a bow, or to get a wife with a hundred
thousand dollars or upwards? Where, in short, is that
professorship which shows us the road to success, and
indicates
how we are to live without work, the great secret
at which we are all struggling to arrive? As things are
managed now, we are soldiers sent to the battle before
we have learned to tell one end of our muskets from the
other; and before we have discovered where to insert the
load and where to place the priming, the war is over and
we are among the killed, wounded and missing. Is'nt
it doleful?
Very, said Shiverton, mournfully.
Well, now, for my part, I don't see the trouble, said
Mrs. Fitzgig; why can't a man buck up?
Nor I, added Miss Jemima Fitzgig, who wanted to
be Mrs. something. It is the easiest thing in the world
to get along, especially among ladies, and she glanced
tenderly at Mr. Dashoff Uptosnuff.
You must make an effort, Shivertonone plunge and
all will be overgo to Marygold's determined on
boldness
.
Sooner or later, you must begin. It is impossible
to dodge in this way for ever.
What a happy thing it would be if the determination
were the achievementif I will were the
consummation
if,
by one potent screw upon the organ of firmness,
the little troop of faculties which make up our identity,
could be wheeled into the unshrinking and impenetrable
Macedonian phalanx, and if there could be no uneasy
intervention
of doubtful thoughts between the firm resolve
and its execution.
I will, said Shiverton, and he did.
He didbut how? Let us not anticipate. Let us
sooner pause before ringing up for the catastrophe of this
painful drama, and rather seek metaphysically to know
why it was a painful history and why it had a catastrophe
why any of us have catastrophesfor catastrophe is
not necessary to our nature. If the faculties were in
equipoise, we should never fallShiverton Shakes would
not have fallen. We are, to a certain extent,
rope-dancers
here belowSeiltanzersHerr Clines; and there
is truth in the Mahommedan supposition that we cross the
gulf upon a bridge finer than a hair. Any internal force,
therefore, in excess or in deficiency, swerves us from the
right line, and we run the risk of being impinged upon
an adverse catastrophical circumstance, having the
melancholy
preferment of serving to point a moral and adorn
a tale. Our vices are our virtues running to riot and
pushing into the extreme, and all human impulses are
good, in subordination and in their place. It is their
morbid, unwholesome condition which makes our trouble.
There is no sinfulness in thirst, if the proper means are
used to quench it; nor is ambition unholy, if it only seeks
honourable and useful distinction among men.
Acquisitiveness
is derided; but a subdued acquisitiveness is
requisite, if we would not be a burden to our friends and
subject old age to the degradation of being a charge upon
the public purse. Even angerthe combativeness and
destructiveness of modern definitionis essential to our
well-being, as a defensive means, and that the oppressor
may fear to set his heavy foot upon us. We are, in
short, good people enough in the constituents of our
individuality
all
the materials are respectable in
themselves
;
it is the quantity of each which causes the
disturbance
.
Too much courage makes the bullytoo little
shrinks into the coward. A modicum of self-esteem
induces
us to scorn meannesswith too large a share, our
pride becomes an insult and an outrage. The love of
approval gives amiability to our deportment; but it may
run into perking vanity and ambling affectation. Happy
they whose blood and judgment are so well
commingled
,
that they can march with a steady step and
have no reason for pausing analysis to learn why they
stumble.
Now the psychological ship of Shakesthe vessel
which carried this Csar and his fortuneswas defective
in its trimthe ballast was badly stowedtoo much by
the head or too much something else, which prevented
it from working shipshape and Bristol fashion. His
deference to other people had been nourished to an
extent which cast a destructive shadow over his other
faculties, and his firmness and self-reliance had probably
left hollows in his pericranium. But it was not altogether
that he placed no sufficient estimate upon himselfthere
were timestimes aparttimes of retiracy, when he felt
as good as youperhaps better, and it may be that it
was an overweening desire to fill out his fancy sketch of
himselfto be a sublime Shakesthe embodiment of
his own conceptionwhich gave such paralyzing force
to the eye of the observerthat Mrs. Grundy whose
criticism we all fear, more or less, and made him either
shrink from the effort, or fail miserably when he did
venture
on the attempt. Was it at all thus with Shakes?
There are such apparent contradictions in humanity.
But who is clairvoyant enough to penetrate into the
mental council-chamber, and discover what we scarce
know ourselves?
It was cold and dark, but yet a man in a cloak walked
uneasily up and down the street. Lights beamed from
the windows and carriages drove up to the door of a
mansion
,
upon which his earnest regards seemed to be fixed.
Now, I will, said he, pausing under the trees; no,
not yetI can wait a little while longer.
I wish it was to-morrow, or some time next week,
muttered he. I wish I was a chimney-sweep, for they
are all a-bedI wish I was that limping fellow with a
bad cold, crying oystershe don't wear white kidsI
almost wish I had an attack of apoplexy, and somebody
was rolling me along on a wheelbarrow.
Now for it! and he dashed desperately up the steps
and seized the bell-handle with unflinching fingersbut
he did not pulllike the renowned King of France,
he walked gently down again.
I think I should like a little hot whisky punch,
sighed he; very strong whisky, and remarkable hot
punch.
It is an anti-temperance weakness, no doubt; but still
there are passages in most men's lives when they feel the
very want expressed by Shiverton Shakeswhen they
would like a puncha strong punchto make them
go. But such punches are apt to become bad punches
to punch out one's brains. If you cannot get along
without
punch, you had better not go at all.
But nowho's afraid?Uptosnuff will laugh if I
don'there goes! and the bell rang loudly.
Shiverton Shakes had committed an errornothing
daunts a man of his infirmity more than unaccustomed
garments. One who is at ease in a familiar coat, feels
embarrassed in a new dress. Shakes had caused his hair
to be curledit pulled in every direction. His white
gloves were rather of the tightesthis satin stock had
not yet the hang of his neckhis pumps uncomfortably
usurped the place of his expanded bootshis coat had
only come home that afternoon. He had practised to
dance, but it was not a full dress rehearsal. His white
waistcoat and his snowy gloves were ever in his eye;
he saw himself continually, and there is nothing worse
than to see one's self, under circumstances of restraint
to be reminded all the time that yourself is there.
Shiverton
had that species of consciousness which poetic souls
have attributed to the poker. He felt like a catapult,
without hinge or joint. He was cold at the
extremities
.
If nobody knew me, I wouldn't care so much,
quoth he.
But Uptosnuff was unexpectedly therethere before
him.
Now, Shivertonyour respects to the hostess
graceful
and rather affectionate.
I wish he hadn't said that, growled Shiverton, as
he made his way, as if travelling on eggs, through the
gayly dressed throng to Mrs. Marygold, who stood in all
the splendors of matronly embellishment.
Mrs. MarygoldI'm veryhow d'yehope you're
good eveninghow'syes, ma'am, ejaculated
Shiverton
,
spasmodically.
Ah, ha! Shiverton! rejoiced to see you, said Mr.
Marygold, a jocular gentleman, with a mulberry nose;
got over your bashfulness, I suppose.
Yees, responded Shiverton, with a mechanical
effort at a smile, in which the mouth went into attitude,
curving toward the ears, while the rest of the face kept
its rigid, stony appearance.
Glad of itplenty of pretty girls herecome, let me
make you acquainted.
No, thank youI'd rather
Now's your time, Shiverton, whispered Uptosnuff,
keep it updon't flinch.
Mr. Shakes, bashful Mr. Shakes, Miss Simpkins
very desirous of dancing with you. Didn't you say so?
observed the jocular Mr. Marygold.
NoyesIoh!veryit's getting warm, and
Shiverton Shakes sat forcibly down upon the elderly Mrs.
Peachblossom, who shrieked aloud, while Shakes sprang
up with amazement: just as I expectedright on
somebody's
toe!
Never mindpersevere, whispered Uptosnuff.
Nobody's hurt. Now be boldit's much easier than
being timid.
I will, said Shiverton, drawing down his
waist-coat
;
11
I willkeep near me, but don't look at me
and Shiverton led his partner to the dance, resolved at
all hazards to try the advice of his friend. But when the
dance began, he suddenly felt as if ten thousand eyes were
upon himhis little knowledge of the subject, picked up
long time ago, deserted from his memory. It was all
confusion, and every attempt to guide his erratic steps
made the confusion worse confounded. Now, Mr.
Shakesthere, Mr. Shakes, and here, Mr. Shakes,
only served to mystify his perceptions still more deeply,
as, driven to desperate courses, he danced frantically
about, in the vain hope that lucky chance might put him
upon that undiscovered and apparently undiscoverable
clue to the labyrinth, to which, it was plain, direction
could not lead him.
Whew!Uptosnuff, panted Shiverton, during a
prelude to a new complication of dance and suffering,
when the tamborine rang out, and when the yellow man
in ear-rings was evidently inhaling volumes of the
atmosphere
,
to aid him in calling figures in that as yet unknown
tongue and untranslated language which dancers alone
comprehend. Uptosnuff, I can't stand thiswhat
shall I do?
I cannot telldid you ever try to faint? replied
Uptosnuff.
Yah-yaydoo yandleming foo-yay! shouted the
yellow man in ear-rings.
Jang-jingler-a-a-n-g foodle, said the tamborine.
Shaw-shay!
If Shiverton could have reached the yellow man, there
would have been an end to the ear-rings; but as this
was out of the question, he shut his eyes and set his arms
and legs in action with an unlimited power of attorney,
and, though he went many ways, it happened, with a
perversity peculiar to Terpsichorean tyros, that he never
hit upon the right way, at the right time; for, in these
matters, the right soon becomes wrong.
The company began to gather round, to witness this
extraordinary and extemporaneous performance.
'Pon my soul, if I don't think it's animal magnetism,
remarked a scientific looking individual, with a bald head
and green spectacles. He's mesmerizedhe's under
the influence of the fluid.
I wish I was, thought Shiverton, as he bounded
like a kangaroo, catching his rearward foot in the flowing
robes of Miss Simpkins, and oversetting the one lady
forward, as he himself came lumbering to the floor.
All was chaos.
Intoxicated!
Insane!
Insufferable!
Infamous!
Satisfaction! said whiskers.
Shiverton scrambled to his feet, and stared wildly
around.
Shiverton Shakes, I never could have believed that
you would have come to my house, in such a condition,
said Mrs. Marygold, in awful tones.
Shiverton Shakes, I've done with you for ever, said
the old gentleman.
My friend will wait on you in the morning, remarked
whiskers.
Beat a retreat, Shivertonyou're Waterloo'd,
hinted
Uptosnuff.
Sauve qui peut
. It's too late to faint
nowwhy didn't you lie still, to be picked up?
Shiverton charged like a conscript of the French
republic
,
without much science, but with inflexible will, at
what he thought to be an open doorit was a costly
mirror; but, though a deceptive appearance, it did not
take him inhe rebounded, amid the crash of glass.
Shrieks of dismay arose on every side; but Shiverton,
having now a clearly defined object in view, bent up
each corporal agent to this terrible feat, and overthrew
all impediment, including stout Mrs. Marygold and sundry
other obstacles which were in the way of his recoil, to
say nothing of John with the refreshments, who was thus
deluged in lemonade, and the cabman at the door, who
was summarily taught how to execute a backward
summerset
down a flight of steps.
Shiverton reached home, breathless, hatless, cloakless,
and in despaira melancholy example of the perilous
consequences of endeavouring to assume a virtue, if you
have it not.
A man must be brought up to it, soliloquized
Shiverton
,
when he had recovered coolness enough to think,
and had kicked his kid gloves indignantly into a corner;
at least, I'm sure that this spontaneous combustion sort
of way of going at it, will never answer for me. If I
could now, little by little, just dip in a footwet my
headslide in graduallybecome accustomed and
acquainted
by degrees, and not be spoken to or bothered at
firstbegin where I wasn't known, or where people don't
laugh at every thing so confoundedly. But noI'm
done forthis blow up at Marygold'sI can never show
my head again, and he buried himself in the blankets,
as if he never more wished to be looked upon by the
surrounding world.
This was the first and last attempt of Shiverton Shakes
to gain a footing in society. He held no more intercourse
with Dashoff Uptosnuff; for, although he admitted the
correctness of that individual's theory, still he had an
overwhelming consciousness of inability to carry it into
effect. He bought him a turning lathe, and made
knick-knacks
in the long winter evenings, smoked cigars, and
tried to read Gibbon's Decline and Fall of the Roman
Empire. He would have liked to have a wife, but the
process of getting one was too much for his nervous
sensibilities
;
so he dined at an ordinary and made his own
tea and toast, being literally and truly an unexpressed
ideaan undeveloped capability.
11*
THE BOYS THAT RUN WITH THE ENGINE.
We
are deceived. There is not so much inequality of
talent as the world supposes. From the earliest ages,
there has been a conspiracy of caste, to blind and to
mislead
the mass of mankind, by giving a monopoly of fame
to those who stand in certain positions. To all the rest,
renown has been denied, and they have been content
with a lot, not inevitable, but cunningly imposed; and
thus the world, at every period, has been converted into
a crowd of stupid starersshouters for self-constituted
idols, when, if the truth were known, thousands of those
who submit to be lookers-on, and to be shut from the
historic page altogether, not only possess genius equal to
that of the hero, but, actually, albeit in an humbler field,
give unhonoured manifestations of superior ability. The
difference is, that one man is framed, gilded, and hung
up against the wall, to be looked at and admired, while
another plods along the dusty highway, without
attracting
notice. An accident has been wanting. A
concurrence
of circumstances has brought about greatness in one
instance, when, in the other, the individual did not
happen
to be within range of the breeze of fortune at the
proper moment; and hence, his sails flap idly against the
mast, while the happier ship proudly careers across the
seas. Luck may not be a very euphonical word; but
there is much in luck. Instances of course arise, in
which the individual has not the innate force to improve
his luck, and is, therefore, rather overwhelmed than
benefitted
by it. If a man be crank, and lack ballast, he is
swamped by the prosperous gale; but there are many
others who lag behind, only because they need the
external
impetus which has been fatal to him. If, then,
any one stands before our eyes, sparkling with reputation
and glittering with glorylike Gesler's cap upon a pole,
to which all are required to bowlet us shade our eyes
from the effulgence, and do honour rather to the luck,
than to him who has been the subject of it. Let us
enquire
whether it has been his own strength of limb, or
the brawny muscle of propitious fortune, which has
borne him up the steep, and let us pay our respects
accordingly.
Glory, in the main, is a delusion. It is too often rather
a concession on our part, than a merit in him to whom it
is accorded. It is not so much the talent we admire, as
the chance which gave room for its exhibition. The
same elements of character might be at our side for a
life-time
,
and receive no appreciation. It is only when they
are successfully displayed in the arena peculiarly
dedicated
to glory, that our wonder is moved. The dexterity
of a Talleyrand may retail dry goods, but who writes the
history of him that wields a yard-stick? The strategic
talent of a Napoleon may be evinced in robbing the
watermillion patches of New Jersey; but where is the
O'Meara to note the sayings of one who expiates his
offences in a county jail? Humanity is unjust to itself.
If genius be the thing to be admired, why should it
command
our homage more readily when attired in feathers
and embroidery, than when skulking in rags and tatters?
Are the constituents of heroism less worthy when their
owner is in the hands of a constable, than when he is
incarcerated
in an island prison like St. Helena? Never
credit it. We are fools to our false views and erroneous
estimates. We are struck by the circumstance, and not
by the essential. The ragamuffin's head has not been
adorned with a laurel wreathhe never, perhaps, caused
an illumination, except when dragged from his thieving
ambush in the coal-hole, by the light of a single candle;
but analyze his actions, put his motives and his
achievements
into the crucible of philosophic reflection, and then
determine whether, in a happier sphere, he would not
have stolen crowns where he now filches shillings,
and have appropriated empires, instead of hooking
boots from an entry. Is it not true, then, that we esteem
the lucks and chances of a man, much more than we
reverence the man himself? Why, even when hero
meets hero, he receives the applause who carries off the
victory, when it is plainly apparent that accident alone
was decisive of the conflict. A chance shot disables the
frigate,the bugler is killed, and does not call boarders
to repel boarders,an aid-de-camp fails to convey
orders,a Grouchy does not bring up the reserve in
time,the success is determined by some petty failure in
the details of a masterpiece of skill, and he is hailed the
great one who stumbles into triumph. Blind luck draws
the bow-string round the neck of genius, and the goose
pecks out the eyes of the eagle.
The same injustice prevails throughout. Why should
familiarity breed contempt, but that we have what may
be called a proclivity to humbuga disposition to be
deceived? And yet it will always be found, that no man
is a hero to his valet-de-chambreno, nor to his wife, his
children, or his friends, except in some rare instances.
Who can believe that Peter, by our side,Peter, whom
we have known from childhood upwards,Peter, whom
we have rebuked, rebuffed and perhaps cuffed,who can
think that Peter is a genius? And why not Peter?who
is inevitably better than Peter? Warriors and statesmen?
They were not born warriors and statesmen. They were
once little Peters, probably Peters not so promising as
yours. Scurvy little Peters, crying on the stairs
rebuked
,
rebuffed and cuffed, no doubt, like him. But we
know Peterknow him too well, and seem to lose the
power of appreciation by that intimate knowledge; and in
this respect, as in all others, it is distance and ignorance
combined, which creates our astonishment. Thus it is,
indeed, that they err, who wish to see the great ones
close at hand; and thus the great ones err, who suffer
themselves unnecessarily to be seen close at hand. He
who really desires to enjoy the enchantment of the drama,
is not wise in thrusting himself behind the scenes. The
tyrant does not become more awful, when it is observed
that his portentous moustache and terrific eye-brow are the
product of a burnt cork; nor are the dancing-girls a whit
more full of fascination, when it appears that their roseate
blushes are the quintessence of brick-dust. And what
literary lion is there, in the long list of those who have
visited our shores, who did not lose his mane by the
adventure
?who
did not sink in public estimation, and
gradually decline from the majesty of a quadruped, into
the ordinary two-legged condition of the indigenous man?
Where, in fact, is the exception? Not one. Familiarity
is the Lion King. It reduces all such rampant
creatures
to the mere household standard, and puts them to
sleep before the fire.
But all these things are nevertheless wrong. Genius
is genius, whether the chance be afforded or not;it is
still genius, and the same genius, whether its field be
small or great;it is genius, notwithstanding, however
close it may be in our intimacy, and the truth of our
prelude
may be demonstrated in all its branches, by a slight
recurrence to the history of The Boys that run with the
Engine.
They are but imperfect observers of human nature, who
look abroad and look upwards, to note character in its
more striking developments. If their study is man, the
true materials for research are best found close at hand.
History is a falsifier. All actions, when viewed from a
distance, are seen through a distorting medium. The
so-called chronicles of the times, are but the mirage of
the desert, in which the parties represented often appear
upside down, one swelling to a gigantic stature, while
another dwindles to dwarfish proportions. Motives are
mistaken and results are exaggerated, and he who hopes,
in this way, to arrive at knowledge through the medium
of written records, must, by dint of preparatory study on
the living subject, have learned to separate the reality
from the fictitious. Cabinets and camps are well enough,
to be sure, if we are on our guard against the deceptive
glare which is almost invariably thrown around them
if we are gifted with that rare discrimination which
considers
the man himself, and not his embroidery; but, in
the generality of cases, it is our weakness to regard as
fine birds, all poultry which has been lucky enough to
trig itself out in fine feathers, and hence we are led into
errors innumerable,our swans are geese, and the
turkey
is often degraded to the rank of a buzzard. If,
however
,
we turn from courts and camps and cabinets, to the
engine houses of a great metropolis, we shall there find
action, and the springs to action,action as energetic,
and the springs to action as forcible, as are to be seen
any where,laid open to our view, without gilding and
without guile. Here is manhood in its opening flower,
in the summer morning of its restlessness. The
untrimmed
colt of aspiring ambition prances upon this plain;
a colt which may hereafter be the war-horse, with his
neck clothed in thundera more striking adornment,
as must readily be admitted, than even one of Tennent's
best fitting stocks, in all the glory of shining satin.
Diplomacy may perhaps be expanding in this group,
little restrained by the weak embraces of a thread-bare
jacket, and, by its side, stands that emulation, which
may lead to the pinnacle of fame, though at present
content
with carrying a torch, with bearing the massive
weight of a branch-pipe, with having the head of a rope,
or with having the hand of control upon the tongue of
the carriage. All propelling qualities are developed
here, and the boys that run with the engine have
within them every faculty necessary, in a more polished
condition, for the conduct of an empire.
And it is for these reasons, that the boys that run
with the engine, are deemed worthy of being sketched
by the cunning hand of the artist, and of having their
mental characteristics pourtrayed in an essay especially
devoted to the subject. Fastidious refinement may turn
its head aside in scorn, to luxuriate upon the historical
novel or the metaphysical romance, to contemplate
representations
of man as he is not, and of woman as she ought
not to be; but these things are passing away, and it is to
be the glory of our time to catch the manners living as
they rise,to look upon nothing as beneath its
notice
which contributes to modify the dispositions of the
age.
Who, let us ask, is more of a feature in the
countenance
of the times, as they exist hereabouts, than these
juvenile
Rosicruciansthese Ghebersthese modern
Fire-worshippers
?
Who stand out more prominently on the
face of things than they who, by night and by day, sweep
like the wind along the streets, and, by their obstreperous
clamour, prevent even echo from indulging in a protracted
nap? Who are more active, more courageous, more
constantly on the alert,who make more noise in the
world, or force their way more readily through every
obstruction, causing all people and all things to give way
before them, than the boys that run with the engine?
Who are more frequently heard, more often felt, or more
continually seen than these skimmers of the street, and
are they not to find a place in the portraiture of the period?
It would be a gross dereliction of duty to suffer them to
pass unheeded.
The spirit of fire, which early seizes upon a
considerable
portion of the youth of cities, is so far from
being properly subject to those who have that limited
species of control over them, which is accorded to parents
and guardians, that perhaps it may be said, there is no
other branch of insubordination which causes so much
trouble and uneasiness. To the boss, whose
apprentices
have reached the state of development necessary for
the reception of the fever, an alarm of fire is a perfect
horrornot because his sympathies with the probable
sufferer are excessivenot because he mourns over the
ragings of the destructive element; but because he knows
that, under such circumstances, his authority is
neutralized
and negativedthat his influence is so far gone that
moral suasion will not keep his boys to their work,
and that, if he expects that the shop is not to be left to
take care of itself, he must prevent its depopulation by
bringing the strong arm in play. To lock the door is
not sufficient, while windows remain practicable, and
even should the windows be hermetically sealed, egress
by the chimney would not be thought too much of a feat
to meet the call of paramount duty. Should the alarm
come in the night, it is in vain that the old manall
superiors are old men, in modern phraseology, and our
standing in that respect is measured by rank, not years
has made all fast and gone chuckling to bed, with the key
under his pillow. He forgets that sheds and fences and
out-houses are as available to intrepidity as a staircase, and
that the boy that runs with the engine can travel over
the exterior of a house with as little embarrassment as if
the laws of gravitation exercised no influence over him
that, with his jacket under his arm and his boots slung
about his neck, no denizen of the forest can run up
perpendiculars
more cleverly than he; and, while the
aforesaid
boss notes the heavy eyes and nodding heads
which hang during the day so listlessly over their task,
he never arrives at the true secret until he discovers that
there was a fire last night. Little did he dream
poor unsuspicious soul!when the midnight bell struck
on his ear, and he turned him again to sleep, after
ascertaining
the key to be safe in its snug positionthat Tom
and Dick and Ben, and all the rest, were off in triumph,
and that the energies which should have been expended
in his service, according to the articles of apprenticeship,
had been exhausted in extinguishing far distant flames.
He never thought that those hoarse yells, which broke his
rest with momentary dismay, emanated from most familiar
voices, nor that the unintelligible, but none the less
fearful
on that account, waugh-baugh-wulla-balloo! which
sounded so dreadfully before his door, mingled with the
clanging of the bell and the fitful glancing of torches, was
a derisive cry, uttered for his especial edification, by one
of those whom he believed still to be slumbering in the
garret. Nor when at breakfast time, he told the lads how
loud was the alarm last night, and how the signal
indicated
that the danger lay nor-west, did he mark the
cunning wink which stole from eye to eye, in mockery
of the ignorance that would give them information upon
a subject so familiar. Why the lads are all so harsh in
their tones, he cannot imagine, unless it be that the
influenza
is about; but he does think that the variety of soil
upon their boots, indicates the fact of more previous travel
than he was aware of. At such times also, there are apt
to be unaccountable deficiencies in the quantity of cold
provisions in the cellar, which are scarcely to be attributed
to the gastronomic performances of a single cat. The
amateur fireman, on the return from service, is apt to
12
feel the calls of appetite, and as he is, as it were, a
principle
essential to the well-being of real estate, he takes
due care to nourish himself accordingly.
The learned may not perhaps have taken due
cognisance
of the fact, but, in some divisions of knowledge,
the extent of information obtained by the boys that run
with the engine, is well calculated to move our wonder.
The amount of their acquaintance with local topography,
qualifies them to write articles for the Encyclopedia.
Not a court, lane or alleynot a hole nor a corner, in the
vast circumference of the town, which is not considerably
more familiar to them than a glove. They are the
Plutarchs
of fire-plugs, knowing the history of each, and the
comparative merits of all. At every conflagration within
their experience, they can tell what engines were in
service
,
what hose companies had attachments, and how
many feet of hose were brought in playwho was earliest
on the ground, and obtained the most effective position,
with many other particulars with which the world, greatly
to its disadvantage, is never likely to become conversant.
If it were the nature of the boys to write, the annals
of the parish, as they would record them, could not fail
to form a whole library in itself.
On the score of emulation too, these lads are not to be
surpassed by the most ambitious of ancient or modern
times. Other people are regardful of creature comforts.
They will break away from the most interesting
employment
,
because dinner is ready, or because the hour has
come when they are in the habit of imbibing tea. When
the time arrives for going to bed, they cease from their
labours and get them to repose. They are slaves to
routine, and must travel continually in the accustomed
circle, or they are wretched in proportion to the extent to
which they have deviated; but it is not so with the
boys that run with the engine. The eccentricity is their
delight. Rest, sleep, food, are nothing to them when
weighed in the balance with the pleasure of dragging a
heavy machine through the mud; and, that they may be
first at the engine house, they have often been known, on
the frostiest night, to leap from their warm couches,
rushing forth with their garments in a bundle, to dress
when they had reached their destination. Can
disinterestedness
,
generous emulation and glowing ambition,
attain a more exalted climax than this? It does not lie
within the range of possibility, and the higher value will
be affixed to it, when it is remembered that many of
these young youths have quite another character in the
more ordinary affairs of life. In matters of mere domestic
concernment, they who will labour so strenuously in the
cause of the engine, are, in frequent instances, found to be
in no way addicted to excessive exertion. A night alarm
will draw those from their beds, who are not easily
enticed
therefrom at the call of business; and the most
lethargic lounger that ever dozed when he should have
been waking, or that ever skulked when work was at
hand, will cheerfully encounter any toil, if it happen to be
connected with the duties of the hose house.
The leading characteristic, however, of the class to
which we refer, is valourenterprise, energy and
valour
.
Where could a nobler combination be discovered?
Next to a fire, the most glorious object to their view, is
a fight. But when both unitewhen a fight is found at
a fire, and when the fire lights the way to a fight, who
are happier than the boys that run with the engine?
And reason good, if it be true that martial heroism is a
matter worthy of our aspirations. The elements of war
conjoin. The flames cracklethe fierce hurrah goes up
columns chargethe heavy artillery comes lumbering
through the pressshrieks, groans, imprecations and
denunciations
,
are mingled thick with blows and thrusts.
The glittering trumpet takes the place of the flashing
sabre, and quick as lightning, cuts six upon the head
and shoulders of the foe, stretching him senseless in the
kennel. The massive spanner makes short work of
the stoutest tarpaulin, and though the combatants may
long for the bullet, yet those who have had much
experience
in the force of projectiles, have discovered that but
for the name of the thing, brickbats are likely to answer
just as well. All the joy of conflict is called forth in
such a field. It is not the distant and cold-blooded
courtesy
of scientific manuvre, where legs usurp the
prerogative
of armsit is the forlorn hope, the escalade, the
storm, the hand-to-hand engagement, developing the
worth of the individual and giving scope to personal
prowessthis is what invests it with fascination for the
engine boy; and what more could be accomplished, even
at a Waterloo, than to be picked up for dead and carried
home on a shutter? The essentials of glory are every
one attainable in such a struggle, and it is but that
short-sightedness
on the part of the world, to which we have
already alluded, which prevents the proper distribution
of praise. It is true that the scarred veteran obtains no
pension to compensate for his knocks; but does that argue
that they did not smart as much as wounds that are better
paid for? The victor receives neither title nor riband;
but, in all likelihood, he has been quite as cruel, brutal and
oppressive, to the extent of the opportunity, as if he were
honoured with both.
In all associations, whether of men, boys or sheep,
there is invariably a bell-wethera master spirit; one
who affords colour to their modes of thought, and furnishes
aim for their actionswho warms their spirit when their
courage flagswho lends them enterprise when they
falter, and gives concentration to their efforts. In an
extended
sphere, such individuals bestow character on
nations
and on ages, leaving their impress upon all, and, in
a more confined circle, the personal stamp, though not so
widely spread, is made with equal distinctness. In the
group which forms the subject of our story, such a one
will be seen in the person of Hickey Hammer,he who
leans against the wall, with club in hand and with a most
majestic sternness in his countenancehe, with the
game-cock
look all over himhe, whose combativeness and
destructiveness are so prominent as to render it
unavoidable
to wear his hat aslant, that, on one side at least, these
organs may be comparatively cool, to ensure safety to his
friendshe, Hickey Hammer, who has fierceness enough
in his composition to furnish a whole menagerie, and yet
leave sufficient surplus to animate and constitute a
warrior
.
Were there ample swing for Hickey Hammer
had we the delights of civil war, or the charms of a
revolution
,
there would be one more added to the list of
heroes, and another picture would figure in the print shops.
But as it is, Hickey contrives to find some vent for his
inspiration, by getting up a quarrel about once a day, and
nourishing it into a genial combatotherwise, he would
explode from the attrition of his own fiery spirits. Hickey
Hammer runs with the engine, because it goes to fight
fire, and he almost wishes that he were a bucket of water,
to grapple more directly with so fierce a foe. So
irresistible
is his call to contend, that he is obliged to gratify
it, whether there be an object present or not. When he
goes to bed at night, or when he rises in the morning, the
exercise of his muscles is an invariable concomitant.
He strikes the air, parries imaginary blows, and passes
through all the action of a heady fight, with an energy
that is really alarming. Every door in the house bears
the imprint of his knuckles, and the very tables are
splintered
by the weight of his fist. The cocked hat is to
him the beau ideal of shapes, and he labours to knock all
12*
things into that antiquated resemblance. Should old time
venture within reach of his arm, the existing moment
would at once be converted, by a similar process, into
the middle of next week.
It will be seen that one of his devoted admirers is
endeavouring
to tell him a story about a Mr. Tompkins,
who had recently distinguished himself at a fire, and that
Hickey Hammer listens with his usual scornful
impatience
.
Tompkins! said Hickey, on the occasion referred
to; well, and who is Tompkins, your great Tompkins?
Now I'll bring this thing to a pint at once; for when
there's so much talk, there's never a bit of fight.
I didn't say any thing about fight, was the
trembling
remonstrance of the admirer.
But you cracked Tompkins up, didn't you, and
Tompkins pretends to be great shakes, don't he? What's
that but fight, I should like to know? Now the thing,
as I said before, is just this, and no more than
this. I don't pretend to be much; but can Tompkins
lick me? Could he lick me any way, fair stand up
and no closing in, or could he do it, rough and tumble
and no letting up? Talking about people is nonsense
this is the how, to find out what a chap is good for.
Fetch on your Tompkins, and tie my right hand behind
me, if you likethat's allyes, and he shall have six
cracks at me before I begin. I'm not particular about
odds. When you see this Tompkins, tell him so, and
ask if he or his big brother, if he has got one, or any of
the family, boss and all, would like to knock a chip off
my hat any afternoon. I'll clear them of the law. I
want them to do itI'd give 'em something if they'd
do it. Just feel my armhickory and gum logs! Talk
of your Tompkinses! Who did they ever lick? I don't
even believe they were ever taken up because they were
going to fight. Only wait till there's an alarm some
Sunday, and then show me Tompkins, if you want to see
a man forget what he had for dinner.
In fact, Hickey Hammer considers himself sent here on
a special mission, to accommodate all customers, and
whenever he hears of a new comer, his first inquiry is
as to the individual's appreciation of his own prowess
whether, like Tompkins, he thinks he can lick Hickey
Hammer. If he does think so, and ventures to say so,
why, Mr. Hammer sees to it that the difference of opinion
may be settled on the spot. So great is his love of truth,
that he cannot bear to leave any one in error upon a
point of such interest and importance. Had Hammer
lived in earlier times, he would have been the very flower
of chivalryat present, he only rejoices in the distinction
of being a bird.
When squabbles are scarce and riots are a little out of
fashion, such events being somewhat epidemic, Mr.
Hammer, following the example of other great men,
makes the circumstance to suit himself, and, gathering a
flock of pupils and proselytes around him, often sets forth
on what he calls the grand rounds. This process
consists
in taking an evening ramble from one engine house
to another, to have a glance at the collection of boys
there assembled; for each establishment has its separate
set of votaries, who believe that all virtue resides in their
gang, and that all excellence is combined in their engine.
If there are enough present to render the scene impressive,
Hickey Hammer sternly confronts the strangers, and, with
a lowering aspect, thus addresses them:
Well, my lads, where's the bully?
What bully? is the natural response, from those who
are yet to be indoctrinated into Mr. Hammer's mode of
doing business.
I want to see the bully of this companyyou've got
a bully, I suppose. Everybody says so. Where is he?
Tell him to come to supper, and, that there may be no
mistake as to his meaning, Hickey throws himself into
position, dealing forth experimental blows in the very
face of the bystanders, so nicely calculated as to distance,
that they are enabled to feel the whiff and wind,
without
experiencing personal detriment, the insult being
assault enough, though rather constructive than positive,
and having no taint of battery.
If a bully be forthcoming, which is not often the case
upon an emergency so sudden and unexpected, the
consequences
are obvious. The combat either comes off at
once, or is fixed for a more convenient spot and a
subsequent
meeting. But, should the assailed party be
without
a champion, Hickey challenges any two, or more, if
they like to undertake him, and this mode of proceeding
generally results in a set-to all round, requiring a
constabulary
suppression, and furnishing material for many a
tale of traditionary narrative, in which Hickey Hammer
figures as the hero; in consequence whereof, all the
boys that run with the engine, of which Hickey
Hammer
may be regarded as the patron, are Hickey
Hammerites
in word and deed. They roll their trowsers up
higher than other boysthey roar louder than other
boys; they take the engine out on Sundays, and, if they
cannot get a fight in any other way, they dash deliberately
into every carriage that passes. Rare boys are the
boys that run with the enginethe choice and
master-spirits
of the time.
JACK SPRATTE'S REVENGE.
A PISCATORIAL EPISODE.
Do
you know Mrs. Brownstout? Everybody ought
to know Mrs. Brownstout; for Mrs. Brownstout is in the
marketnot for salematrimonially speaking, her
market
was made long ago, and thence was derived the
hearty appellation in which she rejoices. But, as she
occupies a conspicuous stand in the Fish Market, it is
therefore presumed that everybody knows Mrs.
Brownstout
,
who presides over the eventful destinies of shad
and pearch and rockfish. That is, they know her
superfishally, if we may be allowed the expression
in her commodities and in her outward appearance.
When she passes by, they possess that degree of
acquaintance
with her exterior, to enable them to say there goes
Mrs. Brownstout; and when she is seated at her stand
strange perversity of human nature, that it is always sure
to sit at its stand!people are positive that it is really
Mrs. Brownstout. They recognise her by her gait, or
by her costume, or by the piscatorial circumstances that
surround her, which is about as much as the world in
general knows of any body. But the moral Mrs.
Brownstout
the
historical Mrs. Brownstoutthe metaphysical
Mrs. Brownstoutin short, the spiritual Mrs. Brownstout,
as contra-distinguished from the apparent Mrs.
Brownstout
,
who merely sells her fishes and takes your money,
why, what does society at large know of her? To the
popular eye, she counts one in the sum total of humanity
a particle, and nothing more, in the vast
conglomeration
of the breathing universe. There is no perception
of her mental identityher intellectual idiosyncrasy
attracts no attentionher past and her future are not
inquired
intothe Mrs. Brownstout retrospective, and the
Mrs. Brownstout prospective, are equally disregarded, so
that those ambitious of shad may find her to be the Mrs.
Brownstout present; and thus the life of this estimable
lady, like the lives of most of us, is narrowed down to
the single point of immediate actionshe and we are
important only when it happens that our services are
wanted. Our storywho has not got a story?all our
beings, doings and sufferingsour loves, hopes, successes
and disappointmentsall the trouble we have takenthe
vexations we have enduredthe triumphs we have
achievedwho that encounters us in the street, ever thinks
of them, or reflects that each of us, as we pass on our
winding way, is a volume of exquisite experiences, bound
in calf, and well worthy of the closet perusal? Not one,
of all the vast multitude which throngs the path; and
hence it is that the world, collectively considered, is more
distinguished by folly than by wisdom, learning nothing
from the problems that have already been solved, but
preferring to stumble onward, from the beginning to the
end, without borrowing a ray of light from the lanterns of
those who have gone before.
But it has been resolved that Mrs. Brownstout shall not
be sacrificed in this unceremonious mannerthat some
passages of her existence shall be snatched from oblivion,
to amuse or instruct, as the case may be, at least a
portion
of those into whose hands our pages may be destined
to fall. For Mrs. Brownstout, notwithstanding the
energetic
expression of the outward woman, has had her
share of the disasters which seem inevitable to the
susceptible
temperament. She, too, has had her trials of the
heart, and has felt that though the poets seem to think
that the sphere of young love's gambols is chiefly located
among the roses, he may yet exercise much potency
when playing among the fishes. There is no scale armour
against the darts of Cupid, and, however steeled against
such impressions the fair one may be, it is found, sooner
or later, that she falls a prey to the tender passion.
It is an admitted fact, made evident by repeated
observation
,
that this world is full of peoplemen people and
women peopleand that there are some among both,
who set out and travel to a considerable distance on their
earthly journey, upon the self-sustaining principle of
celibacy, in a heroic effort not to be bothered with
appendages
,
forgetting that, by a singular provision of
nature, their proper condition is that of being bothered,
and that, though they cannot see it, they must be bothered,
to be at all comfortable. When we are alone, we are not
bothered; yet who likes to be alone?
Better dwell in the midst of alarms,
Than reign in this horrible place,
said Selkirk, in default of the noise of children and of his
wife's alarms, and Selkirk had learned that stagnation
is a tiresome piece of work. A few of those, to whom
reference is made, protract their restless and uneasy
experiment
of trying to live a quiet unperplexed life, in
which they are unquiet, and very much perplexed, until
the period for all human experiment is over. But the
great majority fail for lack of nerve, and retract, from a
late discovery of the truth. Your Benedicks and Beatrices
are almost sure to participate in the lot of those delineated
by the first of dramatiststhey are certain, somehow or
other, to sink into the very calamity against which they
formerly protested, and, in an unguarded hour, malignant
fate delights to betray them to the common weakness.
To some extent, it was the fortune of Mrs. Brownstout
to be a living illustration of the truth of this principle. In
her maiden days, Miss Felicia Phinney laughed at the
importunities of her numerous admirers. Having early
gone into the fish business, she was confident in her own
resources, and felt but little disposed to sink to a
secondary
place in the firm; and, therefore, the gentlemen in
waiting each experienced a rebuff, so sharply
administered
,
that they were but little disposed to put themselves
again in the way of being similarly astonishedas she
had a method of conducting herself little calculated to
mollify the disappointment experienced upon such
occasions
.
One nightit was a lovely night, during a warm spell
which succeeded a cold snap, in the early part of the
springshad were selling at seventy-five cents, and were
scarce at thatthe moon shone sweetly upon the
chimney-tops
the
fire-plugs, which were lucky enough to be on
the north side of the street, were tinged and tinted with
lines of fairy silver, and the beams of softened light played
with romantic effect upon the craggy sides and rough
fastnesses of the curb-stones. A balmy southern breeze
sighed through the streets and loitered round the corners
in lazy luxury, whispering soft nonsense in the ears of
the somnolent Charleys, as they dreamily indulged in
beatific visions of hot coffee and buckwheat cakes. All
nature, including the brickbats and paving-stones, seemed
to be wrapped in happy repose. The dogs barked not;
even the cats had ceased to be vocal, and when any of
these nocturnal wanderers appeared, it was plain from
their stealthy step and subdued deportment, that they, too,
felt the influence of the hour, and were unwilling to
disturb
the magnificent but tranquil harmony of the picture.
It was, in short, a very fine night, particularly for the
season, and, though used by the undiscriminating many
for the mere domestic purposes of snoring slumber, for
which the coarser kind of night would answer just as well,
yet this especial night was worthy of a more elevated
fate; and it may be regarded as a great pity that such
nights as these do not come in the daytime, when they
would be better seen and more thoroughly admiredas
sleep, for the most part, is imperative, and as there are but
few of us who can manage its performance with our eyes
open.
The main object of nights of this description, taking it
for granted that every thing has its purpose, is to soften
the heartto render it flexible, malleable, and susceptible
to the softer impressions. The sun, for instance, melts
the ice, and gives plasticity to many descriptions of candy;
but its warmest rays are ineffective, so far as the
sympathies
of the soul are concerned. No one is apt to fall in
love at mid-day, or is much disposed to a declaration of
passion, at three o'clock of a sunny afternoon. Existence,
at these periods, is, in the main, altogether practical
and unimaginativegood enough, no doubt, for buying
and selling, and the eating of dinners; but not at all
calculated
to elicit the poetry of the affections. Whereas
your moonlight evenings, when the frost is out of the
ground, play Prometheus to sentiment, and, when the
patient is not addicted to cigars and politics, both of which
are antagonistical to this species of refinement, are sure
to induce the bachelor to think that his condition is
incomplete
,
and that there are means by which he might
be made considerably happier. Thus it is that our life
is twofoldthat before tea we are one person, and that
after this interesting event, we are somebody else.
It was on such an evening as we have attempted
somewhat
elaborately to describe, and it was under such a
state of circumstances as we have incidentally alluded to,
that Jack Spratte escorted Miss Felicia Phinney home
from a tea party, given among themselves by the
fish-merchants
.
Jack Spratte had been as merry as a grigge
throughout the entertainment. He had danced and he
had sunghe had played pawns and Copenhagen
13
he had sighed in a cornerhe had loved his love
with a C, because she was curious, crusty or
crooked, and so forth; but still Jack Spratte was
heartwholesound as a roach, and as gracefully playful
as an eel. Jack Spratte, in that blind confidence for
which some men are remarkable, thought that the hook
had not yet been baited which was destined to discompose
the serenity of his gills, and that he was no catfish in a
pool, devoted to an early fry. He little dreamed that
celibacy is very unsartin, and that the cork lines and
the lay-out lines, together with the dipsies, to say nothing
of the gilling seines, the floats and the scoop-nets, are
always about, and that the most innocent nibble may
result in a captivation.
Jack Spratte was strong in spirit when he stepped forth
from the festive hall, and crooked his dexter arm for the
accommodation of Miss Felicia Phinney. He was jocose
in his criticisms and observations for a square or two, and
he reviewed the sports of the evening with a degree of
humour which entitled him to rank with the wits of the
time. But the night was one not to be resisted, even by
Jack Spratte. He soon found that his chestthe chest
enclosing his susceptibilitieswas not a safety chest,
not a fireproof asbestos chest, such as they roast under
cords of blazing hickory, and submit without damage to
vast conflagrationsbut, on the contrary, though he
never suspected it before, rather a weak chesthe had
an oppression at the chestin short, an affection of the
chest, resulting in a palpitation of the heartand his
tongue became hard and dry, while there was a peculiar
whizzing in his ears, as if the Ice-breaker were
suddenly
letting off steam. He stammered and he trembled.
It can't be the punch, observed Jack Spratte,
internally
to himself; it can't be the punch that makes
me such a Judy. I didn't take enough of it for that
no, nor do I believe it is the fried oysters; for I put plenty
of Cayenne pepper and mustard on 'em.
No, Jack Spratte; it was neither the punch nor the
oysters. They are wronged by the suspicion. It was
the moonlight, chiefly, and Miss Felicia Phinney in the
second place. Amid the oysters, the punch and the
blazing lampsamid the joke, the laugh and the song
yea, even in the romp and in the redemption of pawns,
Jack Spratte was safe. But a walk into the air proved
fatal to him. The contrast was too much for his
constitution
,
like an icy draught on an August day. Mirth
often reacts into sensibility, and the liveliest strain easily
modulates into tenderness; just as extreme jocundity in a
child is but the prelude to a flood of tears.
Jack Spratte acted without premeditation, and
instinctively
thought it wiser to begin afar off, and to approach
the subject by circumvallation. His first parallel was laid
as follows:
Miss Phinney, said he, and his voice faltered as he
spoke, Miss Phinney, don't you think that pearches is
good, but that rockfishes is nicerbetter nor sunnies?
Why, every goose knows that, replied the lady,
forgetting, in her dislike to the professional allusion of
Spratte's remark, that geese are not particularly addicted
to fishbut what are you talking about sich things now
for? We're not setting on the end of the wharf, I'd like
to knoware we?
No, we're not, hastily ejaculated Jack Spratte, who
felt that the crisis of his fate was at hand; but oh, Miss
Phinney!oh, Miss Felicia Phinney!don't trifle with
my dearest affekshinsdon't keep me a danglin' and a
kickin', with a big hook right through the gristle of my
nose!
The figurative style in which passion is apt to indulge,
was strikingly manifest in Mr. Spratte's mode of
expression
;
but it may well be doubted whether it operated in
a way likely to promote his cause.
Well, if ever I heerd of sich a tarnal fool! was Miss
Phinney's unkind response; Jack Spratte, I've not got
hold of your nose yet, whatever I may do if you keep
a cuttin' up in this crazy sort of way; and as for your
affekshins, take care there isn't kicks about your other
shins, which might hurt worse. Whywhatdoyou
meananyhow? continued she, with great emphasis
and deliberation.
I mean, gasped Jack Spratte, so overcome by the
contending emotions of love and fear, that he was
constrained
to catch hold of a lamp-post with his disengaged
hand, to prevent himself from falling; what I mean is
thisyou've got a nibbleyes, you've got a bite!haul
me up quick, thou loveliest of sitters in the Jarsey
market
haul
me up quick, and stow me away in your basket.
I'm hook'd and I am cotch'dI'm your `catty'
forvermore
.
String me on a willow switch, and lug me right
away home!
And Jack Spratte came near fainting upon the spot.
His heart was laid opena feat of amatory surgery which
almost proved fatal to the daring lover.
Miss Felicia Phinney stepped back and gazed at him
in undisguised amazement.
You, Jack! said she, you'd better jine the
teeto-tallers
to-morrow, when you've got the headache. You
must be snapt nowany man that acts so queer, must be
blue.
No, no, no!I thought it was the punch myself,
at firstbut it's notit's lovenothing but lovelove,
without no water, no sugar, nor no nutmeg. They
couldn't make punch so strongnot even with
racky-fortus
,
stirred up with lignum-witey! Take pity on me,
do! Mayn't I hope, Phinney, mayn't I hope? If you
hav'n't time to love me now, I can wait till you're ready
yes, wait a hopin'.
You're much more likely to be sent a hoppin', Mr.
Jack Spratte.
I only want to be on an understandin' nowsort of
engaged, and sort of not engagedjust to know who I
belong to.
Well, once for all, you wont belong to me, Jack
Spratte, no how it could be fixed, and Miss Felicia
Phinney began to look enchantingly savage.
Ah, now, don'tthe cork's underpull me up
ah, do!
Jack Spratte sank upon his knees, with mouth open
and upturned, as if he expected to be taken in hand
immediately
,
and to have the hook gently and scientifically
extracted, after the fashion of the experienced angler;
but he was doomed to disappointment; and, to continue
the metaphor, he may be regarded as a trout that broke
the snood, and was left among the bulrushes, to pine away,
with the barb deep in its gulletan image, to express
this peculiar state of things, which is quite as poetical,
true and striking as if allusion were had to the stricken
deer, or to the arrow-wounded dove. Birds and
quadrupeds have had a monopoly in this matter quite too
long, and original sentiment must now prepare to dive
among the fishes, for the sake of novel illustration.
Jack Spratte, said the scornful ladye, quit
lookin' like a sturgeon with the mumpsI've done with
youget up and tortle home the straightest way there is,
and think yourself confounded lucky that you didn't get
spanked this very night. Marry you, indeed!why, I
wouldn't marry a decent man, or a good-lookin' man, or a
man with some sort of sense in his head; and nobody
would ever tell so big a whacker as to say you are sich a
one. Now, do you hooey home, and don't try to follow
13*
me, if you happen to know when a fool is well off; and
the scornful ladye walked disdainfully away, with an
air like Juno in her tantrums.
Jack Spratte remained upon his knees, as if converted
into a perfect petrifaction. His eyelids never twinkled
he seemed not even to breatheto all intents and
purposes
,
he was, for the time being, a defunct Spratte, and
it is presumed that, to this day, he would still have been
found upon the same spot, like a spratte done in salt, if
the watchman had not threatened to arrest him for being
non com
.
Where is she? exclaimed he wildly, as he started
to his feet.
Where is what? said the nocturnal perambulator.
Mrs. Spratte! cried Jack, with a bewildered air,
Mrs. Jack Spratte, that is to be. I'm goin' to be
married
,
aint I?
I don't know whether you're going to be married
or not, was the petulant reply; but, if you don't go
away, you'll be like to spend the rest of the evening with
the capun, at the watch'us. It's not my business to tell
people when they're goin' to be married, whether they're
sprattes or gudgeons.
Yes, that's itI amI am a gudgeon! said Spratte,
smiting his forehead and then darting away.
A werry flat sort of a fish, that chap is, said Charley,
with a sage expression.
Jack Spratte went directly home, just as he had been
bidhe went home, not with any definite purpose in
viewhe did not want to sleep, he did not want to eat,
he did not want to sit downhe merely experienced an
undefined want to go home, peculiar to the
Anglo-Saxon
race, when they do not exactly know what to do
with themselves, (all other people go out, under similar
circumstances,) and, therefore, home he went, very much
after the fashion of a livery-stable horse, when the gig
has been demolished, or the rider left in some friendly
ditch. He came home like a whirlwind; but yet his
feelings
were those which may be supposed to belong to the
minor vegetablesthe most diminutive of the potato tribe.
He had not been strung upon a willow switchhe,
Jack Spratte, was enrolled among the great rejected
a goodly company enough; but he derived no consolation
from the thought.
Jack Spratte vowed vengeance!Jack Spratte kept
his word!!
Many other lovers shared the fate which had befallen
the unhappy Spratte; and, to the general eye, it certainly
did appear as if Felicia Phinney was to realize her boast,
that if other gals had to take up with husbands, she, at
least, could do without a master, though it was perhaps
clear enough that, in any event, the master was likely to
be but a negative quantity.
Miss Felicia Phinney waxed onward in years, and, as
her years increased, her energy and her commanding
spirit seemed to gather new strength. She became
omnipotent
in the market-house, and wo to those who dared
to undersell, or tried too perseveringly to cheapen her
commodities.
Why now, aunty, is that the lowest? was
sometimes
,
and not unfrequently, the question.
Sattinglywhat d'ye 'spect?Fishes is fishes now,
and shad is skurse, would be the tart reply, and the
saleswoman would slap a pair of shad together, until they
resounded through the arches of the market like the
report
of a swivelskurse enough, and the profits being
small, them as prices, ought to buythat's the principle
I go upon, and the fishes would again be brought in
contact, to the great discomposure of all who happened
to be within hearing.
In appeals of this sort, the maiden fish-woman seldom
failed to be successfulespecially when the customer
happened to be rather unpractised in the affairs of the
marketfor there was something peculiarly imposing in
her tone and attitude, as she held a fish by the gills in each
hand. Mark Antony himself was not more persuasive
over the remains of the slain Csar, than was Miss Felicia
Phinney when haranguing over her skurse shad.
Ha! ha! it's well she bought something, would be
the after remark, for if there's any thing I hate to do,
it is being obligated and necessiated to flop a customer
over the head with a shad'specially if it's a lady, with
a bran-new, tearin' fine bonneta hard flop with a shad
is sudden death and run for the coroner, on spring
fashions
.
But when people prices, they've got to buy. I go
for principles, and if they wont buy, why, flopped they
ought to be, and flopped they must be, or our rights will
soon be done for. People are gettin' so sassy now, that
by'm'by, if they're not learnt manners, they'll take our
shad for nothin', and make us carry 'em home to boot.
There certainly appears to be a retributive principle in
nature, which, sooner or later, victimizes us as we have
victimized othersa species of moral
lex talionis
, which
returns the ingredients of our chalice to our own lips.
No man ever made a greater bull than he who
manufactured
a brazen representative of the animal, that
Phalaris might roast his victims in it, and hear their
bellowing
criesfor the ingenious artificer was himself the
earliest victim, and roared like a calf. The original
hangman does not live in story. It is but fair, however,
to infer that he died by the rope, and either strangled
himself, or had that friendly office performed for him by
another. All who introduced refinements in the
application
of the axethat most aristocratic of executive
instrumentshave themselves been subjected to a
different
process of shortening from any set down in Miss
Leslie's Domestic Cookery; and probably the inventor
of solitary confinement and the Pennsylvania system of
prison discipline, was she of the mistleto boughthe
identical lady of the old oak chest. The retributive
principle goes even further than this. There are
retributive
husbands and retributive wivessuch, at least, do
they seem to bewhose office appears to consist in being
a penance for previous jiltings, previous flirtations, and
antecedent insults of all kinds, to the blind little
gentleman
who primitively sports with bow and arrow,
disdaining
recourse to the use of fire-arms. In this sense, Mr.
Brownstout was a retributiona retribution for all the
past offences of Miss Felicia Phinney. He had been
ambushed far onward in her course through time; so
that when she thought the past forgotten, and when she
had measurably forgotten the past, the retributive
husband
might, like a steel trap, be sprung upon her.
Whether BrownstoutMr. Brownstouthad been
created
and trained for this especial purpose, does not appear.
He was but a little fellow, it is truein this respect, his
person and his name were in evident contradiction to
each other; but he was an ample sufficiency to bring
about the purposes for which he was intended.
There is, they say, such a thing as love at first sight
an instantaneous attack, resembling somewhat the
unexpected
assault of cholera, in Calcutta or thereabouts, where
the victim, doubled up, at once falls to the ground. This
spontaneous combustion is not perhaps so frequent in
modern days, as when the world was younger. Time and
change, atmospherical or otherwise, modify all disorders,
and by these influences, love, like the lightning, has, to
a considerable extent, fallen under the control of science,
and has ceased to be so rash, sudden, and explosive as it
was; while the actual cases do not exhibit symptoms so
imminent and dangerous. Young gentlemen now-a-days
are not nearly so apt, according to the popular phrase, to
be struck all of a heap, as their grandfathers and their
paternal predecessors are represented to have been. The
Fire-King thought little of remaining in the oven until the
dinner was bakeda feat at which precedent ages would
have looked aghastbut experiment has since proved
that the generality of our kind are salamanders to the
same extent, and a similar truth appears to have been
demonstrated, as to the capacity existing in the present
era, to withstand the fire of the brightest eyes that ever
beamed from a side-box at the opera. Who ever hears
that Orlando has shot himself for love with a percussion
pistol, or with one of your six barrelled, repeating
detonators
?
Nothat fashion expired before the flint lock
was superseded, and when the steam engine came roaring
along, the lover ceased to sigh,instead of suffering
himself to be pale and disheveled, he looks in the
mirror
and brushes his whiskers; and, as hearts are not
knocked about so violently as they were at the period of
small swords and chapeaus, it follows as a natural
consequence
,
that they are very rarely broken past repair.
Miss Felicia Phinney, it may be, from having so long
evaded the soft impeachment, was finally afflicted
somewhat after the fashion of our ancestors. Her
constitution
,
not being accustomedperhaps we should say
seasonedto such shocks, took it hard. An
individual
of her timber could not be expected to pine;
but when Mr. Brownstout first insinuatingly and delicately
asked the price of a shadin those very tones which
cause lovers' words to sound so silver sweet by night
she felt that her hour had comeand that her
unhoused
free condition must be put in circumscription and
confine. Whether she was affected by the force of
contrast, in joining which, as Mr. Sheridan Knowles has
taken occasion to remark, lieth love's delight, or
whether
Mr. Brownstout only chanced to present himself at
the propitious moment, is a problem which the parties
themselves, unaccustomed as they are to such analysis,
could not undertake to solve. It is true that Felicia
Phinney was somewhat tall and not a little muscular, and
that Mr. Brownstout had no pretensions either to length,
or to any unusual degree of latitude in form. She was
bold, determined, and rather Stentorian in her vocalities
he was mild, submissive and plausible, when it was
necessarybeing both serpentine and dovelike.
Brownstout saw that he had made an impression.
Every one intuitively knows when he has been thus
fortunate
;
and he justly thought that if he had been so
successful
when only asking the price of a fish, results must
ensue proportionably greater, if he were actually to become
the purchaser of the article; for, if a mere tap at the door
is productive of notable consequences, a regular peal with
the knocker cannot fail to rouse the entire household.
Now Brownstout, who at that period was a tailor by
trade, but one who had a soul so much above buttons
that he could but rarely be persuaded to sew any of them
on, had a tolerably clear perception of the fact, that it
would be rather a comfortable thinga nice thing,
indeed
to
hang up his hat in a house of his own, and to
possess a wife gifted with the faculty of making money
a sublunary arrangement of surpassing loveliness,
provided
the wife be duly impressed with a sense of its
symmetrical
proportions, and has the good taste not to recur
to the subject too often. On the one hand, he sawin
his mind's eye, Horatioenchanting visions of ninepins,
shuffleboard and other exercises of that sort, made still more
agreeable by proper allowances of ale and tobaccowhile,
on the other hand, a sufficient basisa specie basis
for all these absorbing delights was evident in a stand at
the mart piscatorial, femininely attended. There was a
beautiful harmony in this aspect of the case, that came
straight home to his bosom. It combined dignity with
utilitypoetry with practicethe sweet with the useful,
in such architectural grace, that it was not in his nature
to abandon the prospect. He had what few men have
a scheme of life before him, which dove-tailed into all his
peculiarities of disposition, and might be pronounced
perfect. It is not then to be wondered at that Thais at
Alexander's side, on the memorable evening when the
mail brought the election returns from Persia, was not
more soul-subduing than Miss Felicia Phinney seemed in
the eyes of the enraptured Brownstout.
It was not in his way, to be sure. He was not
altogether
accustomed to such matters; but as he was aware
of the truth of the axiom, nothing venture, nothing
have, he ultimately made the desperate resolve to buy a
fish, andreckless man!to pay for it!to buy, if
necessary to the completion of his great design, several
successive fishes and to pay for them, and he saw but one
difficulty in the way. His road was clear enough so far
as the mere purchase was involved; but it was the second
clause in the programme of the operation which
somewhat
puzzled Mr. Brownstout, as indeed it often puzzles
financiers of a more elevated range. He might buy, but,
like Macbeth, he did not know how to trammel up the
consequence, which was to pay. It is true that a
certain
practical philosopher has decided that base is the
slave who pays; yet there are times when circumstances
so combine against the principles of free trade that to
pay is unavoidable. Mr. Brownstout felt his situation to
be a case in point, and he was sadly puzzled as to the
mode in which this monetary obstacle was to be
surmounted
,
until he remembered that, in default of assets,
there is a mode of hypothecating one's hopes and
prospects
so that they may be coined to drachmas. He
resolved to borrow on his personal liability, secured by
the collateral of his chances in matrimony, of course
promising a premium proportionate to the risk. For the
means of obtaining a half dollar's worth of fish, he was,
at a future day, to return a full dollar, which is not
unreasonable
,
considering the shadowy nature of prospective
dollars, dependent on contingenciesdollars, so situated,
are very uncertain dollarsdollars, which are to be or
not to be, as the fates may determine. When any one
says I'll owe you a dollar, it often requires acute ears
to detect even the approaching jingle thereof.
A sweet morning, Miss Phinney!a lovely morning
quite circumambient and mellifluous, if I may use the
expression. Such mornings as this cause us bachelors
to feel like posts in a flower gardenwe may look on, to
be sure, but no rosies and posies are blooming for uswe
are nothing but interlopers and don't belong to the family
solitary and forlorn in the middle of the crowd. More
juvenile people, such as you, Miss Phinney, don't realize
those things; but for me!and Brownstout assumed an
expression peculiarly plaintive, as he stood in the
market-house
vis--vis
to the shad basket.
I minds my own business, Mr. Brownstout, and never
trades in rosies and posies, was the gentle reply; the
beautifulest mornings, to my thinking, is them when
people
bites sharp and are hungry for fish. Hyperflutenations
and dictionary things are not in my way; but Miss
Phinney was evidently pleased with Brownstout's
hyper-flutenations
and dictionary things, and liked them none
the worse probably because they were not very clearly
understood.
You are right, madamperfectly right. When
people have a taste for fish, they are generally fond of fish,
14
and are likely to show their good sense by buying fish.
I'm very much attached to fish myself. How are fish
to-day?
Why, pretty well, I thank you, Mr. Brownstout;
how do you find yourself?
This being the first attempt at a joke ever essayed by
Miss Felicia Phinney, she was quite pleased with the
darling, and she laughedrather rustily, it must be
confessed
,
but she did laugh; and Brownstout, not being
deficient in tact, he laughed too. If you desire to win
people's hearts, always laugh at their jokes, whether good,
bad, or indifferentmore heartily, in fact, at those which
are bad and indifferent than at the good ones. It proves
your benevolence. The good joke can take care of itself
and walk alone, while the others are rickety and require
cherishing, and are also, on this account, the greater
favourites with the author of their being.
Brownstout laughedhahahugh! and Miss
Phinney laughedhehehaw! Pretty well on
both sides. This intermingling of laughs often leads to
an intermingling of sighs, if care be taken not to laugh too
much; for a lover habitually jocose seldom prospers with
the fair, however deep the undertow of his sentimentality.
Brownstout was aware of this, and subsided betimes into
a more amiable 'haviour of the visage.
He finally bought his fish, and, as they dangled from
his hand, so did he dangle after Miss Phinney, and the
combined perseverance of dangling and purchasing at
last brought him to the haven of his hopes. They were
married, and Miss Felicia Phinney was duly
metamorphosed
into Mrs. Brownstout.
But who had urged this ill-starred attachment to so dire
a catastrophe!who but Jack Sprattethe Varney Spratte
the Iago Sprattethe worse than Schedoni Spratte!
Spratte, the rejectedSpratte, the despised!! He had
never forgotten, though long years had elapsed, the
outrage
to his tender emotions on that memorable night of
Copenhagen and fried oystersof love and despair
when the expression of his lacerated feelings had been
imputed to the effects of punchwhen, in spite of
assurances
that the hook was through the gristle of his nose,
the obdurate fair had refused to pull him up. Had
Jack Spratte been oblivious of his wrongs? Nothey
had lain within his bosom as icy as a cold potato, while
the sweet cider of his affections had passed through all
the grades of fermentationacetous and so forthuntil
they had become vinegar, sharper than the north wind
pepper vinegar, to which picalillies are not a
circumstance
.
The merry Spratte, in a single night, had been
converted into a pike of the fiercest description. He
frequented the shuffleboardhe early discovered the
secret of Mr. Brownstout's attachmenthe treated to
slings and egg nog, until he ascertained the relative
position
of parties, and all necessary particularshe
confirmed
Brownstout's wavering resolutionhe lent him the
money to buy shadand he, even he, stood groomsman
at the ceremony, covering his procrastinated triumph in
deceptive smiles, and eating cake as if his heart were filled
with sympathetic emotions.
Why did Jack Spratte do this?why?because he
knew Mr. Brownstout's sordid viewshis nefarious
designs
his
intention to frequent the ninepin alley and the
shuffleboard, while his wife sold fish in the markethis
resolution never to work again. It was
Jack Spratte's
Revenge
!! Diabolical Spratte!!!
The results which Jack Spratte had anticipated, as
some compensation for his sufferings, were not of slow
development. Domestic uneasiness gathered like a
cloud around the hearth-stone of the Brownstouts; for
Brownstout, being busily engaged in the pursuit of
happiness
,
was not only absent the greater part of the day,
but rarely made his appearance at all until one or two
o'clock in the morning; and, when he did come, his first
visitation was to his wife's professional check apron, to
obtain an additional supply of the sinews of war.
Husbands are luxuries, my dear, and must be paid
for accordingly, was his only reply to words of
remonstrance
;
and when the aforesaid pocket was put out of
sight, he broke things by way of demonstration, until it
was again brought within reach.
Mrs. Brownstout, in the warmth of her affection, for a
time tried kindness as a means of reformshe winked at
her husband's idleness and made him a weekly allowance;
but his ideas on the subject of gentlemanly expenditure,
developed themselves too rapidly to be confined within
the bounds of such limits, and he had secret recourse to
the pocket, until the deficiencies thus occasioned became
too palpable to be concealed. The cash would not
balance
,
and, naturally enough, the patience of Mrs.
Brownstout
then kicked the beam. She flopped her little
husbandnot with a shad, as might be expected, but
with a shovel applied in its latitude, broadside on.
The next morning, silence reigned through the hapless
domicile of the Brownstouts. The masculine owner of
that name had disappeared, and with him the pocket,
check apron and all. Night after night he came not, and
Mrs. Brownstout grew meagre and dejected.
I'm a lone widder feller, sighed she, or just as
bad. When you aint got your husband, it's pretty near
the same thing as if you hadn't none. But men is men
all the world over, and you can't help it no how. When
Brownstout fust came a courtin' to me, you'd a thought
butter wouldn't a melted in his mouth, he pretended to
be so sniptious. He swore he loved me; but now, just
because of a little difficulty about the shovel, he's shinned
it like a white-head, with my pocket full of change and
all the spoons he could lay his hands on.
And so Mrs. Brownstout one evening sallied forth in
search of the delinquent.
The bar was in full practiceclients and cases
flocked around it in abundance. Four hands, with
their sleeves rolled up, could scarcely, with all their
quickness
,
mix the fancy drinks fast enough to supply the
demand, so numerous were the applications for
refreshment
.
Corks were poppingthe bottles gurgledclouds
of cigar smoke were rolling dun, and men had to
speak at the very stretch of their voices, to be heard over
the thunder of the balls, as they went trolling along the
board and crashing among the ninepins, anon booming
back adown the trough. There, amidst the crowd,
divested
of his coat and waistcoat, to give free play to muscular
action, was Brownstout!the faithless Brownstout!in
his glory. His cigar and his half-empty tumbler stood
upon an adjacent ledgein the enthusiasm of the hour, he
had not only bared his arms, but likewise girt his body with
a bandana, and tucked his trowsers into his boots. There
was a streak of chalk upon his face, which gave its
general
flush of excitement a still more ruddy tinge.
It was his throw!
Nicely did Brownstout poise the ponderous ball, which
rested on his right hand, while the forefinger of the left
remained for an instant upon its upper hemisphere. He
paused a moment for an inspiring sip and a preliminary
puffand thenthe living statues never displayed more
grace in attitudeevery head projected, as if their owners
would penetrate into futurity, and see results before they
were accomplished. Brownstout bowed himself to the
task, scanning the interval with that eye of skill which
so surely betokens victory, and then, with a slide like
14*
that of the feathered Mercurywhizz!bang!slam!
boom!bump!smash!!crash!!!
Another set-up! is the general cry, and Brownstout,
with a back-handed sweep across his countenance, which
scarcely concealed the half-suppressed smile of conscious
genius beaming in every featurethough he would have
looked indifferent, had that been possibleturned
himself
once more to his tumbler and to his cigar, like one
who felt that he had done the state some service and
they knew it. He had reason to be proud. Not only
had he achieved victory for his pard'ners and gained
the refreshment ticketsgood for a drink and trimmings
consequent thereonbut he had also secured several bets,
couched under the mysterious phrase of being for
something
all round. Indeed, it is not certain that an oyster
supper for six was not also dependent on the result,
which Brownstout had mentally resolved should be an
oyster supper for one, on each of six specified nights, and
not an oyster supper for six, on one night; the last being
a common arrangement, but regarded by him as at war
with true economy, and as most wasteful and ridiculous
excess.
After the first burst of exultation was over, the victors
seemed suddenly to become athirstthey smacked their
lips, and made many other conventional signs expressive
of that condition, jogging the elbows of the defeated, and
asking, very significantly, what shall it be?a sound
which awakened the smiles of the bar, the members
whereof began scientifically to handle the decanters
chiefly affected by Mr. Brownstout's brave associates
partners of his toilfor had he not gained the decisive
set-up?
Set-up!unlucky words! Well said Napoleon to
the Abbe De Pradt, that from the sublime to the
ridiculous
there is but one step. It was so with the emperor.
He and Brownstout both found that often when we have
gained a set-up, we are nearest to a set-down.
Out of the way! shrieked a well-known voice, the
owner of which was endeavouring to force a passage
through the crowdI'm sure he's herehe's always
here, and I'm come to fetch him!
The old woman! exclaimed Brownstout, in
trembling
dismay, as the tumbler slipped from his nerveless
hand, and the cigar rolled into the folds of his bosom.
And old woman! repeated the gentlemen of the bar,
letting fall their muddlers.
His old woman! re-echoed the ninepin players,
aghast.
Brownstout's old woman! was the general chorus.
Run, Brown!
Hop, Stout!!
Make yourself scarce!
Too late, alas! were these kindly hints from those who
would have saved their beloved friend from the infliction
of domestic discipline. Brownstout saw that retreat was
impossible. His wife's broad hand was upon him. He
fell back breathless with terrorit is presumed that
reminiscences
of the shovel danced athwart his brain.
Like another Mephistophiles, Jack Spratte appeared
upon the scene. The author of mischief is always in at
the catastrophe.
You are a precious set of warmint! said Mrs.
Brownstout
,
as she glared fiercely aroundwho am I to thank
for deludin' my old man to sich places as this, to waste
his time and my money on fools and foolery?
Thank me! exclaimed Jack Spratte, hysterically,
me!me! to whom you guv' the mitten!me, who
got the bag to hold!me, whose nose was put out of
jint!me, whose young hopes was drownded in cold
water almost before their eyes was opened!
The
adsum qui feci
of the Latin poet was never
more finely done into English, though it may well be
questioned whether the atrocious Spratte had ever heard
of Nisus and Euryalus.
The excitement became intensethe crowd huddled
aroundthe boys rushed from the pins to listen to the
denouementand one thirsty soul at the bar showed his
interest in the matter, by hastily swallowing the contents
of three other gentlemen's glasses, to fortify himself for
the occasion, after which he also hurried to the centre.
It was me that done it all! continued Spratte,
gesticulating
spasmodicallyI know'd he'd break your
heart!I know'd he'd hook your money!I know'd he'd
keep always goin' out and never comin' home agin! If
it hadn't been for me, he'd not have married youbut
now I'm revengednow I'm happynow I'mha! ha!
hugh! and Jack Spratte sprung high into the air, and,
on his return to earth, spun round three times, and,
exhausted
by emotion, fell prostrate, upsetting a table upon
which stood three brandies and one whisky punch.
Mrs. Brownstout dropped her hands, and suffered the
almost inanimate form of her husband to go lumbering to
the earth, while she stood petrified with despair at this
terrible revelation. Her heart was congealed, and every
bystander was stricken with horror at Spratte's having
been been such a debaushed fishall were moved
inwardly, except the utilitarian who had imbibed the
other gentlemen's liquor, and he seized on the chance to
move outwardly, that he might sneak away without
discharging
the dues for that which he had ordered himself.
There were no more ninepins that nightthe moral
influence
was such that the boys put out the lights without
being told to do soif they had not, indeed, it is
probable
the lights would have gone out of themselves. Mr.
and Mrs. Brownstout went home in a cabthey were too
much overcome to walk. Jack Spratte recovered by slow
degreesthe three brandies and the whisky punch, in
which he was immersed, probably saved his lifebut
Jack Spratte never smiled again, no matter how good the
joke. His bosom was searedhis heart was like a dried
cherry several seasons old, and so he became a drummer
in the marines, delighting only in the beating of tattoo
and reveille, as two of the most misanthropic of
employments
the
one sending men to bed, while the other
forces them to get up. He was severe upon these points
of war, and it was noticed that he was always a little
before
the time in the performance of each. Such are the
spiteful effects of blighted affections, which give acerbity
even to a musician! But Jack Spratte's revenge had
failedmost signally failed. After the events of the
ninepin alley, Brownstout was an altered man. He
might justly be spoken of as a great moral re-action.
Stung to the quick at having been made an instrument
of revengea mere drumstick of malignityhe burnt all
the tickets in his possession, good, as they were, for
refreshments at the barhe returned the check apron
pocket to his wife, though probably it would have been
more acceptable if any thing had remained in it. The
spoons, however, were past redemption; but what are
spoons in comparison with matrimonial comfortwhat
are spoons, when one's husband works in the daytime
and never goes out in the evenings? Mrs. Brownstout was
a happy woman, and never, in fact, hinted at spoons,
unless
she had cause to suspect that her husband's thoughts
might perhaps be straying towards ninepins. That word
always brought him straight, and she but rarely had
occasion
to say spoons, except on the Fourth of July or about
the Christmas holidays. As for the bibulous individual
before alluded to, the poetic catastrophe to which he was
an accidental witness, made him so dry that he has been
busy ever since in a vain endeavour to quench his thirst.
He thinks of hiring himself out as a dam to any
moderate
sized river, and would do so, if the navigation
company
were liberal enough to put a drop of something
in the water, just to take the chill off and to correct its
crudities.
And such is the end of
Jack Spratte's Revenge
.
CORNER LOUNGERS.
There
are menmany menwhose mental callipers
grasp only a single ideathe sun of whose thought
revolves
about, warms and enlightens but one little world,
that world being the contracted universe (for universe it
is to them) of their own personal affairs and individual
interests. From some congenital defect in their
intellectual
opticsas spectacles for the mind remain to be
invented, and as the concave lens has not yet been
adjusted
to rectify the imperfect vision of the soulthey
live within a narrow horizon, and browse, as it were,
with a tether, having a certain circumference of grass,
without the ability to take a mouthful beyond its limits.
Nor, indeed, have they any desire for such epicurean
adventure
.
They do not so much as wish to glance into any
field which is not peculiarly their own. The clover which
belongs to them, satisfies all their wants, and to disturb
themselves at all, as to how other people make hay, is a
stretch of ambition to which they never aspire. Armies
may devour each othernavies may go down and submit
their Paixhans artillery to the investigation of the grampus
and other martial fishes,empires may rock and reel, like
Fourth of July revellers, in the days when the evidence
of patriotism was to make the head heavier than the heels;
but the species to which we refer, still open their shops
with unshaken nerves, take their breakfast with
undiminished
appetite, and go about their business with no thought
but that of making both ends meet. To bear a hand in
the grand work of ameliorating the condition of the human
race, is a matter, in their opinion, which qualifies one for
the first vacancy in the lunatic asylum. They belong to
no philanthropic associations to regulate the price of soap
in another hemisphere; nor have they ever entered into an
organization to compel the employing shoemakers of the
moon to give their apprentices half-holiday once a week.
They are sure that Convention must be something
relative to Bedlam, and that those who wish to reform
everybody else, must stand greatly in need of some such
operation themselves. An election, to them, is an
annual
nuisancea periodical eruption, made necessary by
a defective constitution, and all the meetings which go
before, are, in their eyes, merely the premonitory
symptom
that disease is reaching a crisis. Processions and
parades move their pity, and when they think at all about
the turmoil of the outer world, it is only to wonder when
the fools will have it fixed to their liking.
Far different from these is that disinterested body of
men and boys who lounge at the corners of the way in a
great metropolis; members of the human family who may
be said to be always on hand and continually in
circulation
.
They literally are the pillars of the state. They
prop up lamp-postspatronise fire-plugs, and encourage
the lindens of the street in their unpractised efforts to
grow. The luxuriant trees, which adorn the front of
Independence
Hall, outstrip all others in umbrageous beauty,
because they, beyond all others, have been sustained by
the kindness of loungers; and they now strive to return
the compliment, by affording a canopy to intercept the rays
of the sun, and to avert the falling shower, from the
beloved friends who stand by them, have stood by them,
and will continue to stand by them, in every sort of
weather.
In ancient Rome, whenever that respectable republic
got itself into a difficulty with those unreasonable people
who were foolish enough to wish to regulate their own
affairs, and when the storm grew loud and threatening, it
was sometimes found necessary to intrust all things to the
discretion of a dictator, whose duty it was to take
care that the republic received no detriment. But,
without the provisions of lawwithout the troubles and
dangers which flowed from the Roman practice, we are
happy in the possession of a host of such officers,
unrecognised
,
it is true, but not the less efficient, whose
chief employment and whose main delight it is, reckless
of honour and emolument, to take care that nothing
detrimental happens to the republic. Their regards are
always upon it, in jealous supervision. They are no
speculative overseers, who imperfectly attend to exterior
affairs, by lounging in slippered ease in luxurious offices,
disporting themselves over the newspapers of the day.
They are not influenced by the mere report of scouts, or
the sinister assertions of the interested; but make it their
daily practice to hear with their own ears and to see with
their own eyes. Nay, they push their zealous
watchfulness
so far, that they may often be seen in the exercise
of their high functions, when other mortals, less gifted
with discrimination, can discover nothing to excite their
notice. When the pavier is at work in the highway,
heaving the weighty rammer with most emphatic groan,
not a pebble is driven to its place, that the genuine
lounger has not marked in every stage of its progress. No
gas-pipe is adjusted, without undergoing a similar scrutiny,
and the sanctified spot where the pig was killed or the
hound was run over, acquires such mysterious and
fascinating
importance in the lounger's estimation, that he
will stand whole days in sombre contemplation of so
distinguished
a locality. Even the base of Pompey's statue,
where great Csar fell, could not prove more attractive;
and Rizzio's blood, which stains the floor of Holyrood,
is not more dear to the antiquary than are the marks left
by an overturned wagon, to the non-commissioned
superintendents
of the city. Indeed, they have been seen
15
congregated for hours around the house from which the
tenants moved on the previous night, without complying
with the vexatious ceremony of paying the renta feudal
exaction perpetuated by landlords for the perplexity of
the people. Should a masterless hat be found, or a drop
of blood be discovered in the street, it forms a nucleus
for a gathering. No matter how slight the cause may
seem to the ordinary intellect, there are persons who look
more deeply into things, and derive wisdom from
circumstances
apparently too trivial to deserve regard.
But they are secret, too. The perfect lounger, though
prodigal of his presence, is a niggard with his words. It
is his vocation to see, and not to speak. His inferences
are locked within the recesses of his own breast. He is
wary and diplomatic, and not like other individuals, to
be sounded from the lowest note to the top of his
compass
,
by the curiosity of each passing stranger. He
opposes no one in the acquisition of knowledgehe places
no stumbling-blocks in the way; but, by his taciturnity,
intimates that the results of his labours are not to be
obtained for nothing. It is his motto that if you desire
information, you must use the proper means to acquire it;
for you have the same natural qualifications for the
purpose
as he.
That this characteristic belongs to the street lounger
we have nothing to say about the inferior class who
operate
solely within wallsis evident from the fact that it
rarely happens in the course of the most inquisitive life,
that any one, on approaching a crowd, can ascertain, by
inquiry of its component members, why it has assembled.
The question is either unheeded altogether, or else a
supercilious glance is turned upon the querist, with a
laconic response that the party does not know.
Ostensibly
,
nobody knows a jot about the matter, except the
fortunate few who form the inner circle, and, as it were,
hem in all knowledge. They who extricate themselves
early from the interior pressure, and walk away, either
with smiling faces, as if the joke were good, or with a
solemn sadness of the brow, as if their sensibilities
had been lacerated, even they don't know! None
will tell, except perchance it be a luckless urchin not yet
taught to economize his facts, or some unsophisticated
girl with a market basket, who talks for talking's sake.
But who believes that the initiated don't knowthat
the omnipresent lounger don't know? It is not to be
believed. He does know; but from some as yet
undetermined
and unappreciated singularity of his nature, it is
rather his pleasure to be looked upon as ignorant, than to
unlace his reputation by proving false to so cardinal
a point in the practice of his kind, as to be a mere bulletin
for others' uses. What he knows, he knowslet that
content you. He has employment for all he has acquired,
which, to outward appearance, would be spoiled by
participation
;
but where, or how, or when he proposes to
use it, is a problem which remains to be solved.
Unawed by the state of the weather, these watchful
sentinels are always abroad; and so far are they elevated
above the influences of prevailing effeminacy, that they
indulge so little in home delights as to induce many to
believe that they dispense altogether with the enervating
comforts of a fixed domicile. When their nature must
needs recuperate, it is supposed they rotate for
repose, and that thus, by never couching themselves
consecutively
in the same nest, they catch abuses napping,
by their sudden and unexpected appearance so early in
the morning.
But, whatever may be the private habits,
entomologically
or ornithologically speaking, of the corner
lounger, he is a self-evident proposition and an
undeniable
fact There may be doubts as to the existence of
other thingsall circumstantial nature may be disputed;
but he must be confessed. Go where you will, he is
there, and as he is there to everybody, his there must be
everywhere, paradoxical as it may seem. His visibility
is co-existent with your presence, and it would require
the pen of transcendentalism to explain the mysterious
nature of his wonderful ubiquity. We have not language
to pourtray the phenomena developed in this respect by a
civic lounger of the superlative class; but, in homely
phrase, if we may so express it, like a speck upon the
eye itself, look where you will, he stands full blown before
you. He is rarely seen in motionnever
in transitu;
but he is at your elbow when you depart, and when you
have reached your end, the lounger is at the place in
anticipation
,
leisurely drumming with his heels upon a post
and bearing no traces of a forced march. By what magic
process this is accomplished, no one can tell. There is
no proof that he travels. There is no physical sign in his
appearance, to induce a belief that he excels in
locomotion
,
or has any taste for such active employment as would
seem to be necessary for achieving such results; and so
much are the scientific puzzled to account for the fact to
which we have reference, that a paper is said to be in
preparation for the Philosophical Transactions, having
for its object to determine whether a corner lounger,
in his distinctive and individual capacity, be one or
many; or whether the specimen be not multitudinous,
in an identical shape and image, so that in the same form
and as one person, he is gifted with the capacity to be
everywhere at once. Every nice observer will be
inclined
to receive the last hypothesis as the correct
impression
;
for he must often have had abundant reason to
conclude that the lounger is really thus, as broad and
general as the casing aira Monsieur Tonson who has
always come again.
There are, however, certain peculiarities in this matter
which are also worthy of remarklittle niceties in the
case which deserve their comment. As each man is
supposed
to have his superintending starhis supervising
genius, which, both in weal and wo, hovers about his
footsteps or directs his course, so each individual has his
lounging John Joneshis familiar from the spirit-land
of loaferdom. We know him not, but in his palpable
formwe have exchanged no word or kindness with
himhe has no interest in our affairs, nor we in his
there is no earthly tie existing; but when we have once
marked our coincident lounger, he is there for everour
inevitable fatethe everlasting frontispiece in the volume
of our experiencesour perpetual double, in sunshine or
in rain. Let the fact once be presented to your sensorium
that you rarely go to any place without seeing that
man, and your doom is sealed. You never will go
anywhere without seeing him, either there or on your way
there, from that time forth; and when you do not see him,
be assured that there is abundant reason to doubt whether
you are really yourself, and whether, notwithstanding
appearances, you are not mistaken in the personso that
in shaving your apparent countenance, you may have
shaved an impostor, and in drinking your wine, you may
have been pouring refreshment down the throat of a rogue.
When a man is without his shadow, what assurance is
there that himself is he? But when one's reflex is
present
,
he may, in some cases, be satisfied that money put
in his own pocket, is not intrusted to the care of a
peculator
.
And in this way is it that wisdom derives
comfort
from the phenomenon that we have attempted to
explain.
Is the citizen martially inclined, and does he attend
volunteer parades, to gratify the heroic longings of his
soul by having his toes macerated by iron heels, his ribs
15*
compressed by ruffian elbows, or his abdominal capacity
astonished by the musket-but of the authoritative sentinel,
who knocks the breath out of your body, while politely
exclaiming stand back, gentlemen; a little further, if
you please! There is his attendant lounger, in the best
of possible places, and safely beyond the reach of the
mobrepressing
guard.
Is the foiled pickpocket borne triumphantly to office
of Recorder, Alderman or Mayor? Look ye now and see.
Within the rail of official function, close to magisterial
dignity, there stands your ghost, your bodach glas; not
antecedent or consequent, but instant. No need to wish,
or call, or wonder at his absence. You are here, and he
istherecause and effect, linked together by hooks of
steel. 'Tis your
alter ego
your t'other eye.
Do you attend the burial of a friend, and walk in gloom
and silent sorrow? Dash aside your tears, and behold,
leaning against that funeral tree which overshadows the
sad procession, an evidence is apparent that even in grief
your unknown coadjutor is true to his vocation. You
will never be desertednever!
Are you essentially humane, taking delight to see
murder
choked and homicide made breathless, that the world
may become tender-hearted and averse to horrors by
familiarity
with Ketch's delectable countenance? That
man is helping to support the rectangular superstructure
which reforms men by the speedy dislocation of their
vertebral column, and improves the age by the
disjointing
of necks. He and Ketch seem to be sworn brothers.
But fear not. Though this circumstance of yours be
something that cannot be avoided, either by secresy
respecting
your movementsfor he is an intuitionby
rapidity of travelfor he is ubiquitousor by cunning
evasionfor he is instinctiveyet no harm appears ever
to have arisen from this species of Chang and Engship
from this disjunctive Siamese twinnery, if we may so
venture upon a terminological experiment, and coin a
phrase to distinguish an unnamed idea. The inevitable
may be sad in his expression; but he shows no sign of
being mischievous in his soul, nor is his observation
sarcastic
in its conclusions. He is a student of humanity,
ever at his book, but rather touched with melancholy at
the lession thus derived, than made misanthropic by a
knowledge of our weaknesses and follies. Exulting beauty
passes by him, and at the rustling of silks and the
creaking
of shoes, which have betrayed so many hearts, he
sighs to think that a bad cold or a misdirected bucket
would soon reduce that joyousness to the most pitiable
plight. He looks plaintively at the unheeding dog, who,
ignorant of laws, and with muzzle at home, sports onward
to the fell clutches of the sordid Sambo, to whom canine
slaughter is a trade and profit; and he draws analogies
between puppyhood and youthful prime, revelling in wild
delights, and unwarned of ketchers till they are caught.
The lounger is a lonely moralist, who has too much
general
sympathy to isolate affection by contracting his sphere
of usefulnesstoo disinterested to narrow himself down
to a pursuit of selfish aggrandizementtoo full of heart to
be cooped within the ribs of a trade, and too anxious
about the general welfare ever to give rest to his anxious
eye. He is the general guardianthe foster mother of us
all; and perhaps it is our ignorance alone that regards him
as being exclusive in his attentions; just as childhood
thinks that a portrait watches all its movements, or as the
moon seems marching above our heads wherever we go.
Such as we have described is Nicholas Nollikinshe
with the breastpinhe who watches so intently the
shaving, evolved and elaborated from its parent stick by
the keen edge of his whittle. Though Nollikins appears
to be cutting, and it is reasonable to suppose that he is
cutting, yet Nollikins is also thinking. In fact, he is a
sagenot such as they stuff ducks withal, or liquidate
into medicinal teabut that sort of sage which has
sagacity
for its result, better far than ducks or teas.
Nollikins
,
however, labours under a difficulty. He is
reflective
and observant, but not practical. He never comes
to the application, for that word is particularly what he
dislikes; and hence the deep river of his probable
usefulness
has its perfect navigation interrupted by a dam in
the channel. His ships never come to port. Nollikins
has in his time tried many trades; but none of them agreed
with him, except the office of being midshipman to an
oyster boat, and there were points even in this profession
which were repugnant to his finer emotions. Raking
on dry land is not perhaps so disagreeable; but let those
who think that words are identical and synonymous, and
represent the same thing at sea and ashore, try raking for
oysters, as Nicholas Nollikins did for a whole season, and
they will ever after have a correct appreciation of
differences
.
When the boat returned to the wharf, Nicholas
was at home. His taste for society could now be gratified.
The delicate aspirations of his nature found food in the
distribution of oysters, and his imagination had room to
expand as he opened the bivalves. What a delightful
compound of business and pleasure is that phase of the
oyster trade which sells wholesale, but yet does not scorn
the niceties of retail to the hungry wanderer!
Benevolence
and information are here combinedto talk and to
eatto question and to impart nourishmentto benefit
both the
physique
and the
morale
at the same timewho
would not be midshipman of an oyster boatwho could
not live whole days at the wharf, under such
circumstances
?
Nollikins couldNollikins didthrice happy
Nollikins!
But the genial sky always has clouds in ita spring
morning, be it as balmy as it may, is generally followed
by a cloudy afternoon. When oysters are sold and eaten,
it is a necessity, arising from the unfortunate state of
things in this sublunary sphere, that you must go after
additional oystersthat is, if you want more; for oysters,
unlike the accommodating shad, have not yet learned to
come up the river of themselves, that they may be caught
at the very door. Few things, in the eating way, have
that innate politeness so remarkable in the character of a
shad. Had the shad been blessed with feet and hands,
there cannot be a doubt but that it would complete its
measure of complaisance by walking up the street and
ringing at the bell, with a civil inquiry for the cook and
the gridiron. It would come about half an hour before
breakfast, and never defer its call till after tea.
Commend
us to the shad, as the best mannered fish that swims.
Many men might go to school to the shad; and indeed, if
our piscatory learning be not at fault, the shad do
assemble
in schools, to which cause possibly may be attributed
the excellence of their training. Always bow with
deference to a shadit has travelled far to enjoy the
pleasure of your acquaintance. The oyster, however, is
churlishit makes no free visitation, and upon this fact
hinges the fate of Nicholas Nollikins. He could not
abide the painful contrast which was brought home to his
sensibilities, by the change from the wharf to the cove
from society to solitudefrom the delicate play of the
iron-handled knife, (so favourable to the exhibition of
grace and skill,) to the heavy drag of rakes and tongs in
the oyster bed; and he, therefore, concluded to resign his
regular commission, and to obtain his living for the future
by dabbling only in the fancy branches of human
employment
.
When the boats come up, he has no objection to
taking a place, for the time being, as salesman to the
concern; and in this way, working only when urgent
necessity compels, and consuming the rest of his existence
in the ornamentals of life, such as leaning against a post
and speculating on the chances and changes of terrestrial
affairs, our worthy Nicholas contrives to bite the sunny
side from the peach, leaving the green core for those who
are mean enough to be content with it.
Nicholas has a home, upon a desperate emergency;
but he does not trouble it often with his presence, for
reasons which he regards as perfectly adequate to excuse
any delinquency in this respect, which calumnious tongues
may think proper to lay to his charge.
As for goin' home, Billy Bunkers, said he, one day,
in confidence to the long lad with the short roundabout,
who leans upon the opposite side of the lamp post; as
for goin' home, Billy, savin' and exceptin' when you
can't help it, why it's perfectly redicklis. If people's
opinyins could be made to agree, that would be one thing,
and you might go home. But as these opinyins don't
agree, why that's another thing, and it's best to clear out
and keep out, jist as long as you kin. What's your
sitivation
when you do go home? There's the old man, and
there's the old voman and the rest of them, hurtin' your
feelins as bad as if they was killin' kittens with a
brickbat
.
As soon as you're inside of the door, they sing out
like good fellers, `Eh, waggybone!Ho! ho! lazyboots!
hellow, loafer!ain't you most dead a workin' so hard?
t'aint good for your wholesome to be so all-fired industrious!'
That's the way they keep a goin' on, aggravatin' you for
everlastin'. They don't understand my complaintthey
can't understand a man that's lookin' up to better things.
I tell you, Billy, exclaimed Nicholas, with tears in his
eyes, when a feller's any sort of a feller, like you and
me
Yes, replied Billy, complacently; we're the fellers
it takes us.
When a feller's any sort of a feller, to be ketched at
home is little better than bein' a mouse in a wire-trap.
They poke sticks in your eye, squirt cold water on your
nose, and show you to the cat. Common people, Billy
low, ornery, common people, can't make it out when
natur's raised a gentleman in the familya gentleman all
complete, only the money's been forgot. If a man won't
work all the timeday in and day outif he smokes by
the fire or whistles out of the winder, the very gals bump
agin him and say `get out of the way, loaf!' Now what
I say is thisif people hasn't had genteel fotchin' up,
you can no more expect 'em to behave as if they had
been fotch up genteel, than you can make good cigars
out of a broom handle.
That are a fact, ejaculated Billy Bunkers, with
emphasis
;
for Billy has experienced, in his time, treatment at
home somewhat similar to that complained of by Nicholas
Nollikins.
But, Billy, my son, never mind, and keep not a
lettin'
on, continued Nollikins, and a beam of hope
irradiated
his otherwise saturnine countenance; the world's
a railroad and the cars is comin'all we'll have to do is
to jump in, chalked free. There will be a time
something
must happen. Rich widders are about yet, though
they are snapped up so fast. Rich widders, Billy, are
`special providences,' as my old boss used to say when
I broke my nose in the entry, sent here like rafts to pick
up deservin' chaps when they can't swim no longer.
When you've bin down twy'st, Billy, and are jist off
agin, then comes the widder a floatin' along. Why,
splatterdocks is nothin' to it, and a widder is the best of
all life-preservers, when a man is most a case, like you
and me.
Well, I'm not perticklar, not I, nor never was. I'll
take a widder, for my part, if she's got the mint drops,
and never ask no questions. I'm not proudnever was
harrystocraticI drinks with anybody, and smokes all
the cigars they give me. What's the use of bein' stuck
up, stiffy? It's my principle that other folks are nearly
as good as me, if they're not constables nor aldermen. I
can't stand them sort.
No, Billy, said Nollikins, with an encouraging
smile, no, Billy, such indiwidooals as them don't know
human natur'but, as I was goin' to say, if there
happens
to be a short crop of widders, why can't somebody
leave us a fortin?That will do as well, if not better.
Now look herewhat's easier than this? I'm standin'
on the wharfthe rich man tries to go aboard of the
steamboatthe niggers push him off the plankin I
jumps, ca-splash! The old gentleman isn't drownded;
but he might have been drownded but for me, and if he
had a bin, where's the use of his money then? So he gives
me as much as I want now, and a great deal more when
he defuncts riggler, accordin' to law and the practice of
civilized nations. You seethat's the way the thing
works. I'm at the wharf every daycan't afford to lose
a chance, and I begin to wish the old chap would hurra
about comin' along. What can keep him?
If it 'ud come to the same thing in the end,
remarked
Billy Bunkers, I'd rather the niggers would
push the old man's little boy into the water, if it's all the
same to him. Them fat old fellers are so heavy when
they're skeered, and hang on sowhy, I might get
drownded before I had time to go to bank with the
check! But what's the use of waitin'? Couldn't we
shove 'em in some warm afternoon, ourselves? Who'd
know in the crowd?
I've thought of that, Bunkers, when a man was
before
me that looked like the right sort. I've often said
to myself, `My friend, how would you like to be washed
for nothin'?'but, Billy, there might be mistakes
perhaps
,
when you got him out, he couldn't pay. What
then?
Why, keep a puttin' new ones in to soak every day,
till you do fish up the right one.
It won't do, my friendthey'd smoke the joke
all the riff-raff in town would be pushin' old gentlemen
into the river, and the elderly folks would have to give
up travellin' by the steamboat. We must wait, I'm
afeared, till the real thing happens. The right person will
be sure to come along.
I hope so; and so it happens quick, I don't much
care whether it's the old man, or his little boy, or that
rich widder, that gets a ducking. I'm not proud.
And when it does happen, exclaimed Nollikins,
swelling with a triumphant anticipation, who but me,
with more beard than a nannygoat, and a mile of gold
chain, goin' up Chestnut street! Who but Nollikins,
with his big dog!
Yes, and Billy Bunkers, with two big dogs, a chasin'
the pigs into the chaney shops.
Then you'll see me come the nonsense over the old
folkswho's loafer now!and my dog will bite their
catwho's ginger-pop and jam spruce beer, at this
present
writin', I'd like to know!
And, in a transport of enthusiasm, Nollikins knocked
the hat of Billy Bunkers, a shallow, dishlike castor, clear
across the street.
Thus, wrapped in present dreams and future
anticipations
a
king that is to belives Nicholas Nollikins
the grand exemplar of the corner loungers. There he
stations himself; for hope requires a boundless prospect
and a clear look out, that, by whatever route fortune
chooses to approach, she may have a prompt reception.
Nicholas and his tribe exist but for to-morrow, and rely
firmly upon that poetic justice, which should reward those
who wait patiently until the wheel of fortune turns up a
prize. They feel, by the generous expansion of their
souls, by their impatience of ignoble toil, by their
aspirations
after the beautiful and nice, that their present
position
in society is the result of accident and inadvertency,
and that, if they are not false to the nature that is within
them, the time must come when the mistake will be
rectified
,
and they shall walk in silk attire and siller hae
to spare, which is not by any means the case at present.
All that can be expected just now, is, that they should
spare other people's siller.
STEREOTYPED BY L. JOHNSON,
PHILADELPHIA.
THE END.